*********************** 764 ************************* Perfect spot for quick lunch for anyone. Back by the talented chef Art Smith, and a former McDonald executive, wow! - Great price - Healthy food - Friendly service. The salmon, the kale salad, and the Barramundi are MUST order!
Lyfe Kitchen is, healthy. Really, really healthy. I AM  a spaghetti or chicken kind of girl, but mostly enjoy good hearty food, so, it was a bit of a shock when I saw the menu. I wanted to like it, but it didn't happen. The items on the menu are mostly vegetarian, and, did not sound very appetizing to me. The portions are small, too. I ordered the bbq flatbread. I have to say, it was ok. It tasted healthy and bland, and there was not a whole lot of food. This would be a perfect place to go if I was on a diet of any kind (especially gluten-free), but I just quit my diet like, last week. So super healthy food is not a priority right now. The inside of Lyfe Kitchen is cute and simple. It kind of reminded me of the restaurants inside IKEA. Very casual. You order at the counter, seat yourself, and they bring you your food. There is outdoor seating too. Personally, when I go out to eat, I want to enjoy myself and indulge. I did not get this satisfying experience at Lyfe Kitchen. I would recommend it to others that are looking for a casual lunch or dinner at a healthier restaurant. I love the concept, decor, and customer service. Just not for me, but it may be a good option for you!
I really like the food at Lyfe! The ingredients are fresh and tasty. Their portions are what portions should really be. Tal's ancient grain bowl is one of  my favorites on their menu. The atmosphere is pleasant without being formal with nice outdoor seating. So why the three stars? Inconsistency! For example the first time I got their cucumber-mint cooler it was bland. I thought cool I can make it either sweet or savory to my taste. Which I really liked. The second time I got it, it was sweet. When I returned it so they could make me one without sweetener the guy behind the counter told me that they don't make them individually and that they are made in bulk and sweetened. Another example is a friend that I was dining with got the salmon on three separate occasions and each time the size of the fish varied. Once it even looked like a large piece was missing. Also they have a problem with expediting the food. I've had people in my party receive their food and ten minutes later I still hadn't received mine nor did any server come by to check on us. I had to flag one down and it still took an additional ten minutes to get my food. By this time my friend's food was cold. And finally I understand that it's expensive to run a business in Palo Alto but their prices are a little expensive for the portions that you're getting. So would I go here again. Sure... just not as frequently.
LYFE Kitchen wants to you think one thing: "healthy"! With a sizable menu of food options (regular, vegan, and gluten-free menus available) using grains such as quinoa and flaxseed, there are a number of high-carb pastas and other not-so-healthy items on the menu. In fact, many items are easily 500 calories +. That being said, the food is very fresh, made with quality ingredients (which you pay for), and thus is quite good! We ordered the mushroom and goat cheese flatbread, which was ultra thin atop a cracker-like crust made with flaxseed. It was listed in the small bites/starter section of the menu, but easily could've been a meal for one. We also tried the fish tacos with grilled mahi mahi, which in my opinion, were rather bland. It definitely needed a more flavorful sauce to accompany it. I really wanted to buy into the 'Love Your Food Everyday' concept with a 4-star rating, but until I try more menu items, three stars it is.
I really like this spot. Been here twice and I love that I can have gluten-free and dairy-free options when I feel like it.  More like when I'm doing good on my tolerance levels.  Ha! I like the causal but clean atmosphere and really enjoyed the skinny water glasses.  Random?  Nah... for someone like me who has a hard time gripping wider cups, it was a pleasant surprise. The first time I had the gluten-free goat-cheese and mushroom flatbread.  The gluten-free dough is never as good as the real thing but the toppings were flavorful. The second time I came here I had the fish in the broth with veggies, Asian inspired, and that was lovely.  The tastes and textures of that dish really had me wanting to unceremoniously drink the liquid down as well as lick the bowl.  Both of which I willed myself not to do.
My new favorite place in Palo Alto. The food is fresh, healthy and there are lots of gluten free options. I've tried nearly all of them. The fish tacos are probably my favorite but everything here is solid. I'm in love with the cucumber cooler...it's refreshing and is so much better than plain old water...and it's huge. Usually drinks like that are tiny and expensive. I've also been here for breakfast and it's equally good. I only wish they extended the breakfast hours to the brunch time frame. Sometimes I'm slow to start on the weekends. Their coffee is also good, which is a huge plus...so often good breakfast places have sucky coffee...thankfully that's not the case here. The patio is nice and the inside is well designed...modern and clean but still comfortable. It can get a little loud during peak hours but not annoyingly so. Definitely check this place out, especially if you want to eat clean or have to eat gluten free.
This place has a chic and nice atmosphere and good for casual dinner. The food is healthy, fresh and appropriate portion. I usually don't like mint but their cucumber mint juice is a pleasant surprise, very refreshing. Service is friendly with care. I didn't give it a five star because they don't have many choices and thai soup was a healthy but watery (not creamy at all) version, which is not authentic.
We had brunch there last weekend and everything was tasty. The crowd seemed a little chi-chi/yuppie, but then I guess that's what WE are too :) I wasn't sure how tasty everything would be, but the flavors were fresh and we'd definitely come back.
I love this place! I've eaten here a couple of times, and I plan on going back. Pros: - Nutritious food that leaves you feeling healthy and satisfied. - So many vegan options! There is a separate vegan menu, which makes it very easy to see what's vegan. There are also dietary icons for everything. Everything I tried was delicious. I had a vegan breakfast tofu wrap one day, and a vegan caesar salad another day. The salad was the best salad I've EVER had! The vegan cheesecake was just OK--I've had had way better. I think it was banana cheesecake with rum sauce. - Beautiful decor with a modern, edgy vibe. Cute fresh herb garden. - Super friendly, helpful staff who seem happy to be working there. After finding out it was my first time there, one worker excitedly explained the mission of the franchise. It was cool to see people so passionate about their work. - All of the takeout containers and plastic ware are biodegradable and made from recycled materials. Cons: - The portions are somewhat small.
Great food, nice trendy atmosphere, everything local and organic. Minus 1 star because I did not enjoy my burger that much - very sweet ketchup and pickles. Other than that, food was prepared with care and arrived fast. Definitely a good one.
Nice, bright and airy lunch option in downtown, with an outdoor patio and an indoor area that opens out to the patio.  I've had Art's Unfried Chicken both times I've been and it is really good!  It comes with a healthy serving of root vegetables.  It's "max 525" calories, so it's not really diet food, but then I figured out LYFE isn't trying to be about weight loss healthy, it's more about natural, additive-free, sustainable healthy.  The cashiers always try to upsell you on the fruit juices, which are decent.  Their chocolate budino dessert was really yummy!  And finally service is friendly.
This place was recommended by a local. Well......   I love the healthy concept = 4 star, I love the service = 4 star, but quite honestly, I found "Wow" is missing from the taste.   That is the reason for my personal opinion of 3-star. -Kale&Banana Smoothie Soothing.  Almost taste like "Ryokko Aojiru" plus mint. So filling.  Smaller size option would have been friendly. -Unfried Chicken Unfried fried chicken is not difficult to make at home.  Use of "Panko" would have been nicer and added more fun.   Sauce is missing "kick". -Corn Chowder It was kind of watery.   Would have been nicer if it was thicker.   Tasted like each ingredient flavor was going separate direction.  Touch of Mirin or something would have unified / harmonized the taste. -Nappa Cabbage Salad with Gardein (vegan) Chicken Red chili sauce is way too hostile and too damaging to the beautiful combination of delicate flavors of veggies.  I would have loved this salad without chili. -Gluten Free Mushroom / cheese flatbread Actually, I liked the toasty aroma and crunchy texture of the rice flower flatbread and moist and delicate flavor of topping.
I was very impressed with this place. I had the risotto with shrimp. My initial reaction to the dish was just okay. Like any good dish though, with every bite the flavor just gets  progressively better and better until you get to your last bite and you're thinking. . . that was good, should I order another one? My friend had the fish taco which I was considering too. He said it was really good too. Really nice atmosphere. Service is good and friendly. The prices weren't what I expected from a fancy looking place. . . very reasonable! Next time I'm up in this area I definitely have to hit this place up again!
I have heard about this restaurant for quite a long time. I thought it was a sit down type of restaurant, yet it's actually an order and sit down and the food is brought to you. They say you are supposed to get your food within five minutes, yet we had to half a half an hour because of technical problems but the manager handled the situation very nicely and offered us a gift card back. The meal on the other hand, was delicious! I highly recommend the fish tacos and the portobello and free range grilled chicken with pasta. The chocolate budino was wonderful. It has pomegranate seeds on the bottom with almond shavings, or so it seemed.
The fish tacos at Lyfe are EPIC!!  I'm so glad that they're the picture for the restaurant.  They had all sorts of tasty toppings, but they came with a side salad that was quite "citrusy".  Some of my friends didn't even eat the salad because the dressing was too acidic. HOWEVER, the tacos were DELISH and we're so filling that i had absolutely no room to eat anything else that night!  They had some great options for vegetarians and vegans as well. We also tried a flatbread but it wasn't as good as the fish tacos... it's a good appetizers to share among people though. Lastly, you're given a buzzer after you order but it never goes off and the wait staff MAGICALLY brings you your food!  We figured that it's a GPS tracker within the restaurant... but who knows... The ambiance was trendy and it was crowded on a thursday night, but the service was fast and there as outdoor seating available.
Food was good (fish tacos, panzanella salad w/ salmon), but way too pricy for dishes that size. Staff couldn't really tell if the home bread contains any nuts which my friend was allergic to.
Fantastic: unfried chicken (It was like shake n' bake but had SO MUCH FLAVOR) Good: lemon pound cake, black iced tea, service, fish tacos Not a fan: burger (extremely sweet-too much ketchup! patty tasted sweet too...), Caesar salad
This place is REALLY GOOD!!! I love receiving gift cards to different (and new! and most importantly delicious) restaurants! We came here last week and I was super excited to try. We ordered the portabello mushroom and goat cheese flat bread, unfried chicken, and a cup of sweet corn chowder. My fave was the flat bread. It was indescribable. The flat bread was really thin (wafers?) and they load up on the caramelized  onion, goat cheese (love goat cheese), and mushroom. They also had a tangy sauce on it that made this dish sweet yet savory. it was SO GOOD. Like, no joke. REALLY REALLY GOOD. hahaha. it came in 6 slices which was plenty for the two of us. The unfried chicken was alright. I didn't like the dijon mustard sauce that it came with and I think they had waaay too many potatoes. The unfried chicken itself was tasty in a very healthy way. If you're a health nut, you might dig this dish. We didn't get the vegan option too! If it is your first time at Lyfe, it might be a little overwhelming. They have gluten free menu, vegan menu, gluten-free & vegan menu, etc. It took us a while looking over the menu too but we just did process of elimination and went from there. And we didn't go wrong since the flatbread, again, is REALLY GOOD haha get the point? So if you're looking for something light and healthy, I would say LYFE is the new place to check out. It's right across from Yogasource and across from Fraiche so it's the perfect spot! Lots of good looking well groomed men works here too! You know what that means...haha jk =P
Made my over for dinner with a group of friends for the first time a few weeks ago. I love the concept of this place, which is about promoting a balanced lifestyle and a healthy diet to complement it.  The fish tacos that I ordered were very fresh and flavorful, though a tad bit dry. The salsa and cilantro went well with them - not too overpowering. Though some might disagree, the portion size was perfect for me! We also tried the sweet potato fries, but they weren't great. They were too sweet for my taste. I'm guessing that extra sugar was added - at least that's what it tasted like. Bottom line: Fresh food  with a healthy twist. I'll be gracing this place with another visit the next time I'm in town.
The only way this could get better is if it were less healthy, which would kind of defeat the point. If I were rating on taste alone, it would get less, but this is health food, people, come on. What do you expect? I came for the gluten-free, and I stayed for the gluten-free--this kitchen's GF menu is one of the more extensive ones out there. I spent the day in Palo Alto and had breakfast, lunch and dinner here because of the variety of GF food choices available. I enjoyed the free-Wifi, outlets for laptops and the ambiance. I could practically live here (if only they had apartments upstairs!). The breakfast sandwich was a little less filling than I would have liked, but it did the job--next time I'll try the scrambled eggs. The GF burger was the best I have had on the West Coast, reminiscent of In-N-Out and way bigger. The bun was even light and fluffy like its wheat-based equivalent, though a bit cardboard-like.. Shame it came with a salad though! I would love to see some GF fries here (see less healthy comment above). The fish tacos were amazing (especially once I added salt), and the balsamic drizzle on the mushroom goat cheese flatbread I ordered was simply heavenly. A+ establishent, would eat at again. Five stars! Oh, and the breakfast potatoes should be hashed like it says on the menu. They're not. They were served whole. Quite tasty, but still. My only (minor) complaint. Oh--and I will be back for the GF unfried chicken. My dinner companion cut his with a fork, and there was no resistance. So tender! So excited.
I really want to like this place.  Really, really do.  The location and ambiance are great.  Something about it makes me want to go inside, but each time I do, it seems to fall short. Stopped by yesterday for a late afternoon snack/drink.  Had some cash left on a gift card that I figured I could kill.  Came by with my buddy and each got a glass of wine.  I admit, the wine selection is always pretty nice, and they are generous with letting you try things before you decide.  However, the margherita flatbread was amazingly disappointing.  Not crispy enough, too much (processed mozarella) cheese, not enough basil (barely any at all), and the cherry tomatoes (seriously, cherry tomatoes!) were way too tart for this dish.  I actually found it a bit offensive that this was labeled a margherita flatbread.  It was like a kindergartener's margherita.  You know, just like kindergarteners think spaghetti-o's pass for spaghetti.
oh man.  have come back twice since my first visit.  food remains solid, but service... come on,... Read more 
I'm finally writing my first five star review in San Francisco (technically, Palo Alto)! There is so much to love about LYFE Kitchen. First, while I was waiting in line, their indoor herb garden totally stole my heart. I was so inspired, I couldn't help take a picture and share on Pinterest and Instagram immediately. Yes, I was that patron. Second, the food was surprisingly fresh and flavorful, and there are gluten-free options. I guess I shouldn't have expected any less, but it was nice to eat something delicious that was equally healthy. Double brownie points. Finally, while heading back to my table from the ladies room, I saw random inspirational quotes on the wall. Not only did my stomach leave happy and content, so did my soul. Well done, LYFE Kitchen. Well done.
Stopped by for lunch and it was really busy! I got the crispy gardein chicken sandwich, which comes with a little side salad. The sandwich itself was delicious but small. The lemony dressing on the side salad was not my thing. My boyfriend ordered the unfried gardein chicken, which comes with asparagus, parsnips (I think) and a creamy cashew sauce. It only came with one small piece of gardein. He enjoyed it but was still hungry when we left. I enjoy the concept and the ambience. We appreciated that there was a separate vegan menu. The food was good but the portions were very small for the prices -- about $9 for the sandwich and $12 for the unfried chicken. For that reason, I'm not sure I'd go back.
there salmon is AMAZING! it was fresh, perfectly cooked and tasty!  We went on a sunday evening and walked right in, our food only took 20 minutes, service was polite and attentive. i loved there cucumber drink!  very refreshing.  the best thing is that my fiance loved it and wants to go back!!
So I went to Lyfe with somewhat low expectations. I had heard that it was "healthy" so I was very skeptical. Buuuuut, it was so good!! I had Art's unfried chicken which came with potatoes, asparagus, and some kind of mustard sauce. Everything was perfect. A few reviews have said that the portion sizes are small for the price and I will admit that, because it tasted so good, I probably could have eaten double the amount they gave me. But since I'm trying to keep on track with better eating habits, this portion size was perfect. It was NOT tiny but wasn't huge. I really liked the whole modern/healthy vibe going on in here. Everyone I came in contact was super nice. The woman sitting at the table next to mine had one of the flatbread pizzas. It looked amazing. Almost made me go add that to my order. Next time for sure!
I honestly think I found my new favorite restaurant in Palo Alto. Although it may not have been my favorite restaurant before but with the recent push and slew of healthy eating, I really have started to love this place. I like that everything here is around 600 or so calories with many things at much, much less that. It doesn't actually take a lot of calories to fill me up, it's all about flavor and presentation and this place totally kills it. I have even stopped getting salads at most places because they're too bland with no protein element. At LYFE, there isn't always a protein element but the salads are amazing. They have fantastic blends that even a non-veggie eater like the bf loves. I thoroughly enjoyed their pastas, their chicken is fresh, juicy, delicious and their pizzas / flat breads are also super yummy. I like that you can pretty much customize anything, and everything can more or less (if its a dish) be dairy free. So important for people who have allergies etc. I totally recommend this place because every dish I've had so far is solid ... and they serve beer! How cool is that.
Had a chaotic but decent dinner with the kids (the reason for the chaos), my wife, my dad, and a friend at LYFE kitchen. The plusses: Liberty ale on tap, fish tacos were tasty, flatbreads were big, and the barramundi was served over a tasty broth. My five-year old enjoyed both the kids cheese pizza flatbread and the chicken tenders.  The two year old was happy to climb all over the modernish furniture and did not spill any lemonade (this time). Dad enjoyed his Farmer's Market salad with grilled tofu. Food has good flavor and the menu is varied enough for lots of different palates. The minuses: a bit more expensive than it needs to be (the usual "301" markup), and though the dishes are designed to be calorie-conscious, some of the dishes could be just a bit more filling. Happy to return to sample more healthy choices, but equally likely to hit The Creamery for a Choc-PB shake right after too...
I've been intending to try this place for awhile. Today I was working from home and decided to get a meal to go. The interior is very inviting and feels like a great place to sit, relax and enjoy a meal. Everything from the herbs growing on shelves to the menu screams "organic, fresh and healthy". I also love that the menu lists the calories count for everything. Here's where things lost a couple stars. I ordered Art's Unfried Chicken to-go and then sat at the waiting area bench to wait for my box. And waited. And waited. It was during the lunchtime rush so I didn't expect a speedy turnaround on the order, but after 25 minutes I went up to ask about it. The girl at the counter went back and found it sitting boxed up on the shelf by the chefs. Just sitting there. Judging by how cold the chicken was, I would guess that it had been sitting there for quite sometime. This was incredibly disappointing; especially after how much I was looking forward to it. However, it was probably just a simple and honest mistake of the lunchtime rush. I brought it home and nuked it a bit before eating. All-in-all, it was pretty good. Great balance of veggies and sauce with the chicken. Not too heavy and enough to satisfy me. The chicken was a bit dry, which could have been from being reheated in the microwave.
I am such a fan! If you eat out, you might as well eat healthy! I usually get the Breakfast Plate, the portions are perfect. You get a load of potatoes, eggs, and two sausage patties. There coffee is delish too, I haven't had lunch here, but I've had a variety of breakfast items. I'm esp a fan because they cater to G-Free (Gluten Free), Vegans, etc.... the menus are detailed as well. Check it out, I am a LYFE advocate just like Troy Polamalu!
Went to LYFE for a quickish lunch on my break.  The food was good and it was nice that they tell you so much about what's in the food upfront so you can make an informed decision.  The place has a nice outdoor seating area and has a funky vibe.  I got the BBQ chicken flatbread and an ice tea.  My coworkers fish tacos came relatively quickly and they smelled amazing.  My tea also arrived quickly and I enjoyed sipping on that while I waited....and waited...and waited for my food to arrive.  Needless to say I encouraged my friend to eat because her tacos would be cold before my food arrived.  After a long wait my flatbread finally arrived.  It was tasty...but i'm not sure it was worth the awkward long wait.  If service had been a little speedier I def would give four stars.
Love LYFE!  Highly recommend the fish tacos and sweet corn ravioli.  Just delicious and made all the better for you in a health-conscious manner.  I have yet to leave with no less than two smoothies or juices (try the ginger-peach-hibiscus cooler and the kale banana smoothie) per dining event.  I can't wait to have dinner here, when I can order more food (grilled Barramundi, anyone?) and splurge on dessert.  The chocolate budino taunts me every lunch hour.
OMG loved loved LOVED this place!  I came with a vegan friend not knowing anything before hand but it looks like the menu was developed by one of my fav vegan chef's Tal Ronnen!  What luck! Tal love's Gardein faux meats and so do I, haha, so both our dishes had that in the mix.  I got a burger and damn it was good.  Under 10 bucks and filled up good. Even though they are more on the healthy side they have hella good BEER ON TAP!  Woo! The feng shui of the place makes me feel really good too; lots of light, everything is very clean, and it doesn't feel tacky even though you order your food right when you walk in from a counter  (as compared to a sit down restaurant).  Prices are very reasonable for the quality of food and the fact that you'rea eatin' in fuggin ritzy ass Palo Alto.  Oh snap!
I really wanted to like LYFE more than I did... Went with some friends last Saturday after a trip to Santa Cruz. The place wasn't very crowded but there were about a dozen people in the kitchen. The order-taker was really nice and helpful, but the rest of the staff seemed low-caliber. I had the 'unfried' chicken and a watermelon chia drink. The drink was not good at all and my entree tasted like something I would get at a standard conference or convention - definitely nothing delicious. I also tried my friend's caesar salad and found that to be bland as well. I really can't think of any situation in which I would choose to go back here... maybe if I had a friend who was vegan or gluten-free (almost everything on their menu is created with those special interests in mind). I've heard that LYFE Kitchen was started by the former CEO of McDonald's... what a shame - I'd choose ANYTHING from McDonald's over what I ate at LYFE (but I love McD's, so perhaps I'm a bit biased).
Really like the food here. It's healthy yet delicious! My favorite was the unfried chicken, and the fish dishes (I had tuna with soba, and the salmon before). The sweet corn chowder and flatbreads are pretty good too. Wasn't impressed by the dessert though, when we had a death-by-chocolate the first time we came here, but there are plenty of other places along uni ave for that.
I love this restaurant. Everything I've had here tastes so good and makes you feel good, too. Most restaurants shovel a huge plate of butter, cream and salt into your face to make things taste better. Lyfe proves that you can have a healthy meal that tastes great with healthy proportions. I would have the kale/banana smoothie every day if I lived in Palo Alto. Please open a Lyfe in SF!
I think 3.5 stars, but I'll round up. Healthy and trendy comes to mind when I think of this place.  Calorie counts are spelled out on everything on the menu.  If you're trying to stay healthy and need practice with portion control, this is the place to do it for an enjoyable meal. Portobello mushroom and goat cheese flatbread:  Tasty but the flatbread itself was very grainy.  The pomegranate-balsamic gave it a good sweet kick BBQ chicken flatbread:  I liked the mushroom better Cucumber mint cooler: refreshing Final calorie count for my meal: Roughly 500 cal. I was still pretty hungry after so next time I plan to try something heavier for more sustenance or maybe gorging on a burrito for dessert!
Fairly underwhelming meal.  The salmon was tasty, but overpowered with seasoning and cranberry.  The burger was overcooked and dry.  The mood and food of the place struck me as trying-to-be-healthy cafeteria food.  The food was mostly fresh but there was nothing delicate in the flavors. Granted, this isn't a 5 star eatery, but the name/theme of the place probably set my expectations too high.  Another reviewer pointed out the cherry tomatoes on the margherita flatbread which pretty much sums it up.  It's "healthy" "good eating" for people with perhaps less discriminating tastes, but the food really misses the mark.
FINALLY! After drooling over so many reviews on Yelp I made my way over to LYFE for breakfast. This was a great change from the normal breakfast establishment I like to frequent. I tried the breakfast sandwich with a sausage patty and it was great! I felt good after eating it and was not carbo-loaded and wanted a nap, SUPER BAD! It was a nice nad light breakfast option that I didn't have to make at home (that's the best part!). I wish there were more places like LYFE. I paired my sandwich with OJ, which was good! Can't really mess that up. The decor inside is super cute and chic. I walked in and I thought it was going to be pricey, but I was really satisfied with their prices. Cute place and good food, sounds like I'm in!
I didn't know healthy food could taste so good.  Met my husband for lunch and we shared grilled fish tacos and a chicken sandwich.  So delicious, so fresh, so clean. Easy parking, not so crowded, clean and modern decor, and wonderful attentive service.  Can't wait to go back and try something new!  To tasty and healthy eating for LYFE :=)
ABSOLUTELY AWESOME!!! I love it every time I eat here. One of my favs and I always feel great after eating at LYFE. I recommend it to who asks for a place to eat.
Tried their unfried chicken (which basically means grilled) and it was great! My 1 year old daughter was eating off my plate because she enjoyed it that much. I also tried the artichoke dip which tasted more like chicken than artichoke or spinach. I can't say the dip was bad, but different. The pita that it came with, was loaded with healthy stuff so you don't have to worry about carbs, since you're also getting fiber :) I also tried the pineapple, coconut, lime cooler, YUMMY! I would highly recommend for a refreshing drink! You also get a lot of it, not a tiny glass like some other places, so you'll have enough to drink for the entire meal!
I absolutely love this place! I had the BBQ chicken flatbread and it was fantastic! The staff was very knowledgeable about what they were serving, so that's always a big plus for me.  You just can't go wrong at this place. :)
I'm visiting Palo Alto, CA for a few days and I wanted to eat healthy while I am here. I came across LYFE Kitchen on Yelp and thought with all the rave reviews I should check it out.  I am by no means vegan but wanted to see what options they had. The Vegan BBQ Flatbread caught my attention and so did the Kale banana smoothie. The service was fast and the food was delicious. I wish they had a LYFE Kitchen location in New Jersey/New York City area. I will definitely eat there again!
Still terrible. My friends and I came for a "healthy dinner night." One friend had never tried the restaurant, so we recommended the most palatable dish there for lovers of dining out -- Art's unfried chicken. All of us, actually, ordered the chicken. And all of us were dissatisfied. Again, this is a $12 restaurant entree, and yet the portion was small. Maybe a 7 oz chicken breast, and a handful of brussel sprouts. So, naturally, my friends and I subsequently went on a food crawl rager through Palo Alto because we were still so hungry. Over the course of two hours we went to: 1. Pizza My Heart 2. Paris Baguette 3. Cheesecake Factory 4. Starbucks 5. Oren's Hummus Then I went back to the hospital to finish a presentation, but my friends continued to rally and went to the TacoMania truck in Mountain View. We may or may not have gone overboard, but that's neither here nor there. What's more important -- and I say this in all seriousness -- is that this restaurant is NOT WORTH YOUR MONEY. If you want to eat healthy food that's actually tasty, make it yourself!
Food at this price -- regardless of how healthy it may be -- should not taste this bad. Last time I... Read more 
Tried the not-fried chicken with root vegetables: dry, dry. The burger was dry, too. Good salads, great strawberry lemonade. Love the decor. I'll give it another try because I like the concept.
Sorry but LYFE is NOT a 4-5 star restaurant.  At most it is a 1.5-2 star place.  I will give  LYFE credit for trying to be a healthy restaurant, but it has utterly failed on any type of taste. All dishes were completely bland and unappealing to look at.  Our meal breakdown: Mushroom and Goat cheese flat bread - I liked the texture of the flat bread and the taste of the mushrooms.  Unfortunately the goat cheese they used did not smell or taste right. Shrimp risotto - Again, totally bland and had very little flavor.  Also a total of 4 shrimp, it would probably be healthier to have less risotto and have a couple more shrimp.  This was not worth the price at all. Barramundi with noodles and broth - My these of totally bland and tasteless continues on to this dish.  The barramundi was simply grilled and laid on top of a vegetable, noodles and broth.  The vegetables, noodles, and broth were good, but the fish failed. I like the fact that there are restaurants taking a healthy approach, but the execution of the dishes at LYFE equate to tastelessness.  There was nothing unique about the dishes and it would be very easy to create anything they made at home for 1/10th of the cost.
Love! Love! Love! A vegan's dream. Reasonable prices, flavorful food, fresh ingredients, cheery staff. Best of all, there is something for everyone. No more feeling like the pain in the ass of the group when you and friends take an hour to find a restaurant that offers something you can eat. Lyfe has vegan, vegetarian, gluten-free, and omnivore menus. If you have nut allergies, no worries because nut-free dishes are clearly marked. Cheat the summer heat with their coolers. They're delicious! Gardein is used for the meat substitutes. Vegans, you can't go wrong with anything you order here. As for ambiance, the decor is eco-modern and the feel is yuppie healthy upscale fast food. Palo Alto restaurants generally suck cotton balls. Go to Lyfe Ktichen for a pleasant surprise!
I've been here three times and have tried the gluten-free burger, the margherita flatbread, the unfried chicken and the chicken pasta. Everything except the unfried chicken was pretty tasty, especially the burger, which wasn't greasy in the least but still managed to be tender and juicy on the inside. The unfried chicken was just a slab of over-cooked chicken with a mustard sauce, disappointing. They either forgot or lost our order one time, and we ended up waiting 30 minutes and then having to flag someone down. However, multiple people came to apologize to us and the manager gave us a $15 gift certificate, so they handled it pretty well and I was generally pretty satisfied. The menus come in regular, gluten-free and vegan, so there are options to match a huge variety of taste preferences and diets.
In a word, YUM! My boyfriend took me here for a surprise lunch, having discovered the place earlier in the week himself. While waiting in line did take a while, it gave us time to decide what to order, as the menu is quite extensive. Regular menu, vegan menu, gluten free menu, and items are marked as having nuts on the menu. A great place for people with dietary restrictions. We placed our orders and turned to the next order of business, waiting for a table. After trying not to hover, we scored a perfect spot near the outdoor patio, and our food and drinks began to arrive shortly thereafter. Our drinks came out after food however, so I think they could work on their timing behind the counter. For the table, we shared a Spring Pea Flatbread and the Edamame Hummus. Both of these were delicious, and I would definitely order them again. I loved that they sprinkled paprika on the veggies (radish, cucumber, tomato) that came with the hummus - I'm going to start doing that at home, what a great idea! I had a Pineapple/Coconut Water/Lime Cooler to drink, and while the flavor was great (the coconut water toned down the intensity of the pineapple), it did not go well with my food so I drank most of it after my meal as dessert. I also tried a sip of the Cucumber/Mint Cooler, which is super refreshing. I had the fish tacos as my entree, and they were fabulous! So often, fish tacos are mediocre, but these were just as I like them! The two soft tacos were filled with  fresh, grilled mahi-mahi accompanied by avocado and coleslaw, chipotle aioli and cilantro, with a red salsa on the side. SO good! And the baby kale salad that was on the plate was a nice surprise, and also really tasty. I can't wait to come back here, I just wish I lived closer!!
Healthy. Bright. Delicious. Lyfe Kitchen is one of the newest additions to the downtown Palo Alto lunch scene, and boy is it a great addition. From their clever concept (healthy & delicious food from fresh ingredients at a great price), to their awesome customer service (including how great their table service system is, and how consistently they are on top of table cleaning), to the truly delicious food (Cucumber Drink? Delicious. Pizza? Delicious. Caesar Salad? Delicious), Lyfe Kitchen has basically nailed the University Ave lunch needs of everyone ranging from startup guys, to retail folks, to college kids. Lyfe Kitchen -- expand. Move to San Francisco. I need more Lyfe in my life.
If I could give zero stars, I would.  What a disaster. Sure, I am old-fashioned.  I don't like the whole culture of hipster/yoga-mom/vegetarian/ilovebarackobama/let's-save-the-world...you know what I'm talking about.   No, I'm not the anti-christ.  I care about the environment, try to live a healthful life, etc. etc. but it's not the defining trait of my life/philosophy.  They are a means, not an end.  The clientele of Lyfe doesn't really strike me as being made of kindred spirits. As an aside, best thing heard while standing in line: "yeahhh, gardenburgers and Priuses for life!" whaaaa? Biases aside, if you are serving tasty food, that's basically all that matters.  They fail here to. The fish taco things sounded interesting- raw ahi instead of the usual unhealthy fried standard.  Bad thing is that it was horrendously under-seasoned and so soggy that by the time I got them they had soaked the tortillas and made them watery and goey.  And the odd side-salad of some strange green (chia?) was absolutely disgusting.  I don't care if it's healthy, if it doesn't taste good, THEN DON'T YOU DARE PUT IT ON MY FUQIN PLATE!  Even if its the soon-to-be-chic superfood of 2015. Friend had the unfried chicken and I tasted some.  Bad on 2 counts.  First, accepting it for what it is: bland (horribly under-seasoned again!), dry, and all around unpleasant.  Second: don't mess with fried chicken by trying to invent a healthy KFC reincarnate.  If you're on a diet or just trying to eat healthfully, accept that fried chicken is not an option and live with the consequences of not having its oily deliciousness in your mouth.  But that's just an opinion.  HOWEVER, if Lyfe really must serve unfried chicken, AT LEAST SEASON IT PROPERLY! shame shame shame Beets were fine, but those are hard to screw up. I never condemn a place based on one visit.  During the unfortunate circumstance of my second meal at Lyfe, I tried a mushroom flatbread.  This was TOO salty, and too dry.  The crust was the worst part.  Dry and tasteless, thick in some areas, thin on others.  Like partially-fossilized cardboard.  yumyum?  no. Bottom line: I support wholeheartedly the concept of a restaurant serving really healthy foods.  Taste trumps all, however, and this is something that Lyfe needs to learn.
Yea Ive been here a few times and liked the food. However I just found out today that this place was started by MCDONALD'S executives-I will not go back. I boycott anything MCDONALD'S including CHIPOTLE. I don't care if the food is good I don't trust the place. There are other good places to eat in Palo Alto that are local and not corporate.
I love this place, they have the calorie count of all food on the menu. The food is healthy and... Read more 
Saw this place on Yelp and being that my mom is gluten free, I had to check it out. We had a family of 6 adults and 3 kids and we sat outside. Love the decor, clean and modern. You order your food and pay ahead of time. We started w the flatbreads -gluten free - the portobello and goat cheese was sooo delicious! I had the unfried chicken (not gluten free) and it was sooo good. It came with potatoes and a mustard sauce. I wish it had more asparagus though instead of all of the fingerling potatoes. Good service, friendly. I will definitely be eating here again.
Sure it may be healthy, local and organic but it's lacking deliciousness. The unfried chicken was nothing more than ordinary and the corn chowder satisfactory. SATISFACTORY. 3 stars. A-OK.
cons: can be expensive pros: tasty and healthy. gets a 5 star for taste and food options!
I entered LYFE with great expectations (don't we all?) and left feeling underwhlemed and still hungry. Healthy or not, food here is quite bland. Came here twice for lunch and didn't like the fish tacos or the unfried chicken. But at least when LYFE disappoints, you can always find a better Sprout of options just around the corner in downtown PA.
This place is fantastic. I have tried the fish tacos, chicken pasta, napa salad, mushroom and goat cheese flatbread, sweet potato soup and 2 smoothies.  Everything has been really good, fresh and proportional. I always leave hear feeling full, but not stuffed. The fish tacos are by far the best. Food comes out pretty quick even when it is busy. Must try
Great & Healthy food! We ordered: Spring pea & broccolini s Flatbread: Delicous! getting it again :) Art's unfried chicken: great and healthy! Risotto peas & Carrots & Shrimp: Ok, I wouldn't ge it again. Crispy gardein* chicken: really good! The vegan chicken taste great and fresh. Can't wait to get it again I do have to complain about their service. - We ordered wine again and it came 15 min later. They should just hand you right there at the counter when you order it. - They dont' serve the table all at the same time, so a few ppl get their food and stare at it while others are waiting (and the wait is not exactly short). and I do have to admit the portions are pretty small, so if you're really hungry, order more than just the entre.
this is the kind of hipster foodie place that makes me roll my eyes. just the name alone makes me snicker. I love it. lots of vegan options- I had the chopped napa cabbage salad & Art's unfried unchicken.  both were yummy.  also had a cuke-mint cooler, which was refreshing. very modern, clean & sparse ambiance. wait staff is super nice. there was a mix up with my order, they gave me a $15 gift card & were falling over themselves w/ apologies. outdoor seating was great. free wi-fi, also a nice perk. will definitely be back!
I used to work near University Avenue in Palo Alto (more like Menlo Park) and almost every day, a lot of us would walk downtown for lunch over a cool little wooden bridge that crossed over the San Francisquito Creek. University Avenue (and Hamilton and Lytton to either side) is fantastic for places to eat and places to shop (if you're a woman). On a warm summer night (like last night), it's a great place to sit outside and people watch. I've been working a lot recently, so last night was date night for Mr. and Mrs. Weez. I actually managed to surprise her with out dinner destination since she'd never heard of it and it wasn't the typical sort of place I'd go to. Lyfe Kitchen is a chic, modern-looking space which is warmly lit, but has a nice breeze going through on a sweltering evening. It reminds me a bit of Citrine or any number of California style casual restaurants where you order at the counter and then the food is delivered to you. When we ordered, I think we were supposed to get a numbered buzzer so that they knew where to deliver the food, but our cashier didn't give us one. No biggie because a manager came by later to see how we were doing, saw we didn't have a buzzer, and took care of us immediately. I got the fish tacos which were tasty and light with grilled white fish, slaw, and a spicy mayo style sauce. I think if I was going to get it in the future, I'd ask for it without the mayo because it was a little overpowering. Just plain salsa would be fine. Oh, and tip to the kitchen. If you grill the tortillas for a minute or two a side, it will prevent them from disintegrating once you put the wet ingredients in! My wife got the vegan unfried chicken which I tried a bit of and it was really good! It came with a nice side of vegetables in some mustard sauce. I would definitely come back here again! The place is clean, the staff are super nice, and the food is very good (and healthy)! Most of the entrees are 600 calories or less and they don't use butter, saturated fats, etc.
Definitely order the fish tacos! Even if you're not a health nut, you'll like 'em. As one could already tell from close to 900 reviews, I'm not one to hold back from fatty, salty or overall junky food. However, the older I get, the yuckier it makes me feel to eat this way. Although I'll never give up the bad stuff altogether, it makes sense to try and incorporate healthier foods into the diet as well as regular exercise. Oh, the joys of becoming a real adult! LYFE Kitchen reminds us all that eating a balanced meal doesn't have to be boring or bland. Unlike many healthy eateries, this restaurant actually wants you to sit down and enjoy your meal. The menu is fun enough, but definitely gives the impression that they mean business when it comes to nutrition. Kind of like that cool teacher you had in junior high... Not the one that would let you cheat on tests, but the one you could count on to tell something important (kind of like an after-school special). Had lunch here a few weeks ago and we both chowed down on our selections. As I mentioned before, you can't go wrong with the fish tacos. My friend had the "fried" chicken and his empty plate indicated that it wasn't too shabby, either. Might I add that the Oogave Ginger Ale is absolutely refreshing? LYFE offers sever non-water drinking options, which I very much appreciate! Just took a look at their website and it appears that they also serve breakfast. Nice! I'm sure that's pretty popular in downtown Palo Alto... good call, guys! Definitely adding a Healthy Foods list and LYFE is going at the very top. Kudos to anyone who can get me away from potato chips and cheesecake :)
Ordered online and went to the store to pickup. Asked the male cashier if everything are in the bag. He replied YES. As I was heading to the front door my instinct told me to double check the order and guess what? Two items are missing! The manager took care of my order and gave me the same bag with additional 2 items. Now guess what? a box of juicy Brussels Sprouts was placed vertically and the contain spilled on the bottom of the bag. All the above mistakes can be easily resolved if they pay more attention. We ordered the potato wadges,2 x  brussel sprouts, grill baramundi, unfried chicken, and shrimp risotto. The taste was just  ordinary nothing really wowed me except their terrible service.
I came back here a few times... and I enjoyed all my meals since my first review! (Although I did not try new deserts). My favorite dish are the fish tacos, Napa Cabbage Salad, and creamy mushroom chicken pasta. It is very aromatic, with great portions and with a very reasonable calorie intake! I really like this :) It always look fresh and light. I will definitely be coming here more often for dinner. Thanks Lyfe Kitchen - you are one of my favorite restaurants (for quality, taste and health).
LYFE Kitchen is a trendy-hipstery Palo Alto fast-food style restaurant. Food is pretty decent. They... Read more 
So conflicted about this review. Food - 3 stars. Maybe it was the rave reviews, or my expectations were too high. But I thought the healthy food tasted a little too much like HEALTHY food, where it's still not the same. The portions were also disappointing - of COURSE your entrees are low-calorie when you serve tiny portions of it. I appreciate a restaurant exercising restraint, but I'd also appreciate feeling at least a little bit full after a meal. Service - 4 stars. Came here on a busy night where it took a while for the staff to clear the tables. They also forgot one of my orders. But overall, everyone was very friendly and polite. I'm totally for a restaurant trying new things, but this just didn't cut it for me. If you're looking for a go-to restaurant while you're on your newest cleanse or fad diet, or if you want a vegan and/or gluten-free friendly restaurant, this might be perfect for you. If you, like me, thought that all the hype means this place has exciting foods that also manages to be healthy without sacrificing taste, you may be disappointed.
Me before eating: "Ho hum, I'll try the vegan chicken sandwich. I've has gardein before and it was pretty good." Me after eating: "I could eat the vegan chicken sandwich every day!" Everything about it was great. The gardein was crispy (but not hard) outside and soft inside. I like the healthy options and appreciate that they provide calorie counts.
We met friends -- who have raved about this local restaurant of theirs -- and have to admit, it's a good one. Hopefully the chain will spread and we'll have one in the East Bay. Before discussing the food, I have to say that waiting in line to order the food is a bit of a drag. We were there perhaps at peak time -- Sat at 7 pm -- so perhaps I wouldn't mind so much on a Tuesday at 3 pm when I can't find too many decent places still serving lunch. The ambiance is tasteful except it's noisy. The acoustics improved as people came and went. When we left, around 9:30 pm, it was much more conducive to conversation. I had sweet potato soup that was so good I got another bowl to bring home. I also ordered a side dish of roasted parsnips, asparagus, and potatoes. And a vegan cookie for the ride home. Yum! My partner had the non-chicken sandwich which was thoroughly enjoyed. One friend had the non-chicken with veggies and didn't particularly care for it. The other shared a hummus platter. The staff was very friendly -- asking us about our food, moving about the restaurant. Why can't they have them take orders too? I didn't tip because...well...it didn't seem appropriate when you have to wait in line.
wow!   There are a select few places that inspire you to go home and determine whether or not you can invest in a franchise.  I had the beet salad and added free range chicken.  TASTY!   I washed it down with a banana kale shake which was tasty too!  LYFE is a place for healthy happy people, and it is reflected in both the staff and the clientele!  I want one in the south bay!!d
Great place to get healthy food. they have great flatbreads and smoothies
This place has a vast selections of Californian cuisine, including vegan options. The ingredients are fresh and top notch and the preparations are tasteful and careful.  It strikes a good balance between comfort and healthy food. Good job!  Recommended.
I promised I'd give this place another try and I'm so glad I did! I finally like it..The trick is: Order 1.5 main course plates per person! Seriously 1 plate just isn't enough food to keep you satisfied. It kinda reminds me of Cafe Gratitude in the sense that you have to do a whole lot of ordering to finally get full. But, it's actually slightly better and cheaper that Caf. Gratitude minus the snob factor. So, for 2 people we ordered the unfired chicken, the classic burger, and their beet salad. They also have fresh OJ which paired perfectly with our lunch.
As other Yelpers have said, although this place IS healthy, it does not deliver in terms of flavor.... Read more 
I've enjoyed some of the catering from LYFE in the past, but my first visit here wasn't encouraging-- it was closer to California Cuisine Gone Wrong.  My panzanella has a strangely sweet dressing, and-- much worse-- the bread lacked taste, texture, or character.  Why bother with a panzanella that doesn't have good, crunchy toasted bread cubes?  A dining companion ordered a quinoa-crunch burrito, but I couldn't figure out if his enthusiasm for it was feigned.  I may go back, but I'm going to have to order much more carefully.
First time at LYFE Kitchen. Pleasantly surprised.  Good stuff. Wasn't sure as to what to expect other than the now redundant organic, vegan, concious, green, garden fresh, etc., approach to cooking.  LYFE was all of that, but more importantly they delivered on the most important aspect...the food. My wife and I both ordered the quinoa crunch wrap. The wrap was delicious.  It was made with fresh veggies, avocado, edamame hummus, "forbidden" rice and adzuki beans.  It came with a hot sauce and salad on the side. Everything was fresh and had the right texture and bite.  My only complaint is that the portion size was a bit smaller than I'd like.  The wrap/roll was only about 4-5" long and was sliced in half.  If I wasn't so socially vain, I would have/could have devoured the entire wrap in two bites. As an aside, they serve a sort of plant-based meat substitute called "gardein." Having never had it before I asked for a sample.  They gave me a small cup full to try.  It looked like grilled chopped chicken and tasted very much like it.  There were some dishes on the menu that contained gardein that I definitely want to try next time.
Love it! Feel good after eating for the rest of the day...
Such high hopes such low reality. I wanted so much to like this place, to embrace it as a part of the community. Order was wrong, prices a bit high for what you get, and tasty but not a home run - more like making it to first base on a walk. It simply does not deliver on the hype.
I love 'em health conscious eateries w/ class... friend and I went here for lunch on a sunny afternoon.... we decided to go to Palo Alto, but I was tired of the same old places... and I was craving something new, fresh and healthy yet deliciously enjoyable... so tap tap I went on my iPhone Yelp app and did a search in the university ave area (zoomed out a bit to include a larger area in the search) -- okay okay, it might look like I'm being too detailed, but hadn't it been for this, I wouldn't have discovered this awesome Love Your Food Everyday restaurant! yeah that's LYFE *The restaurant is conveniently located away from the bustling university avenue! woohoo!!!! *They have patio seating - which is pretty cool as you eat and watch people walk by...i love people watching, don't you??? who doesn't...  :D The wait staff was courteous... the floor manager Gabi (i think) was friendly and patiently listened to our suggestions.... We suggested they add fresh juices to their menu - which would take the restaurant to a whole 'nother level.. We ordered 1. mushroom goat cheese flat bread on whole wheat crust! so freakin delicious... 2. beet salad 3. sweet potato fries 4. cucumber cooler 5. pineapple-coconut cooler and ended the meal with a.. 6. yummy vegan banana cheesecake all the food we ordered was extremely delicious, fresh and made us feel satisfied, not full or bloated! The cheesecake was by far the best vegan cheesecake I've had... Can't wait to go back again and try other things on the menu
Really good. Knowing this place exists makes going to the Peninsula so much better. I tried sweet potato soup and edimame hummus. Both were awesome, but I can't wait to try everything else on the menu. The vibe is fun and fresh; I especially love the herbs near the registers. Makes it feel open and airy.
I haven't yet been to the Lyfe Kitchen, however I know I'll be dropping in soon (possibly even tomorrow). This weekend Lyfe Kitchen set up a booth at an event I was participating in and the chicken sandwich embellished with such goodies as avocado, roasted pineapple and mint, was so tasty and  refreshing that I'm a for-sure, total fan now. This is a fabulous addition to Palo Alto cuisine!  Not sure how long they've been with us, but I hope they'll be with us for many, many years to come!
Great! Finally a fast casual that's healthy. It's within walking distance to my office so that's nice. I've had a few dishes from here, the standout has been the Fish Tacos. The tortillas are fresh and fish is firm and flavorful. They include a nice spicy salsa and the slaw mixture for the tacos adds the perfect amount of crunch. I'm a fan!
I had no idea that Art Smith had opened a restaurant in the Bay Area, let alone one that emphasized healthier food options after making his own lifestyle change.  A week before my gf told me about this place, I had seen him on a rerun on the Food Network before he lost his weight and the stuff he was making would definitely not light on the calorie count - I have to admit, I was pretty skeptical that his reworked dishes would be any good, but I was very pleasantly surprised. We got: ROASTED MUSHROOM & GOAT CHEESE FLATBREAD - Must-try! Essentially a small pizza on flatbread.  Hella umami people. ART'S UNFRIED CHICKEN - I still prefer good ol' regular fried chicken, but as an unfried alternative, this was very good and surprisingly juicy. Personally, I'd add some salt to taste.  The brussel sprouts that come with it on the side are also delicious. CORN CHOWDER - Wasn't bad, just can't say I was a huge fan.  Their croutons were good though. It gets crowded in here, and finding a spot to eat inside was more chaotic than In-n-Out, but it's definitely well worth your time for really delicious healthy food.
This place is really, really delicious, and an amazing choice for a fresh lunch in Palo Alto.  During my ridiculously long walk around town, I wanted to have a healthy lunch and sit aside to enjoy the beautiful weather.  LYFE Cafe fit the bill!  You order at the counter before sitting down, and they bring the food to you.  I ordered the sweet potato soup, the beet/farro salad, and the pineapple-coconut-lime cooler.  Everything was a little pricey - I think my total was $17.  The man behind the counter was extremely friendly and made some personal recommendations. The sidewalk patio is very cozy, with comfortable chairs and some soft couch-like seats, which I was happy to snag.  My drink was fabulous, fresh and fruity.  It's not alcoholic, so it's extremely refreshing.  There was no fake sugary taste, just great fruit flavor. The sweet potato soup was excellent, and was a recommendation from the guy behind the counter.  It was luscious, velvety, and simple.  Can't begin to make a complaint about it.  The roasted beets and farro salad was pretty great as well.  The sweet beets, the delicious surprise of basil, light dressing, crispy walnuts - it was a perfect combination. So yeah, it's expensive, but everything is so fresh and high quality that I left feeling perfectly satisfied.  I couldn't have wanted my food to taste any differently.  Next time we swing by Palo Alto, I'll be sure to stop in again and try something new!
Amazing food. What I love is that the flavors are fantastic, while the healthyness levels and calories are what I would cook at home. It's nearly impossible to find a restaurant that you could actually eat at every day. These guys really know their stuff! And the staff is very friendly and responsive. So far my favorites are the corn chowder, fish tacos, risotto with shrimp, and unfried vegan chicken. Yum!
I wish I could give this restaurant more stars, but I can't. It gets points for being healthy, having things like gluten-free, contains nuts and vegan tagged on the menu, and the decor, which is inviting and comfortable. If you want to relax and catch up with friends it's a great place for that. But if you are looking for truly amazing, healthy food, this isn't the place. We both got salads, she had the Roasted Beet and Farro and I the Farmer's Market with added chicken ($2). She thought hers was tasty, but nothing super special. Mine was OK as well, but it was overly dressed, had a mass amount of walnuts and hardly any goat cheese or chicken (which I paid $2 extra for). About half way through after digging for all the chicken and goat cheese bits I was pretty much done. I might go back and try something else because I do really like the concept. I guess I was just hoping for a bit more. We did split a Edamame Hummus and Flatbread appetizer that was very good. It was tasty, with a nice presnetation and all that. Would get it again if I go back.
Excellent! Clean, bright, healthy, fresh and tasty options here. I'm a veggie / vegan and just love the easily found variety for me, as well as for those who eat meat/chicken. I've been here twice now and favorites were: Edamame Hummus, the fresh juice coolers, Crunchy quinoa wrap (comes with a salad and a sauce on the side that is awesome), Beet and forbidden rice salad, and my friend had the fish tacos which they loved. Service is friendly and the food comes out quickly as well. I also like the little devices they give to you which leads them directly to your table.
Had a mini-reunion here with friends, and it worked out great.  Having everyone order  and pay first really  makes it easy for people to eat while waiting for others and there is not bill splitting at the end. With some conversation they were willing to hold/reserve a table for 10 of us so we can sit together. Food was fresh, fast and tasty!
Kudos for fresh ingredients and healthy spin on fast food. Taste was good, not over the top. My husband was not wow-ed by the food, although I enjoyed everything. I guess he was looking for more flavor.
Great food, fair prices, good atmosphere.  I crave their corn chowder and farro beet salad!!  You can actually buy the corn chowder now at the Redwood City costco but it's not as good as when they make it in the restaurant. If you're a health nut, veg, or foodie, you'll love this place.  High quality food at low prices.  We've needed another "Sprout" like restaurant in downtown PA and Lyfe is it!
The food here tastes like what I get at my company's cafeteria.  However, I pay only $6 at work vs. $12 at Lyfe for food of similar quality.  Also, I don't want cafeteria food on a Friday night. I got the mushroom flatbread, corn chowder, and the unfried chicken.  The best of the bunch was the flatbread but it was only "Ok".   The crust was crispy but there was a sweet balsamic glaze that did not go well with the topping. In fact everything tasted too sweet - the flatbread, the corn chowder, the honey mustard sauce, and the brussel sprout sides that came with the chicken.  Lyfe Kitchen should list the sugar content along with the calories and sodium content. My husband got the burger and it didn't look very fresh.  The beef patty looked really dry - again what you would expect to see in a cafeteria. In general the food lacked seasoning and tasted mass produced. I doubt if there is a professional chef in the kitchen. The concept - healthy fast food in a clean, modern space - is good but the food quality needs to improve for this restaurant to gain loyal followers. It seems that Palo Alto can accommodate mediocre restaurants.  If Lyfe Kitchen was located in San Francisco, it wouldn't last more than a few months.
I've been dying to try LYFE Kitchen for months and a gift card from a client finally got me there! I had expected a cold, sterile environment because that's how most "healthy" restaurants are for some reason. I was pleasantly surprised. Though they use quite a bit of technology and the space has a modern, urban feel (it is Silicon Valley, after all), the overall atmosphere was still warm and welcoming. The seating is comfortable and upholstered, there are quiet spaces to work, communal spaces to chat, and live herbs reminding you of where food comes from. Now the food: delicious! LYFE Kitchen provides separate menus for Vegans and Gluten-Freers as well as labels dishes that are dairy free or vegetarian. The restaurant makes it easy for anyone with dietary restrictions to know exactly what they're getting without having to even ask. I love that their burgers are served with salads instead of fries. The reason I give LYFE Kitchen 4 stars instead of 5 is because of their limited protein choices. I realize they are trying to be vegetarian/vegan friendly, but this restaurant would near perfection if there were more animal protein options and fewer flatbreads and sandwiches. As a nutritionist, I recommend eating balanced meals with some good-quality protein, fresh vegetables and fruits, and limited emphasis on processed grains like breads (even if they are gluten-free). The food tastes great and is definitely a place I will go when I want to indulge in a gluten-free flatbread or burger. If you're looking for a healthy choice, it's probably best to order a salad with added chicken, salmon or shrimp.
Uh....mazing!!! My boyfriend and I came here for dinner after a family friend recommended it. After scoping it out on the drive-by tip a few times, we figured the consistent business was a good sign, so we tried it. I had the unfried chicken. It was absolutely deeeeelish. The brussel sprouts and butternut squash were roasted to perfection, and I personally was a fan of the flavorful sauce that accompanied the dish. My boyfriend had the BBQ flatbread. He's a big pizza fan, so I was quite impressed that he gave two thumbs up to the flatbread. I had a bite, and that just gave the flatbread an immediate FOUR thumbs up! The place has kind of a modern yogi vibe to it, and as my boyfriend stated, "it feels like I'm in an Ikea showroom". Agreed. However it was very comfortable and definitely made you at least FEEL healthy (maybe the woodgrain, herb plant boxes, and simplistic decor had something to do with). Did I mention every plate is under 600 calories? Heyyyyyyyy!
As a vegetarian foodie this is one of my Certain fallbacks when I'm in the area.  Everything I have ordered has been good, well presented.  Last time I was so hungry that when I ordered the Fried Chicken, I forgot they actually have the 'real meat' stuff here. When the dish came I cut into it and thought, "umm... wait a minute..."  A waiter walking by noticed the puzzled frown on my face, stopped and asked if everything was okay.  I said, "Is... this.. REALLY Chicken??!!"  It's all I could process to ask since I haven't eaten meat in like 7 years. Without missing a beat he said, "Yes!  Did you want our Gardein version?"  I nodded, he picked up my place with a "No problem, I'll bring that to you right away."  And I got to eat my Lemon cake dessert that I had also ordered, first! Very, very nicely done.  And very good food!
I love this whole idea of heatlhy foods and everything being under 600 calories but at the end of the day the food was a little too bland for me. I'd be wiling to give a try for lunch but not dinner. Casual spot- you order, get a number, and they bring it to your table.
My wife and I love Lyfe Kitchen.  Here is why: 1) The things here are not super healthy, but they are pretty good for you given that you are eating out, and they are trying to use organic and wholesome ingredients to feed you.  Really, your mother would not feel guilty feeding you here. 2) Awesome corn chowder and salads here (e.g., their beet salad).  Really, you must try it.  The spritzers are excellent too. 3) My wife loves the decor here.  Come here to eat and work and use the WiFi. 4) If you come here and eat more than once a week, you won't feel guilty as the prices won't kill your savings nor your arteries! 5) Perfectly place for a casual date with a friend or to catch up.
Disappointing errors with regards to allergies and vegan diets. I highly commend LYFE Kitchen for trying to serve everyone, even publishing vegan menus as well as gluten free menus.  Unfortunately, after visiting LYFE Kitchen many times since opening day, I have had some disturbing experiences relating to the gluten free/vegan aspects of their menu. I was served at least 5 times the gluten free pizza crust with the assurance that it was vegan (after extensive checking each time - I like to be sure), only to find that the crust was in fact not vegan about a month ago.  On that visit the head chefs and owners happened to be there for a meeting and they were consulted and I was offered a gift card for the error, so I trust that information over the previous investigations.  Fortunately the ingredient was egg whites which I am not allergic to, so I had not been suffering any ill effects.  However, I would never purchase anything with eggs in it normally, so this was a disturbing revelation. Now for another disturbing incident - the last time I went there I ordered the tofu tacos, which are pretty good, and are solidly vegan, but I wanted to order something else for a friend with me.  We planned to exchange food, so it needed to also be vegan and gluten free.  I was assured that the gardein "chicken" breast was gluten free if they did not bread it and fry it.  They would grill it on the gluten free grill. Fortunately I only ate a small bite of this supposedly gluten free gardein breast.  While my friend loved it and thought it was really delicious, I am not into fake meat, so I stuck to my tacos.  Upon further research the gardein website declares that they currently *do not* make any gluten free products. There is a slim chance that LYFE kitchen has some prototype gardein product that does not have gluten, but this seems highly unlikely.  What I find most disturbing is that the server went and checked in the back to make sure that the gardein was gluten free, giving me false confidence. Additionally this error means that gluten containing items were cooked on the gluten free grill, which could mean serious contamination issues for other people's orders.  If you have severe allergies, I don't recommend LYFE kitchen, despite the gluten free menu.
I was just mourning over the loss of Citrine in Redwood City, and then I found this place in good ol' Palo Alto. With organic, sustainable ingredients, a changing seasonal menu but a super casual dining environment, it's almost a dead ringer for Citrine, maybe even better. You order and pay as soon as you walk in, and they'll hand you an electronic coaster. It doesn't buzz, but allow the waitstaff to know where you end up sitting (oh technology!!), so they can bring your food out to you. We had their creamy chicken and pasta and their flatbread. Both were delicious and light. The sweet potato fries were a bit soggy but the ketchup they had was good. They also serve up really gigantic glasses of iced teas. All-in-all, if you want a light, quick bite, but don't want to compromise on the quality of the food, this is a great place to stop by. We were rushing to see a movie and finished our meal (with ordering and all) in less than 30 mins. Granted, it wasn't rush hour, but it was still impressive.
Ridiculously delicious foods at good prices. Its healthy, and the atmosphere is very hip, young and fresh. I love the concept behind the restaurant, and they have the food to back it up. I also love that you pay as you order, so there's no need to wait for the bill. The servers are quick about picking up empty plates. I ordered the Unfried chicken and my husband had one of their pizzas. Both foods left us feeling full, but not overly stuffed. I would go back regularly if I lived closer to Palo Alto.
Great place for healthy food. I tried the fish tacos and my boyfriend ordered the fried chicken. My fish tacos were okay. I enjoyed the fried chicken more which was oven baked with a side of brussel sprouts and sweet potatoes. Would return if I were on a diet ..
I've seen Arthur on Top Chef so after seeing the interview on Eye On The Bay I bookmarked this restaurant. I like their concept of healthy ingredients and every dish under 600 calories. After all, I am all about eating organic, fresh, unprocessed, locally grown ingredients; well most of the time... So I finally came here for lunch today with my friend. Got there at noon and the line was short, but a few minutes later there soon was a long line formed after us! We ordered at the counter with overhead flat TV screens showing their menu. The decor and ambiance was much nicer than a regular cafe and the crowd was a younger crowd. Near the cashier's counter they even have an area with their own home grown herbs and vegetables in pots. How refreshing! We ordered: Large Curry Thai Soup ($6.99) - not spicy even though there is curry. It was tasty and fresh with some potatoes and veggies. Small Sweet Potato Soup ($3.99) - Sweet potato pureed to a thick and creamy consistency. Not very sweet with good favor. I make this soup myself sometimes and this is the exact way I would make it. Solid, yummy and healthy. BBQ Chicken Flatbread ($7.99) - It's basically a very thin crusted rectangle-shaped pizza with very thin layer of cheese, tasty caramelized onion with BBQ sauce and chicken. The portion was good and perfect for two to share. I can see why it can be under 600 calories. It's all about portion control. Classic Burger with grass-fed beef & cheese (optional) - $7.99. The burger bun is also the healthier whole wheat bread. I loved it. The burger was juicy and the fixings (pickled cucumbers, lettus & tomato, katchup) were good. It was just the right size for me; not too big and not small either. I liked that there is also a side of kale salad to go with the burger. The kale salad was healthy and so good! Overall a very nice place to get your healthy meals. The burger I was getting here did not cost me more than other burger joints yet I was getting healthier ingredients. For those who are used to eating heavier, richer, or over sized meals they may still feel hungry. But smaller portions, healthier ingredients are actually better for the health. You just need to get used to it.
Okay so maybe i didnt order the right thing the last time.  I took a client to lunch today at Lyfe and he ordered the ancient grain bowl, so i figured to take his lead.  I had the cucumber refresher, which was delicious! and surprisingly enough, the vegan grain bowl was really good too. It was loud for lunch but not too loud that i couldnt have a conversation...then again dinner might be different.  all in all, im slowly but surely being swayed to like this place more.  Next time im bringing the hubby!
So this place gets a huge bonus for being a healthy dining establishment and has a cool / trendy... Read more 
Average food! Small portion sizes. The coolers have no flavor and tonnes of ice. Make sure you tell them before hand that you want less ice. Ordered the unfried chicken and the portion size is less than an appetizer. Won't be coming back for sure.
I went back to order pick-up and they were so busy that they got my order mixed up so it wasn't made when I got there. But the staff was super nice and even gave me a gift card to make up for it. When I got home I saw that I had been given the wrong order! But I wasn't about to drive back to exchange it and I didn't feel any animosity towards the staff because they had been really helpful and apologetic. The entree I ended up eating was the "unfried chicken", which I hadn't originally ordered because I was afraid of the "cheese" sauce which is made of cashews. I love cheese and was not interested in a nutty flavor. However, it didn't taste like nuts at all and was delicious! As was the chicken and the side of brussell sprouts with butternut squash.
Finally, a place where I can eat! This is not the spot for people whose ideal meal is grilled cheese... Read more 
Let me tell you why I hate Lyfe..... They make me feel like it's justifiable to spend all of my money at their restaurant. This is because it's so frickin delicious, not because their are expensive. I've ate at Lyfe about a dozen times. Every single time i've eaten there, i've not been disappointed with their service and their quality and tasty food. More restaurants need to practice the same mission statement and principles of how a restaurant should be. The only negative thing I could say about Lyfe, is that there is only one. They could make a killing if they opened one in downtown Mountain View. I know at least 3 areas that have closed down restaurants that they could take over. Someone from Lyfe should get on that. ;-) Here's two things i'm worried about: 1, Lyfe will not become popular enough and will cause them to shut down. 2, Lyfe will lose the their uniqueness quality in service and food, and will become just like the other crappy restaurants. I drive out of my way to have breakfast/lunch/dinner at Lyfe because of the things I mentioned above. If this changes, you will not only lose me, but other customers who feel the same way I do. Keep doing what you are doing, hang in there, and expand if you can. People need the quality, healthy, and delicious food you serve. Period. Thanks for coming to town, I hope you continue to grow and change the way restaurants are ran. We need more restaurants like you.
Rating: 2.5 I love the concept but didn't love the offerings. I know healthy food can taste good which is why I was so disappointed when this didn't. The drinks... * Pineapple coconut  lime cooler - sounds soooo good too bad it had so much pulp that it was undrinkable. * Cranberry pom cooler - much, much better! The food... EVERYTHING was under seasoned! Salt and pepper can do wonders... * unfried chicken - this is not a healthy version of fried chicken it's a barely breaded chicken breast without any flavor. There is no comparison. * chicken/mushroom pasta - the pasta was floating in a soup-like sauce. I had to drain each bite so I didn't get sauce all over the table and my lap. * ceaser salad - really good but it's just lettuce with dressing and parm. The portion sizes and prices were right on but looking at all the high ratings we obviously didn't order the right dishes. If I lived in the area I'd definitely give it another go but since I don't I doubt I'll ever become a Lyfer...
If you like your meals with a healthy side of "smug," this restaurant is for you. I admit that the concept of a restaurant that served healthy food sounded appealing; however, I did not expect it to be a menu full of bland, eco-friendly crap. This restaurant is so pretentious that when I asked for honey to accompany my ultra-hippy oatmeal, I was told they only carry "agave." "LYFE" (with a "y" for no good reason) exemplifies when a culinary concept occludes any notion of good-tasting food. While they were busy patting each other on the back for being at the forefront of hippy/ecological/healthy/organic trends, they forgot to focus on making the food actually taste good. On top of the food just being bland and bad, the really annoying montage of happy and diverse actors on all the tv's made it difficult to even enjoy my black coffee.
LYFE Kitchen personifies Palo Alto. It's hippie and healthy while still being yuppie and pricey. The food is vegan, organic, etc.. with calories listed and everything. But the price is just a little too high to make it worth it. Exception being the unfried chicken. This one dish is really really good. It comes with delicious brussel sprouts and butternut squash in a tangy mustardy sauce. YUM. Coolers are good too - like the pineapple coconut lime. Those are probably the only two things you should get here, otherwise you're better off going to Sprout a block away for your healthy fix.
Chic healthy/vegan spot with open concept in heart of Palo Alto.  Unfried Chicken dish very tasty, also enjoyed Kale, Cranberries & Tarro side. Menu lists sodium & caloric content of meals. Creative assortment of fresh mixed juice drinks provide uncommon alternatives.
This is a great place for healthy and delicious food. That's not an easy combination for most restaurants. But the owners have made it clear that is their goal. I personally like the Eggplant Parmigiana and Shrimp Risotto. The Cranberry Pomegranate cooler is a great fruity drink. The decor is simple, clean, and modern. As other reviews may have noted, you order your food first from a cash register (as if ordering from a McDonald's). I hope this place stays around for a long time.
Found this restaurant on Yelp.  My daughter wanted to eat healthy and my wife is a vegan so thought we would check it out.  Nice modern, clean atmosphere.  You order at the counter and they give you an electronic locator so they can bring food and beverages to you.  The menu has vegetarian, vegan, and of course meat dishes but everything is prepared in a healthy and fresh fashion.  The calories and sodium are listed on the menu.  I was a bit skeptical that the food would be good but pleasantly surprised.  I had the fish tacos which were quite flavorful and filling.  The side salad was adequate and the baked sweet potatoe fries were actually quite good.  My daughter had the chicken ancient grains bowl and enjoyed it.  My wife had a salad and grilled vegetables and was happy. Derek Fisher was there getting a sales pitch to invest in the company and I love D Fish so have to give this review 5 stars.  The food was excellent, healthy and affordable.  The 3 of us ate for under $50.
This place is super cute! I came here with a group of old high school friends. It was a great place to chat it up and sit next to a live mini herb garden that they have in the front of their restaurant. Definitely a health conscience place to eat. The environment is casual, where everyone can order their meal on separate checks. I tried the following dishes: - Sweet corn chowder - Roasted mushroom & goat cheese flat bread - Chicken and Grilled pineapple sandwich serve with kale on the side All of the dishes were delicious, especially the flat bread! If you're in a large group of 4-5 people, i would recommend sharing the flatbread; the roasted mushroom and goat cheese one was delicious! I enjoyed my meal and I will definitely come here again after a day doing yoga at the gym!
Our office sometimes orders lunch for 15-20 from LYFE Kitchen. The food is tasty, seems fresh, is decently priced, and the menu offers a variety of options. Perhaps it's more of my own personal paranoia, but whenever I'm ordering for more than 6 or 8 people, I always call the restaurant and ask for their fax number so that I can submit a written order. It seems to make it easier for everyone. LYFE said that they don't have a fax machine or an email that I could sent the order to, and would just take the order over the phone. I gave it to them, drove down, picked everything up, got it back to the office, and discovered someone's order was missing. When I drove back down to the restaurant, LYFE was very apologetic and gave us the missing sandwich at no charge. Kudos for conflict resolution, as someone said before me. I'll be back, I'm sure.
LYFE, an acronym for "Love Your Food Everyday," was the brainchild of two former McDonald's execs, who had a change of conscience after making America so fat; they decided to create a health food restaurant that actually tastes good. This comes together at LYFE Kitchen, which has a modern, simple, almost at-home feel to it. You start by ordering at the counter, and then finding a seat in the spacious restaurant. There are both metal chairs and wooden chairs seated at wooden tables, and even some couches, if you'd prefer to eat your health food in comfort! Service was quite friendly at the counter, happy to give recommendations, and very pleasant to interact with. Nothing to complain about here! I ordered the grilled salmon. The fish itself was just okay, but what really made the dish, was the bed of baby kale that it lay atop, sprinkled with cranberries, farro, and pomegranates. Just excellent. My biggest gripe is that the portions are pretty small. Yes, it's health food, so portion control is important, but still, it's small. Overall, though, it's a great meal. Definitely worth checking out if you're looking for a good, healthy option with a good, healthy flavor to it!
3.5 stars. Positives - Lots of relatively healthy options - Prices are reasonable for Palo Alto - Good open space to sit and enjoy your meal - Food is brought to you Negatives - While they reveal the calorie count, it would be good to know how fatty some of these offerings are. Nice to have the calories and sodium, but how about the fat? 500 calories feels like a healthy dinner but not if it has 35 grams of fat - Desserts are terrible I have tried 6-7 things on the menu and nothing really blew me away. Not a bad option but not one that I would make a special trip for.
We came here for breakfast. This place has a very modern feel to it, which I always associate with a cold/fast vibe That contradicts the idea of warm, wholesome and healthy food that they serve. However, I loved that their entry had screens with pictures of the food so that I could shop with my eyes. The menu board was also digital. Surrounded by technology, there were also live herbs growing in a display case. The fusion of the two worlds took so getting use to it but I ultimately liked the overall experience You walk in, they take your order at the register and pay. Proceed around the corner to get your napkins, straws (if needed) and utensils, and then find a place to sit. Even though we were given a number, they brought the food to the table. The service was good, friendly at all times and prompt. The food was exactly what I had hoped for. I ordered a breakfast parfait, which was petite but packed a huge punch of flavor with fresh fruit, greek yogurt and a small bit of granola for added crunch. I'm not a huge breakfast eater so it was a perfect meal for me. I also ordered a coffee, which was very smooth and enjoyable. Again with the contradiction of atmosphere... I enjoyed sitting in my ultra modern booth while enjoying the warmth of sun shining through the large, front windows. If you want a different experience, definitely give LYFE Kitchen a try!
This place is pretty good!  It's also really sharp looking!  Upon entry, you can tell that it's pretty new, having only opened recently in 2011.  I was there on the day of the grand opening and the line was out the door.  Visit and you'll understand why. Ambiance:  The place is sleek, with a full size digital menu behind the cash registers and with monitors and videos embedded and playing within the walls.  Look to your left and you'll see a wall/separation of herbs and spices, presumably home grown such that they can be used in your food.  That's how legit this place is.  The tables, floors, counter tops and outdoor areas are all equally as impressive, being that they're clean, new and unlike the dingy accommodations of older or dated restaurants nearby. Service:  You'll get some smiles here.  The people behind the register have likely been there since the beginning, and with that they carry the pride of enjoying where they work.  They're also able to answer any questions that you may have about the food, so don't be shy.  Note though that this is not a "sit down" place in regards to where you order; you still order up front and then seat yourself.  Don't get left outside waiting for a server without ordering first! Food: Really good!  I highly recommend the brussel sprouts side, and one of the flatbreads.  Now I see below that some of my fellow yelpers keep complaining about the lack of taste.  They attribute this to the mission of Lyfe to keep the calories down and seemingly can't figure out why the food is also a little simpler in terms of taste than they're used to. This makes me wonder if they know about the other things that Lyfe tries to limit.  See, the nice thing about this place is that it's a de facto portion control.  Seen on on the Lyfe Kitchen website, everything on the menu is: a) less than 600 Calories, b) Contains less than 1000mg of sodium, c) contains no MSG and d) there are no fryers on scene. Thus salt is kept out on purpose.  Add more if you like. Before any of this discourages you, look through the menu. TIP:  Try the roasted mushroom & goat cheese flat bread.  Oh baby Jesus. TIP:  Note that the drinks will likely not be free refills...  So maybe grab a free water with it! TIP:  Afterwards, go around the corner and have some Philz Coffee!  They're really close to one another. 4 out of 5!  Refills on drinks pleaaaaaaase? :)
I have to start by saying that I was a little skeptic about this place. Two former MacDonald's execs and a "healthy fast food" concept left me a little weary. Nonetheless, my boyfriend and I were in search of a light lunch with an affordable price tag and decided to give this place a try. And I sure am glad we did! Everything was fresh and the food didn't take long to get to our tables. The process is simple: you order and pay up front, then get a "buzzer" that has a location service, so you don't have to pick up your food - yes, we were waiting for it to buzz and then to our pleasant surprise both the drinks and the food were brought to our table. The layout of the restaurant is clean and modern with lots of natural light coming in from the large windows. Outside seating is always a plus in sunny California and their patio looked cozy. I had the corn chowder and an arugula salad with strawberries, walnuts, cheese, etc. Both were delicious (the corn chowder needed a little more pepper and maybe a tad more spice for my taste) and filled me right up. My boyfriend had the BBQ chicken flatbread pizza and we split the artichokes with aioli. The aioli was amazing!!! On a last note - you have to love the prices here! Bowl of soup, appetizer, large entree salad, a flatbread pizza and two chilled tea drinks came to just over $30. Definitely coming back!
As a meat-eater with an allergy to dairy products, I really appreciate a place like LYFE kitchen.  Everything on their menu is clearly marked for major allergens and diet choices (gluten-free, vegan, etc).  I've tried a couple of the dishes - the unfried vegan chicken (pretty good) and the chicken and mushroom pasta (omit the parmesan!!) The staff at LYFE were extremely helpful in helping to select meals and alter meals that would work for me.  The room is extremely modern and clean.  They offer free wifi as well. There are even vegan options on the dessert menu!!  Usually I can't even bother looking at the dessert menu as it is all filled with dairy.  However, at LYFE, they have a vegan cheesecake and a vegan cookie (YUM!) Oh and everything they prepare is very healthy and the calories are marked. I do hope they come out with even more options on their menu and change it frequently.  After being there a couple of times, I would like to see maybe another pasta dish (that is dairy free please!)
I cannot say enough good things about LYFE Kitchen! I absolutely adore this restaurant. It's quick, easy, HEALTHY and tasty. To all the complainers that say the food is not that good - have a little perspective. I'd prefer a yummy meal under 600 calories over a decadent meal of 2000 calories any day! They put calorie info on their menu so it definitely helps making informed decisions. And regarding complaints about portion size - again, I refer to my 600 vs 2000 calorie comparison. You can't expect a huge portion and have it still be "good" for you. Regarding price, I think it's very reasonable considering the fresh ingredients they serve and their location in the heart of overly pricy downtown Palo Alto. My favorite go to items are: the beet salad, breakfast burrito, coconut lime cooler (so refreshing!), vegan corn chowder, fish tacos, chicken & mushroom pasta, and salmon.
Lyfe is totally a New Year's resolution type place. If your resolution is be healthy but lazy and pay a premium for convenience. I typically stay away from places that serve food that I could easily make myself for a mere fraction of the dining out cost. Lyfe is one of those places. Sometimes, however, you are not at home, won't be at home anytime soon, and want something fresh and healthy. The food is actually flavorful; I was expecting something bland and boring, but my roasted beet and farro salad with additional tofu was surprisingly zesty, and as Lyfe proudly proclaims the dishes' caloric values and low sodium value, I knew I was eating something that I would not feel guilty about. Lyfe has this really weird image and branding that I don't quite understand. There was a lot of hype from the tech world for a place serving simple food. There's these GPS trackers that help the wait staff find you, despite the fact that the place isn't huge. There's some high-tech water system that doesn't change the taste of the water whatsoever, but perhaps the value is undetectable to my palate. On their website there's links to 'Lyfe Ambassadors' and 'Lyfe Voices' which seems a little cultish for a place serving salads. This place smacks of a weird self-satisfaction that makes me want to eat at one of the many ethnic eateries along University instead. I prefer places that don't have a nebulous venture capitalist aura hovering over the food. Cheers to touting fresh and locally sourced ingredients, but I'll skip the Silicon Valley vibe and head straight to the market.
I have been here several more times since my first visit, and the food is still great.  I have now tried fish tacos, several flat breads, several soups, several salads and a dessert. I love the portion sizes.  I have split the flatbread with a friend and gotten a small soup and been more than satisfied. I have noted that it is important to check utensils and tables here for crud and food particles.  It is a valiant effort they make to stay green, but sometimes the cleanliness of said items suffers.
Loved this place!  I was initially intrigued by the concept and a bit wary about the food, but it... Read more 
Casual modern cafe style. Everything here was delicious, healthy, and so fresh. I've never had such good simple kale salad before as a side, and fish tacos were good. I think this place tastes so good mainly because the ingredients are high quality and it's cooked much lighter than typical restaurant food.
How fun! Came here on a Sunday night with a friend, and it felt like we were dining in Santa Monica rather than Palo Alto. The decor is trendy, modern and fresh, and the restaurant is bigger than we expected. My friend and I went with the mushroom and goat cheese flat bread to start, and then we each ordered the unfried chicken and a cucumber mint spritzer. We wandered around and found a nice little orange booth and chatted comfortably while we waited for our food to come via GPS tracker. The flat bread was good, but the vinaigrette was a bit too sweet. The result? We like the concept of the dish, but we'd rather try making it ourselves next time. Inspiring, at least! But YAY! The Unfried Chicken was delisssshh! Super moist and flavorful. I wasn't a huge fan of the veggie side (brussels sprouts and butternut squash), so maybe next time I'll try to sub for a diff veggie. Overall, though, I really liked this dish. Unfortunately, the cucumber spritzers were not our faves. They were chunkier/pulpier than expected, and there wasn't enough mint. I definitely wouldn't recommend. Ick... We also discussed the frivolity of the GPS trackers: I feel that they made the experience feel less personal, and my friend lamented that the resources taken to produce the trackers could have been better spent elsewhere -- for a restaurant concerned with health, eco-friendly concepts should be a top priority. Overall, the GPS trackers  were an interesting concept, but very gimmicky. Hey, at least they resulted in our food being brought to us! I'll definitely be back! Maybe even for lunch to enjoy that sunny patio!
I had Lyfe Kitchen for the first time today. Excellent food and the staff was very friendly. Definitely a healthy and good choice which is a hard find these days. My only criticism of the place is the small quantity of food which doesn't correlate to pe dish price. Still, no doubt I'll be back. I'll likely just have to order double next time.
This place is healthy, tasty, and everything I've ordered on the menu has been delicious.  Anything with their cashew cream sauce is SO good.  The unfried chicken with brussel sprouts and cashew cream has been my favorite (who knew you could make brussel sprouts taste so good?!) the restaurant is like a fancy cafeteria, very laid back and perfect for lunch. the portions are perfect and you leave feeling full, but not stuffed. if you get their sweet potato fries, don't expect them to be crispy, because they don't flash fry them so they come out soft.  all in all a very nice lunch spot with perfect salads and entrees.  i come here AT LEAST once a week.
The first time I was disappointed, the second time, even more so. Why? Because LYFE, as a supposed prototype of healthy fast food restaurants, tells me that healthy eating means spending more and feeling hungry. The fish tacos were mediocre. The fish (barramundi) dish was a boiled fish in a broth that seemed like it came out of can. Boring. The flatbread came out tasting artificial. For a better AND healthy meal, try Sprout around the block, and skip LYFE.
5 stars for conflict resolution. Our order got really messed up-- they brought the wrong food twice to our table and we had to wait a while, even though we showed them our receipt and said the order was wrong the first time. Then the manager swooped in and apologized really sincerely and gave us gift cards, essentially working out to a FULLY comped meal plus dessert. The most you get elsewhere is a noncommittal verbal apology. Food is very nice and healthy-seeming.
Sacrebleu! Former McDonald's execs jumped on the healthy-eating bandwagon?! I thought I've seen it all in the Bay, but this is definitely a refreshing take on the whole "let's get rich off of making people fat" business scheme. On a side note, however, I do appreciate the fact that there are more eating establishments that push for this gluten-free, all-natural, vegan/vegetarian friendly places - and I find their choice in locale to be perfect (downtown PA, what up?!). I should also make note on the decor: very pristine, and inviting. It makes you want to take a seat at a table by the window and sip organic tea while coding on your Macbook Pro as the kitchen prepares your fresh meal. They grow some herbs inside the restaurant too like basil, and thyme that are located on the 'wall' acting as a separation between cash register and dining area. What I appreciate most is that they provide a menu for vegans, and it makes it that much easier to skim through their varied menu items instead of staring up for five minutes with my mouth half open and my eyes glossed over while I stammer out "Can I get uuuuuuhhh..." all whilst decoding which are actually ok for me to eat. I recommend trying out these savory yet low calorie/fat & less heart-attack inducing delicacies: - Tal's ancient grain bowl [main dish] - ($12) - has quinoa, gardein 'meat' w/ sweet and spicy ginger sauce. - gardein burger - ($8) - has 'daiya' cheese, basically a classic burger sans cruelty. - grilled vegetable sandwich ($8) - i think the real zinger here is cucumber and edamame hummus /drools - pineapple-coconut lime 'cooler' ($3) is pretty savory too, so I definitely recommend that with a salad (try roasted beets & farro w/ agave lime tofu - $8 + $2) I doubt anyone will feel left out when eating here because they do cater to children's taste buds as well with basic items like "chick'n" nuggets and sweet potato fries. Don't forget to check out their organic wine listing as well - LYFE has a varied amount from sauvignon blanc, zinfandel, to voignier.
unfried chicken burger and salad better than othere visits have opne more time to finish judgement. Fav was the spring pea flatbread
Been twice and ok and had one item good otherwise does not make me wamt to say LYFE I want some Read more 
I visited LYFE yesterday for lunch; ordered the barramundi and sweet potato fries. The food won't keep you full until dinner time and the flavors won't blow you away, but it's nice to know how healthy it is..  This place is not cheap though, so be inspired and attempt to recreate the dishes at home ;) I tasted a piece of my friend's BBQ chicken flatbread and decided to snatch a bottle of their BBQ sauce, which is made with agave syrup, for $6.
Overall: Good food, bad service.  I've loved everything I've ordered at Lyfe Kitchen.  My favorites: beets & farro salad, grilled veggie sandwich and the peas & carrots risotto -- all three are fresh, and extremely flavorful. I also appreciate the reasonable portions (they serve the amount of food a human being should actually consume for lunch, rather than the insanely large portions that most restaurants give you).  I also like that they make changes to the menu to incorporate seasonal ingredients.  I do, however feel its a tad over priced, but I suppose that's to be expected at a hip, trendy (obnoxiously so), organic, health-food restaurant in Palo Alto.  In my opinion, when you add chicken to your salad for $2 extra, you should get more than about 4 TINY bites of chicken. The quality of service is unfortunate.  The employees are nice, but it feels like the place is being run by someone who has no clue how to operate a restaurant.  If they brought in a really smart, savvy manager they could probably whip the place into shape quickly.  The low point was when I sat waiting for my to-go order for over 15 minutes. When I flagged down someone to ask (for a second of third time), they realized that it has been sitting right on the counter for the past 10+ minutes -- which means wasted time and cold/soggy food. All in all, the food is tasty enough for me to keep coming back despite the long lines (I will only go before of after the lunch rush), and spotty service.
Super friendly staff, good food, great atmosphere - just wish they would have more vegan, gluten free options. The tofu tacos were not that good, but the vegan pizza was delicious.
Great food. Service from outer space. The food is terrific. It's nice to eat at a place that's reasonably priced where you don't feel awful afterwards from being too full. HOWEVER the system they have in place to serve the customers is horrendous. The servers are wonderful, nice people. It's the system that stinks. I got my dish nearly 15 minutes after the other two people I was dining with got their dishes. We had to talk to four different people to finally get the good to the table. Then, to make it up to us, they wanted to give us free dessert. I didn't really feel like it, but the really nice server insisted, so I got the lemon cake thingy. I waited around for almost ten more minutes and finally decided I'd had enough of LYFE for the evening. I'm not really planning to go there until I hear they've made some changes. Life is just to short to waste dining at LYFE.
In lieu of probably sounding a little crazy, I ate at LYFE Kitchen three times this week- once for dinner, once for lunch and once for breakfast (all different days, I swear!). I just happened to be in Palo Alto a lot this week (it's atypical) and there were a lot of things on the menu that I wanted to try. The restaurant is super casual; you order from a counter and then servers bring your food. I first went to LYFE Kitchen with my friend Anne for dinner and I was starving out of my mind. I decided to order the unfried chicken, which was served on top of a bed of brussel sprouts, squash and cranberries. The chicken is breaded and comes with a sauce made from cashews. Anne ordered the mahi fish tacos and we split a BBQ chicken flatbread. While my chicken was cooked well (not dry) and the breading was crispy, it definitely lacked flavor. The sauce didn't help the flavor situation and I actually ended up asking for hot sauce to jazz it up. The vegetables were delicious and they are also available as a side order. As part of the "healthy" offerings, LYFE's food is lower in sodium. I think that's the explanation as to why the chicken was lacking flavor. I enjoyed Anne's fish tacos a lot more. Served on corn tortillas with slaw and avocado, the fish tacos tasted light and fresh and the lime wedges were the perfect acidic complement. I LOVED the BBQ chicken flatbread. LYFE has three flatbreads and they're made on whole wheat crusts with flaxseed. The flatbreads are thin and super crispy (even when they cooled down). I totally want to try out their other flatbreads (there's a goat cheese and mushroom one and a margherita one). After eating all this food, I was still hungry. The portions at LYFE aren't huge and I think I wasn't feeling as satisfied because the food isn't actually that heavy. Side note: I should mention that I eat a lot in general. I can outeat my former six foot two and six foot four male co-workers. Many of my old co-workers think I have a tapeworm in my stomach. If you are a normal person, their portions may not seem that small. I was contemplating ordering more food, but I was also lazy and didn't feel like waiting in line again. To my very happy surprise, one of the servers asked if we wanted dessert and told us that he could place an order with their automated system! We could even swipe and pay with credit card right away. I ordered a bowl of the corn chowder and Anne ordered the chocolate lava cake. The corn chowder was my second favorite thing that I ate that day. It's not very thick or creamy because it's made from cashew cream. There were small pieces of potatoes in the soup, which made it feel heartier. Anne liked her chocolate cake, but I was not a fan. How delicious can a "healthier" chocolate cake really taste? I'm guessing there was no butter in it, so it was really light and fluffy. I thought it lacked flavor. Go across the street to Fraiche Yogurt if you're still jonesing for some dessert after your meal. I went back to LYFE the next day for lunch and ordered the baked sweet potato fries, Gardein chicken sandwich and cucumber-mint cooler. The cucumber mint cooler was refreshing and not sweet, which I liked. The sweet potato fries came with homemade ketchup made with agave syrup. While not very crispy (because they're baked not fried), I still found the fries to be tasty and they totally fulfilled my craving. The ketchup tastes like sweeter marinara sauce and doesn't taste like your normal Heinz ketchup. I was SO impressed with the Gardein chicken sandwich. It's fake chicken made from plant-based foods and LYFE advertised that is had the same authentic taste and consistency as real meat. I was VERY skeptical and completely blown away by how it really did taste like real chicken. It seriously had the same consistency of meat. I've never seen a veggie product like it before! The sandwich was served on warm multigrain bread and came with slaw, sweet pickles, tomatoes and lettuce. It was delicious and fresh (albeit a little small) and I loved the crunch of the fresh vegetables and slaw. A couple days later, I had breakfast at LYFE and tried their whole wheat buttermilk pancakes and strawberry-banana smoothie. I was not a fan of the smoothie. I couldn't taste any banana and the smoothie is made with grape juice. The grape juice overpowered the taste of everything else in my smoothie. Don't order it. In terms of taste, the pancakes tasted pretty good and similar to normal pancakes, but the consistency was really off. They weren't light and fluffy at all, but doughy and really chewy (almost like the batter wasn't cooked all the way). I probably won't be ordering those again. The guy next to me ordered the breakfast sandwich and that looked really promising. TONS of photos on my blog: http://rbjello.wordpress...
This as as Palo Alto-y as it gets. Everything is relatively healthy, and you know exactly how many calories and mgs of sodium you're ingesting. Because all the Silicon Valley power brokers need to have absolute control of their lives. Plus, the decor and vibe are super trendy, and the pricing isn't cheap (but not that expensive either). It's like the perfect mix for a full restaurant in downtown Palo Alto. Even though I deride Lyfe Kitchen, I'm also a yuppie at heart. And the food is really good! Some recommendations: - Fake crispy chicken sandwich. On toasted flatbread. With various slaws and aiolis on top. Super yummy, and one of the cheaper options. - Cucumber and mint mixer or whatever it's called. Very tasty, and under 50 calories. - Corn soup. Creamy and delicious. On the less healthy side. - Brussels sprouts and squash side. SUPER DELICIOUS. Interesting flavor combos. - The pound cake with berries is very yummy. Erm... if you eat a meal at Lyfe Kitchen like I do, it becomes less healthy. But grab a tropical berry tea and just try to feel OK with it. You won't regret a meal there.
Unimpressed.  A friend suggested trying this place out for dinner, and no one really had reason to object. AMBIANCE: Going for the laidback vibe (couches, big modern squashy cushion  seats, high tables/chairs, herbs on every table, etc), but felt a bit pretentious to me (Love Your Food Everyday?!  Really?!).  Maybe if you emptied out the space of all the patrons it would feel different... Crowd mostly yuppie health nuts (so it seemed)-- people with lots of money to spend, and wannabe hipsters (probably also have money to spend). SERVICE: Friendly.  Even though its a order at the register kind of place, with minimal service in between ordering and receiving food at your table, I felt like the staff did a pretty good job.  Except for the one person who was way too eager to clear plates. FOOD: - Art's Unfried Chicken ($12):  After reading so many positive reviews, I had to try this.  True, the chicken is quite crispy, but I felt like the "healthy" aspect = zero flavor.  The chicken itself was dry, and since it was so bland, it ended up being cardboard-esque.  Even the little bit of dijon mustard they spread on the plate did little to rescue the entree.  I also wasn't impressed with the brussel sprouts, but maybe my expectations were set too high by all the rave reviews.  Presentation was sloppy-- the cashew cream was sloshed all over the plate edges.  PS - portion size seemed a bit meager for the price. - Chicken and Pineapple Sandwich ($8): Served on LYFE's signature 7-seed grain bread, this sandwich had potential.  FYI the bread is WEIRD.  The best way to describe it is that it had no life.  Most breads are springy due to rise caused by yeast.  This bread was flat, dull and was basically akin to sandwiching the interior between two corkboards.  The entire presentation was sloppy/ugly-- the avocado spread was an oxidized black (ew, not fresh!), and the salad on the side was very haphazardly placed on the dish.  Way more flavorful (pineapple and onion) than the unfried chicken, but that's not saying a whole lot. OVERALL:  I like the concept-- healthy food for a healthy lifestyle, but does that really mean eliminating flavor?  Prices are also on the high side (IMO), but expected, given that its DTPA.  I have no desire to return for a repeat performance, and won't recommend LYFE to friends.
Decent food, but as a concept for a restaurant chain, it needs work.  Their idea of healthy is smaller portion sizes and high prices.  Yes, it will probably incent me to eat less, but why would you go to a restaurant knowing that you are going to leave unsated?    I could stay at home and gnaw on  a celery stick and probably feel better about it. We went at lunch with the whole family and had a very large selection of the dishes--burger, salmon, pasta, salads, soups.  Nothing was bad, per se, but everything was just a little bit off.  Take for example, the salmon; the sauteed greens served with the salmon were unidentifiable, a little bitter.  It would have complemented the salmon well but for the overgenerous mix of dried cranberries.  And the salmon portion was so small, my nephew, who is only 8 years old, had to order a second plate of it.  Since it's one of the pricier things on the menu (12 bucks or so), it's a pricey lunch for a child.    Burger was strangely dessicated; guess that's what happens when you take all the fat out. Nice space and well put together; it's evident from the location and finish that they are putting a lot of money into this place.    But during a busy lunch time, it took an inordinate amount of time to get served.  Don't think of this as a place for quick bite, at least not  how they are operating yet.   . All in all, I'd stick with the Creamery next door.  You might not live 'til you're 90 but you're sure not going to to enjoy your Lyfe more.
Love the concept, the brand, and the theme. Food was above average- but not as special as i would have hoped. Full three course meal review follows... First course: vegan corn chowder - tasty, nice texture, right temperature, lacked a bit of spice but a little pepper fixed that right up, by far my favorite item of the evening. (9/10) Shared sampler: margherita flatbread. Nothing special... Looked nice but was cold by the time it arrived and there was far too much tomato on it. The crust was extremely thin - which is ok- but also it was dried to a cracker crisp. I won't be picking this item next time. (5/10) Second course: unfried chicken. Its a nice big piece of light meat breaded and placed in the oven for a bit - served over a bit of spicy dijon and brussel sprouts with baked potato bits. The combination was delightful -- the breaded chicken couples with the mustard extremely well and the brussel sprouts gave some variety to this protein heavy dish. (8/10) Dessert: cheesecake (non-dairy). Came out looking mushy, lumpy and tasted just the same. It was topped with a rum sauce which just added too much sugar and overpowered the flavor of the actual cheesecake. (4/10) Hot drink: topped off with a hot latte which i would rate on par with a soy latte from peets. (8/10) I will definitely give this place another try - mostly because I want to see more businesses like this changing our perception of food.
`I love the decor, the service, and I've never eaten a bad bite here!  I love to bring my kids.  They order whatever they want, and I feel good about it!
The corn chowder here is phenomenal. I would come again just to get that. I also ordered the cranberry-pomegranate cooler and fish tacos. They were both pretty good, though not memorable like the chowder. In particular, I remember wishing the fish had more flavor. Ambience is natural and sleek.
Hip & healthy. Great food and very creative. Awesome place for vegetarians or vegans. Excellent service.
I recently revisited LYFE, and had a completely different experience then the first time I went.  The servers were attentive and helpful and the people at the register were more then competent. It seems they changed the menu up a little bit, everything was amazing and tasted great.  I love the Brussels sprout and squash dish...SO GOOD.  I love the price points of all the sides, such delicious veggies at good prices.  Also a wonderful choice, when I am not "meal hungry" I hope to come back in the AM and try out the vegan breakfast options.
I was so excited to try Lyfe, but was vastly disappointed, mostly because of the service, not the... Read more 
The food here is excellent, and the staff are friendly and helpful.  Prices are reasonable for the quality of the food.  However, as we found the other night, this is NOT the place to come for a sit-down dinner, especially if you're not sure whether you will have room for dessert and if someone else is joining your party later.  The issue here is the protocol around ordering and payment. Despite the upscale nature of the menu, the setup is like a pizzeria or Armadillo Willy's, where you walk up to the cashier, place your order, pay for it and then take an electronic gadget to your table.  You have to set your own place, so it's cafeteria style.  Another problem, if you put a tip on the credit card at time of payment, is that they're not set up to give you a copy of the slip you sign, so if you want a record of how much you tipped you have to make a note of it yourself on the slip they hand you, which has ONLY the total for the food you ordered. It's a drag to interrupt your dinner in order to stand in line in front of the cashier for a second time to specify and pay for your dessert.  For a sit-down dinner with table service, go elsewhere.  This would probably be a fine place for breakfast or lunch, when you want to get in and out fast but want something healthier than Denny's Grand Slam or a double-double with onions.
Lyfe is the perfect place for healthy food.  If you want cheap / fast food, go to KFC or Taco Bell.  In Palo Alto, it's comparable to Sprouts or Calafia.  We alternate a lot between those three.
This place has a very cool looking atmosphere. It seems almost futuristic in a way and I really like the design choices by having herb pots and food quotes on the wall. It's a good alternative to Sprouts if you're feeling healthy. The prices are also very very good. The problem I had was the service was kind of meh and the food just isn't outstanding. Everything I've had/tasted was just okay. I don't mind coming here for lunch if I'm feeling healthy. They do have pretty good drinks... The strawberry lemonade is my favorite. Pro-tip: This place gets PACKED for lunch at 12pm so if you want to go here, try 11:45 or 12:45pm.
I came back the second time and this place has gotten busy!  Their wait staff on Sunday night seemed overwhelmed.  I tried a new dish which - I agree with another reviewer- I didn't like.  The Shrimp risotto - the shrimp were excellent grilled.  But the risotto was sour/sweet/creamy.  Not a good combination. Flat breads were yummy, as was the salmon.
As good as it gets in Palo Alto!  Outdoor seating, yummy food, great smoothies - try the Mango or... Read more 
This place is mediocre at best. I really liked the vibe there and what they were trying to do, but the food wasnt so great. I ordered a bowl of Thai soup and it was absolutely terrible. I sent it back and they were nice enough to exchange if for the corn chowder which was better, but still not that great. I did try a side of brussel sprouts and sweet potatoes which was very good.
Why oh why do all these uber-cool/hipster organic sustainable restaurants have to serve such bad food?. It is as if there was no money left after paying all the designers and marketing teams. I'll start by saying that the type of food they advertise is the type of food we love and eat at home. So its NOT that we are not used to healthy food. My husband ordered the LYFE 100% grassfed hamburger and I got a soba noddle soup (usually one of my favorite dishes). The lettuce in the hamburger was warmer than the hamburger - the thing was cold! and it did not taste like high quality beef. One of the worst hamburgers we had in the Bay area. They killed the soup too. So disappointed. We'll just keep dreaming and hoping for a good tasting healthy food restaurant. Sadly.
When i first read about this restaurant several months ago, i was really excited. As someone who eats healthy most of the time i LOVED the idea of a restaurant offering low-cal, healthy meals. Unfortunately, their execution was not as amazing as their potential. I realize for alot of people, this will be the healthiest  meal they eat all week. Almost all the dinners i make at home are under 600 calories, so I know it's possible to make healthy flavorful food. I wanted LYFE"s food to be better than what i can make. It fell very short of this. My husband had the burger, and had to send it back because it was the consistency of a hockey puck. I know the meat is very lean, but we make bison burgers at home that are juicy and delicious. The sweet potato fries were also disappointing. They were really mushy, and I do know it's hard to get them crispy through baking, but it can be done. I had the fish tacos, and also had to send them back. I waited a VERY long time to get them, and they were still wrong. Several members of the staff kept coming to our table, and I told each of them we were still waiting for my tacos, and somehow they still didn't show up for 45 minutes. They were fine, but once again, not any better than what i can make at home. The one standout was the flatbread. That's something I'll never make, (i don't think home ovens get hot enough for a good crust.) It was flavorful, cooked well, and very low-cal. I would come back for this. Several staff members apologized, and tried to send us more food, and eventually comped our meal and gave us gift cards for a return visit. We were there the first week they were open, so i definitely cut them alot of slack for that reason. I hope in time they can iron out the service issues, and offer better food.
I used be in one of the floors above this restaurant and it was interesting to see just how fast the construction was. They blew out the whole facade of the building and was up in a hurry. Taking over what was Brite Smile and was interested in seeing what Art Smith's venture into Palo Alto was. We went for opening night dinner and the place was pretty raging. The layout is interesting, the room zig zags with seating, communal table, and some patio. There seems to be a odd placement of registers and someone at the podium was using an ipad to take orders too. After perusing the menu I ended with the unfried chicken, sweet potato fries, and the pound cake. They give you these tech toys that give the servers your location. I think there is something on the bottom of the tables that interacts with the device to give off your position. Pretty cool So even though it was a 600 or less calories per serving concept I still managed to get 1800 or so out of a meal. But Im not exactly calorie conscious. The weird things that happened was my unfried chicken was mia for a good while. I finished my fries, then most of my pound cake. My friend proceeded to finish his meal. Then my chicken showed up. I heard a lot of apologies and it was understandable for first night open. They were nice enough to give me a comp voucher for the next time I visit. The verdict? I like the message, the food does taste food for what it is intended to be. Do I miss the fat and salinity of things that could heighten the flavors. Maybe just a little bit. However I left satisfied. After talking to one of the managers I asked about training, and he indicated a few days of practice and that there were roughly 55 staff on site for this opening night. That's a lot of bodies. My friend has since been back for a to go order and said they left out one of his sides. Sounds like they still have some kinks to work out. However since I have this voucher and the fact that I want to try the burger, Ill be back to give them another whirl
This place so far is a hit or miss. We came in on a random weekend for a late lunch. First off, I really like the concept and the pricing is good for trying to encourage patrons to eat healthy. Secondly, the management seems to be very involved in getting customer feedback. Hubs ordered the Eggplant Parmesan which was a miss. The eggplant was soggy, spongy and overall pretty tasteless. I ordered the grilled chicken roasted mushroom pasta. I'm happy to see that they've updated the menu to reflect that it contains cheese since when I ordered, it didn't list that and I don't like my pasta covered in cheese. The manager was quick to rectify and send the dish back to the kitchen to get me a new dish. The downside was that by the time it came out, my husband had finished his meagerly portioned eggplant. We were comped a free drink but the kitchen still has issues to iron out. I don't know if I'd come here for dinner since the portions were on the smaller side but it's a great healthy option for lunch!
First of all... I must give a BIG thumbs UP to the decour of the place. When you walk in, you already know that you're entering a health/organics-conscious establishment, by the simple colour-scheme used around the place.. in addition to the amazing herbs wall that is set up in the middle of the restaurant. I wish I had one of those in my house! Anyhow~ I also am glad that the calories/salt-intake are listed by each item on the menu..  which is something that I've always been conscious of, but especially with the latest studies and policies about to be implemented ( http://www.reuters.com/a... ), modern people need to be more responsible for what they actually eat. And it's nice that this place allows you to do just that. I tried the Tal's Ancient Grain Bowl, which.. was definitely hearty/grainy, which is what I love! There was also some interesting chewy, sausage-looking thing (that was vegetarian, but wasn't tempeh or tofu?) that was pretty good. My friends had the BBQ chicken flatbread and Mushroom/GoatCheese flatbread, which were good, but a bit on the small side - I think they expected the flatbreads to be more like meal-proportions? All in all... reading some of the other reviews, here, I have to agree that the flavoring isn't THAT impressive, here. I want to sympathize with the place and say that it's difficult to have amazingly delicious HEALTHY food.. but I  *have* had amazingly delicious health food before. So, I think that this place just gives a good try, but.. they still have a way's to go in order to convince organic/healthy-apathetic people to actually eat here.
I think the best concept for LYFE kitchen is the fact that all of their menu items (which are clearly labeled) are ALL UNDER  600 CALORIES. So patrons can walk away knowing a very good estimate of how many calories they have gobbled up. Neat. I ordered the "Art's Unfried Chicken Breast" with roasted winter squash, brussels sprouts, dried cranberries, and dijon vinaigrette. This dish was really tasty, and I couldn't believe that the entire entree was 400 calories/ 584 mg of sodium. The brussels sprouts + winter squash were the perfect complement to a surprisingly hefty slice of chicken. I would have liked a little more dijon vinaigrette, but could see how limiting the sauce would be the most effective way to keep calories low. The boy ordered the free-range grilled chicken & roasted mushroom pasta. The multigrain penne pasta was a healthy option, and although the creamless sherry sauce (made from cashew cream) may SOUND delicious and unique, the sauce just sort of fell flat. It is difficult to beat real alfredo cream sauce. The grilled lemon on the side was a nice touch, and is nice in brightening the dish. But at 572 cal788 mg sodium, I think the chicken was the better tastier option. Things that I didn't really enjoy were their pseudo healthy drink options: pineapple-coconut-lime was $4, at 124 cal37 mg sodium. To me, a total waste of money and calories. This was diluted beyond belief. Might as well skip the calories and stick with ice water. I think a better option would be to offer fresh juices (carrot, apple, orange, grapefruit, etc...) Also, is the GPS mechanism necessary? The restaurant isn't all that big. There aren't that many tables. Is this just a ploy to lure techie Palo Altoans in? Maybe so. I think if LYFE kitchen nixed the unnecessary fluff, lowered prices just a smidgen, offered honest fresh juices in place of watery overpriced options, they would gain more lyfers.
I wish I lived within walking distance because I'd be eating here every day. The food is different than other restaurants. For starters it may seem less flavorful if you're used to eating at big restaurants chains where each dish contains over 1500 calories and 2000 mg of sodium. But for those who have already reduced their salt intake the flavors of real food shine through. I'm vegetarian so I've only ordered the Gardein (faux meat) products. I love the Gardein Crispy Chicken Sandwich ($7.99 with side salad). The Chicken looks, feels like, and tastes like real a fried chicken patty with a nice cabbage and carrot slaw, pickles and toamtoes and a tangy garlic aioli in the sandwich. It's a winner. Also LOVE the Brussels Sprout and Squash with cranberries side dish ($2.49). Tried the Lemon Pound Cake with fresh fruit on my first visit and it was fantastic! Portion sizes are smaller (like old fashioned, normal, healthy sized, don't go here looking for super-sized) than your typical American restaurant chain. The prices are extremely reasonable. Will post pictures of all three dishes.
I cannot say enough good things about this restaurant. Had read about the concept, saw a special on it and went to try it out. The portions are not "small"  but are HEALTHY. There is no white flour used, healthy options, very reasonable prices (nothing is over $15), staff is friendly and parking is easy. Food does not "taste healthy" but tastes delicious! Have gone back 3 times. LOVE IT!
Good concept and healthier option for eating out. The website's a bit convoluted and the menu has a lot of options which can be overwhelming especially when you're trying to get a feel for all the offerings. The Art's Unfried Chicken was the winning entree in our group. For chicken breast, this was one tender and juicy piece! Unfortunately Tal's Ancient Grain Bowl that I had been looking forward to disappointed. The actual dish seemed deflated compared to pictures and I don't mind gluten or seitan, but their version of faux meat--the gardein couldn't win in my book. Good sides: corn chowder (surprisingly creamy and rich for it's 160ish calories!), baked sweet potato fries. Agree with Carol L, very attentive although at times excessive and felt even a little creepy. I wouldn't crave this place but fun to go with a small group and sample a ton of stuff. Their salads looked amazing.
Food: 4-Stars Service: 4-Stars Ambiance: 3.5-Stars Presentation: 4-Stars Worth the Money:  4-Stars Overall Evaluation:  4-Stars Items Tasted: a) Roasted Beets and Farro Salad b) Fish Tacos c) Sweet Potato Fries d) Cucumber Cooler Quality of Food: * * * * LK serves high quality produce, meats, and herbs in every dish.  All ingredients tasted fresh and were absolutely delicious.  The salads were medium in size and had a plethora of herbs and yummy accouterments.  Fish Tacos came as a pair of large double wrapped crowd pleasers and a side salad.  The succulent fish was lightly seasoned, cooked to excellence, and served over a bed of dressed vegetable shavings.  Yummy and satisfying.  Sweet potatoes were... sweet potatoes.  Not much you can do there.  The cucumber cooler was not sweet, thirst quenching, and expensive.  I loved the pressed mint. Quality of Service: * * * * The quality of service was excellent; however, LK is still young and needs a bit more time to prove they can earn the 5th star. Ambiance: * * * - The build out is pleasant and bestows a healthy feel upon patrons.  I was fortunate to visit on day 3 when the place was practically empty...  It's an attractive place to have a meal but the ambiance is struggling as the crowds converge on this highly publicized establishment.  That said, I'd rather the business do well than maintain the empty ambiance. Presentation of Food: * * * * The food is presented well.  LK takes advantage of the colorful ingredients and mixes them, ready to eat.  I dislike venues that keep the ingredients segregated for presentation purposes.  LK knows I want to eat, not work...  I hate mixing my own salad.  Note: the pizza is small and is seemingly made for presentation purposes only. Worth the Money: * * * * For a healthy tasty option, the prices are reasonable... except the beverages (especially the coolers). Overview: * * * * For all the aforementioned reasons, I will be visiting LYFE often.  I look forward to trying more items on the menu and reporting follow up feedback.
You'd think that with all the press on the "culinary all-star executives" behind LYFE, they'd know something about running a restaurant/there'd be some level of professionalism/continuity but clearly that ain't the case here. Three examples but believe me, there were many more I could give on the lack of efficient processes: 1.) You order at the counter and are given multiple receipts and a GPS so the servers can locate you with your food. Various servers then come around trying to match your receipts at the table with your food, repeating the efforts of the last person who came to your table and did the same thing. 2. ) When you place your order, you'll notice that the items on the menu board are not the same as the online menu (which also has misspellings) nor that of the paper menu you'll be handed when you walk through the door. The cashier also had no idea if the soup I ordered which was marked "V: was already vegan or I had to request that it  be made vegan and stared at me like I was from outer space when I asked. 3.) The entrees and appetizers all came at once. Very damned annoying when this happens. On to the soup which is all I had. It was a miniscule Petri dish-sized portion of soup for almost $5 w/ tax. Fairly tasty but the two people I came with ordered a sandwich and an entree and an appetizer (tiny schmear of hummus) and were still hungry.This is clearly how they keep things under 600 calories- tiny portions.  Overall, a clusterf*ck  very clearly marketed  to PA yuppies.
I enjoyed my meal here of unfried chicken and a lemonade. The flavors were simple, fresh tasting, and of course, healthy. There was a wide array of people in the place from students, older people, families with kids, seniors, etc. The place was hopping and packed for a weekday night. I would come back to try other items on the menu but I couldn't come all the time. My meal was about $18, a tad bit steep to go often. But I support their belief and enjoyed my healthy, flavorful meal.
This place is terrific! I see some people rated the portions as small and a bit pricey, and they can be, but for those who care about eating healthy, it's hard to beat Lyfe. The decor is also beautiful with nice places to sit indoor and outdoor. I plan to use it as a second office. The staff is also very friendly. Any inefficiencies from the recent opening should get worked out over time. Definitely worth trying! Great job, Lyfe.
Definitely a great choice. LYFE may get five stars, pending my return visit next time. Everything is amazingly healthy without "tasting" healthy. The food was delicious. The unfried chicken was fantastic. Tender meat, perfectly cooked vegetables, great seasoning. The veggies really shine here. Everything was fresh and high quality. Don't expect huge portions. You'll be able to finish your main entree without a doubt, but I did not leave hungry. The main entree prices are around $10-14+ depending on what you get. They're reasonable, but keep in mind you're also not getting gigantic portions (depending on what you care about when it comes to food and value). My friends had mixed reviews about the fish tacos. I've heard nothing but excellent reviews about the sandwiches and salads. Plenty of vegan and vegetarian options for those of you who need them. I love that i know exactly what I'm getting, because they lay out the nutritional facts and ingredients. Lovely ambiance overall. I love the vibe of the place, and the manager was wonderful and chatted with us. We had no problems with service. Its definitely a feel good restaurant, and I would definitely come back!!
A very pleasant surprise!  Lovely space - bright and airy.  We sat right by a tall window facing the street.  The tiny patio outside also looked inviting but there were only tables for 2 or 3 so our foursome sat inside. I had the delicious lemonade and the incredible barramundi.  The edamame and other veggies lent texture to the grilled silky fish and the broth was yummy.  Hubby less than happy with his burger but I will let him write his own review!!
i took up my friend's recommendation and tried this place for lunch.  whew, the line was way out the door and the restaurant was packed for lunch!  maybe b/c it was a beautiful, sunny day?  i was a bit surprised, but it made me hope for the best, hope that the food was good enough to warrant such a long wait and crowd. the staff came around with samples for those of us waiting in line, which was cool.  i sampled a piece of margherita flatbread, and it was pretty good.  the bread was more like a thin cracker, full of seeds and herbs, and it was topped with cheese, tomatoes, tomato sauce and basil.  very nice combo, like pizza, except much thinner crust and healthier. i decided to order the bbq chicken flatbread, partially b/c the calorie count was not too high (415 cal) and the price tag was nice, $7.99.  the flatbread was huge, i was quite happy with the size.  they cut it into smaller bite-size slivers, which was nice.  i thought all of the ingredients blended well together, the bbq chicken, corn, onions, cilantro, bbq sauce, and cheese.  it was very tasty, i just wish they put more chicken on the flatbread b/c i was craving more when i finished. the seating is what really won me over.  the interior had many seats that seemed more like a piece of someone's couch/sofa, which was a nice touch, and i was fortunate enough to snag one of these chairs; very comfy indeed!  there was a medium-sized outdoor seating area, which also had some of these nice sofa like seats. bathrooms were very clean, and i appreciate that they have eco-friendly hand dryers.  they also had paper towels, for those of us who didn't want to wait for the hand dryer. the food was yummy and i'll probably check it out again, maybe earlier or much later in the day to avoid the crowds.
Ok so I really like the idea of Lyfe, but the execution seemed off to me. I went at dinner time, felt rushed in the line to order(you order at the counter), they have you seat yourself. Which is no problem except I had to wait there looking for a table to become available. The food I had was pretty good for being vegan, but they messed up the order a few times. I think it's great that they serve healthy, vegan or free range, natural foods, but it's the the other part I didn't enjoy. Might go back when it's not so busy.
The decor is very contemporary and has good lighting . Now to the food : The sweet corn chowder was nice. It could have used some thing for acidity, to balance the flavor. The baked sweet potato fries had no seasoning . I don't recommend that. My friends had the fish taco and didn't enjoy it. They felt that the fish wasn't fresh . For dessert we had the chocolate volcano. That was passable. Service is good and friendly.
I have visited Lyfe over a dozen times since it's opening and my initial review still stands. It is a nice little place, great decor and the people are eager to please... but the food is lacking. Perhaps they need more time to work out the kinks with the recipes (sometimes things are great in the test kitchen, but just don't translate into production. My favorite dish is the Unfried Chicken. I recommend it. Good flavor and nice accompaniments (sweet potatoes and grilled brussel sprouts). Match with a nice black leaf tea and you are good to go. While I wouldn't recommend this place with all the other offerings in Palo Alto, if you find yourself tired of Sprout, give it a try. If you are with friends who are vegan, they may find this place more appealing than my fellow meat eaters. And for God's sake... please fix the little table GPS devices or just replace them with the fool proof flag with a number on it. Every time I have dined there, I am always offered food from another table because the system doesn't work.
NOTE: This is a review based on their soft open today. Take this review with a grain of salt as they... Read more 
My workplace often orders from here when our studio works late. Even catered, the food is tasty and fresh. The pasta uses a cashew cream sauce, which is an interesting substitute for dairy. Plus I love mushrooms so I particularly like the flavors in this dish.
I ordered a bunch to share with the fam - fish tacos, house salad, the mushroom and goat cheese flat bread, and the burger. Burger - The patty literally tasted like a patty. For around $10, the patty should taste like  a steak between two buns (think Burger Lounge in SD, for those who are familiar with SoCal), but it tasted like a well-made, flat patty. House Salad - The greens tasted tasteless and a bit plastic. My mother likes plastic greens, though, so that was fine for her... Fish Tacos - Rubios is better, for way less. Flat Bread - Too sweet. Terrible cooks use sweetness to mask their equally terrible cooking skills... b/c it's easier to make people eat things that are sweet. The interior decor is cute and it's a nice place to meet up for lunch with colleagues. I would definitely DINE IN rather than take-out... b/c take-out makes the eater consider the taste and quality of food. Dining in, however, makes the taste depend on the atmosphere of the restaurant (cute, natural lighting, greenery, great service). Oh - and great service! Super friendly and helpful staff :)
Eat there every day....LITERALLY . Not too many Vegan options in Palo Alto Mountain View Menlo Park, and when you eat out every meal (YES every meal) sh*t can get boring. Not so much at Lyfe. I have tried every vegan option on their menu and each is delish!! And their drinks are SOOPER refreshing...I usually order 2. Lyfe is making an effort to always improve and the staff and management are available for comments and suggestions. Im soooo hungry right now...see you there!!
Got the beet salad and fish w/ soba noodles (can't remember the name of the fish). Portions are good for lunch but would have needed more appetizers etc if dinner. Cucumber mint drink super refreshing. Outside patio seating. Good place to stop for a healthy lunch. I'd go back and try the other salads.
I went to get lunch with my friend and she suggested trying Palo Alto's newest restaurant... LYFE. The vibe is great in LYFE, it has delicious healthy food, and it's very reasonably priced. We loved the Napa cabbage salad the best, and were very happy with our other choices of the mushroom flatbread and a side of brussel sprouts. I can't wait to go back and try more things! I will definitely take family here to get lunch or a casual dinner. I might become a "LYFER"... P.S. this would be a great spot for an after work drink with appetizers :)
Low 4. Had the veggie bowl. Good variety of veggies. Would have been nice if it had been hot instead of just warm. Experience is a bit awkward. It wasn't obvious that you had to get your own flatware and napkins on your way to your table.
Super surprised at how highly people are rating this. I get it, this place has style- very pretty, fun menu, high tech gadgetry... But are you guys serious? We're here to eat right? And the food is mediocre, even for the fairly dismal Palo Alto scene. We had a burger, a mushroom goat cheese flat bread, and a beet and fennel salad. The burger was a very thin patty with a ton of vegetables on a multi grain bun. I love vegetables! That was the only good thing. The bad thing was that there was no sauce on the bun whatsoever. And the patty was a thin layer of dry, flavorless meat. Grass fed beef can't be really treated like normal beef. It's much more lean and can have a metallic flavor. This was mistreating that patty. Really this was a vegetable sandwich with a thin overcooked meat layer. It came with a side salad that was a mix of delicious dressed kale, and undressed lettuce. The lettuce was a disappointment too. My bun was just dry and too heavy. Overly sweet pickles too. My drink was a pineapple coconut drink that was basically ok although there was a TON of it, and it seemed a bit too sweet, maybe that was just the pineapple juice. There was a shriveled piece of cut lime that was yellow and brown around the edges. DISLIKE. Brendan's flatbread was more tasty. The mushrooms and the goat cheese were generous, and the flat bread, if lacking in a good texture, did not get in the way of the toppings. But the LYFE kitchen guys decided to put an overly sweet sauce balsamic sauce on top. I really hope they didn't reduce or add more sweetness to the balsamic, because honestly, balsamic vinegar is already sweet. Finally, the beet and fennel salad would have been delicious if it were actually beet and fennel with some greens. This was beet and fennel with a ton of those really sweet pickles! What's up with that? Put that on the menu or something so we know that we're going to get another sugar wallop! Flavor comes from a lot of things, but we really respond to sugar, salt, and fat. I feel like LYFE is on a low fat type of kick and to amp up the flavor they added a ton more sugar. As someone with a ton of diabetes in my family, I try to stay away from sugar. And here at LYFE they sneak it into everything. I say, add some more fat, subtract some sugar, and you'll improve the taste of everything. This isn't the 80s, y'all. Some fats are good.
They tried to charge $3.00 for substituting my breakfast burrito ($6.50) with egg whites. Wth? Furthermore, they don't serve brunch.  At 11:05am on a Sunday, I wasn't able to get pancakes, eggs, or the aforementioned breakfast burrito.  Sorry, but I don't feel like pizza or tacos that early in the morning.  It wouldn't kill them to offer brunch.  Most places around it do. The service is also quite spacey.  There were a ton of staff just standing around behind the counter, and there have been loads of other superfluous people other times I've been here as well.  Case in point: a greeter who stands a foot in front of the cashiers, to ostensibly explain how Lyfe works.  It works just like any other quick bite place, now get out of the way so I can read the menu! Furthermore, they have a high-tech widget they give you, which you are supposed to put at your table to help the server locate you.  However, the first time we came here, the server had no idea how to use it, and just wandered aimlessly looking for our table.  The second time, IIRC they didn't bother to give us the widget.
First time at LYFE, and after reading all of the press, I decided to check it out.  Didn't realize I'd be there during its first week :) I like the fast-casual feel.  You place your order and get your "placeholder", which you take to your table and wait for someone to bring you both your food and drink.  No worries over having to settle the bill afterwards. After reviewing the menu for a few minutes, decided on the edamame hummus with flatbread crisps as a "shareable" (had a friend with me)  and Art's Unfriend Chicken as my entree.  I did end up asking a staff person ahead of time what part of the chicken it was (wasn't in the description...it is a chicken breast).  Chose this over the fish tacos, which I plan to try during another visit. Both the appetizer and the entree came out at the same time.  Wasn't expecting that, and it kind of made me feel that i needed to hurry up so my entree wouldn't get cold.  So I ended up alternating between the two dishes. The hummus was delish, and the crisps were just that!  The unbaked chicken was crunchy yet moist.  It didn't taste baked, but had the juiciness of it.  The whole chicken breast sat atop a plethora of brussel sprouts, squash and cranberries.  Not a fan of sprouts in general, but the way they were prepared kept me going back for more.  I couldn't finish all of the veggies, but I tried. Passed on drinks and dessert this time around. Bonus of the dining experience was finding out that Chef Art Smith was sitting at the table next to us, entertaining guests as well as being polite to folks who recognized him and came to speak with him. My friend had Tal's ancient grain bowl.  She enjoyed it, but said it was a bit spicy. I plan on coming back again to try more items, and maybe come one morning to sample breakfast.
Just got back from lunch with a coworker. She went there last week and brought back food and it looked healthy so I decided to go with her today (which is also the Ribbon cutting day so it was pretty busy). The menu: Yes, there are a lot of choices. This was a surprise to me. I'm obsessed with beets so I quickly decided to have the beet salad. I knew I'd want more than a salad so I also ordered a side order of the sweet potatoes. For a total of about $14, including a tropical ice tea, it was a pretty good lunch deal. We wanted to sit outside but all the spots were already taken so we sat in the inside near the patio. The decor is fresh, clean and very California-esque. The food arrived in a timely manner - my co-worker's food did. Mine took a little bit longer - in fact, one of the servers asked if I was still waiting and I told them yes. So it appeared that they had forgotten about my order but in a few minutes my food arrived so it was not a biggie at all. What we grazed on today: Beet salad - yummy, although I picked out some of the dried cranberries - there were way too many for my liking, same for the mandarin oranges. Strawberry/goat cheese salad - it looked really yummy and fresh Edamame hummus - this was really tasty, nice texture. Only wish: more of it! Sweet potatoe fries - SUPER yummy, warm and crunchy on the outside. Only wish: much more of it! Drinks: Cucumber mint drink and the tropical ice tea. My coworker finished her drink and she loved it, so I'm going to assume it was really refreshing. My tropical ice tea was ok. Not too crazy, not sure I'd order it again. Overall - I'd give it 3.5 (not sure how to do a half star). I'd definitely go back - I mean, I'm so close to it! I'll probably update this review down the road.
Awesome. All I can say really. Totally my kind of venue. Know what you get and no entree more than 600 cal and is delish!  Finally a place where I feel free to order anything on the menu without guilt. Can't wait for them to open more locations.
I've now tried this restaurant 3 times. Occasional good moment but for the most part super bland- dont try to make unhealthy foods healthy, just make really great healthy food!
This brand new place has an interesting concept, but definitely something you'd expect to find in Palo Alto.  You go in and order when you're ready, find a table, and then they GPS you to deliver your food to you.  The staff is friendly enough but it sure seemed like there were an awful lot of them around...  Our food took a little longer than we would have liked.  It seemed like they were still working some things out. Everything is super fresh but I was a bit disappointed in the menu.  I am allergic to nuts and many of the dishes contained nuts. Fish tacos were great!  Get extra chipotle sauce and you won't regret it! ***We went back to give this place another try.  We were pleasantly surprised by the changes.  Their menu is more diverse and they've worked out all of their service kinks.  We will be visiting again!
I LOVE this place! I've been here almost everyday since last week! Great customer service, good food that doesn't make me feel yucky or guilty afterwards, sleek and sexy decor... they've got it all! I've tried the bbq chicken flatbread, chicken sandwich with roasted pinepple, fish tacos, roasted brussel sprouts/squash, and their coolers. All were tasty. Fresh produce. I'm not complaining about the portion size either - it's just right for me! I would advise not getting the soup for take out. I got my container, opened it up at the office and it was only half full? What...? Considering all things, it's a pretty affordable lunch option for downtown Paly. I'm definitely an LK groupie!
The prices are great, portions are okay, health factor gets extra stars! I ordered the bbq chicken flatbread which after I finished left me a little hungry but then I ate a few bites of my friends 'unfried' chicken and some of her veggies and I was full.  She couldn't finish her food.  If you like large portions this is NOT the place for you, but for people like me who usually take 1/2 of my food home as leftovers it was perfect. The flatbreads are pretty tasty as are their brussel sprouts.  I tasted my friend's corn chowder and liked it too.  Everything was tasty and different, nothing I think that would blow my socks off, but the health factor and price gives it four stars.  Not sure anything really that healthy would ever blow my socks off - as an FYI. I was a little overwhelmed by all the people who came to help us, we met the chef, the CEO of the place, and so many different staff people that it was a little crazy - granted the place had JUST opened (it was the first week). I also really liked the layout of the restaurant and its decor, reminds me of some restaurants in So Cal (like Veggie Grill and True Food Kitchen). Good for groups but you probably won't get all your food at the same time.
Health meets blandness in downtown Palo Alto.
Went today during their grand opening. I really wanted to be a Lyfer but it was hard. The service was good but overwhelming at times. Prior to receiving my meal I had three different people check to see if it had come out yet. Hopefully this gets ironed out as the restaurant gets up and running and the process becomes more fluid. The lemonade was great, some of the best I have drank. I will def. go back for more. For a meal I had the flatbread pizza with the Gardein chicken, sweet corn and a BBQ sauce. It was okay, nothing to call mom about. It was also well portioned so I don't feel like I am hungry, but not overstuffed either.  I did have a byte of the eggplant parmigiana which was good. They are trying to use technology in interesting ways by giving each person a GPS style sensor. Sadly one of the people at our table did not get her sensor activated so they had to come over, take it and fix it. But again this is probably first day kinks. In all it was ok, I probably will give it one more shot and order something else on the menu before I place it in my lunch rotation.  I could see this place being cool if there was an iPhone app where people could order, and once they walk into the store the app pushes the order to the chef and the food is then made and delivered.  This would almost certainly make me a lyfer.
The food was delicious, well presented, and we left feeling satisfied (just barely) and not stuffed. The place is large, with many different seating arrangements, including outdoor tables, indoor group tables with high chairs, small tables with comfortable, built in benches, and regular tables. Ordering at a counter and waiting for food to be delivered was fine -- it's more efficient, allows a faster turnover, and probably reduces ordering errors. The noise level was pretty high, even without the screaming infant who should have been walked out, or otherwise handled, instead of screaming for almost every bite the kid got. (The parents need parenting help and I hope they get it.) One big error here is the misplaced attention on calories. Calories aren't the problem, but refined carbohyrates!! Calories are "yesterday" and don't tell the tale. Lyfe offer wonderful roasted vegetables, and cabbage salads --- examples of complex carbohydrates. It's the bread, pasta, sugars, juices, and alcohol (and fake sweeteners) that challenge the body and pretty much add nothing (but short lived pleasure!! and that counts, yes). So they collude in a way with what remains of the cultural myth that calories mean nutrients, which they certainly don't, and that low calorie foods and beverages are good, which is not necessarily so. (Sugared beverages, while satisfying in their sweetness, are usually devoid of nutrients.) I could go on but I won't. Bottom line, have a good time and choose "real foods" and basically forget about the calories (unless you're gorging, which is yet another issue.)
Palo Alto has a treasure in the new and excellent Lyfe Restaurant; convenient, pleasant  decor, seating in and out of doors and remarkable balanced food that is healthy, well prepared,  and  delicious to fit all tastes including vegetarian and vegan. Ordering  is an easy one stop,  you find seat and take along a disc  so waiter can locate you to serve your choices . Menu includes range of breakfast choices, salads, flatbreads, tacos, salmon, grains, veggies and more, with specific information on each dish if you are calorie conscious;  plus an excellent drink selection is offered including wine and beer. Don't miss the healthy and delectable desserts.  There were three of us and we shared  the sweet potatoe fries, grilled artichokes, and humus plus our own dishes which we each enjoyed. Open vary on some days but open every day usually between 7 AM to 9:30 PM.
Today was my 3rd visit to the restaurant, and they've all been great.  This is very flavorful, very healthy food at reasonable price.  The architecture and ambiance are both outstanding.  You order at the counter, and they give you a transponder and use it's signal to bring your food. I've had the Gardein burger ($8), the fish tacos ($9) and the beets & farro salad ($8).  I would rate them all as top notch.  These are fair and healthy portions as well.  Both the tacos and the burger come with a small salad on the plate.  This isn't even listed on the menu, but it's a tasty and healthy addition (maybe kale?). I was there with my mom today, and we were approached at our table by Mike Roberts, the CEO.  He's a very affable fellow with tons of enthusiasm for the restaurant and the food.  He wanted us to try the Brussels sprouts & squash side, so he comped it.  It was fantastic, but I would've happily paid the $2.50.  Perfectly cooked and complimented by a delicious sauce & dried cranberries. I recommend it wholeheartedly, and I just hope they expand quickly into the South Bay where I live.  They'd be a perfect fit for Santana Row and downtown Los Gatos.
Cool catchy concept, but not worth the price, especially when the portions are tiny. I liked their ionizer water cleaner, how they laid out water for you to grab, friendly service, great atmosphere The food was good - had pizza takeout once and one time eat in, it's just that the portion are way to small to justify the price you pay.
3.5.  Not bad food.  Went on opening day.  Really like the concept, and getting people to eat healthy and green is great.  I just wish the portions were a little bigger.  I had the grilled barramundi, which is a kind of thin white fish.  Could have had 2 portions given the size.  The vegetable broth with mushrooms and napa was tasty yet low fat. The unfried chicken was pretty good, and definitely not greasy.  If I had to choose, I'd probably go with the chicken between the two. I guess this would be the kind of place that you could eat at everyday and not get fat.  If you're a college kid with the metabolism of the energizer bunny, you might need to order more than one item.  If you're watching your calories and fat intake, this is a great place to get decent healthy food for a moderate price.
This is a fun place to eat at and you don't have to worry about high unhealthy calories.  If you want the freedom and safety of knowing you are getting fresh,  low calorie food with anything you choose off of the menu this is probably for you.  The food isn't uniquely remarkable, given its location in the mecca of competitive surrounding culinary establishments,  but is very very good and fresh.  I ordered the un-fried chicken because it's the most popular dish here. I loved the brussel sprouts with sweet potato combination so much in this dish I've been making my own at least once at week for the family.  I also think this is place is fun, and has a high energy feel. The decor is of  clean and simple lines which all add to that feeling of simplicity.  The menu is simple..and not overwhelming. Everything is simple here.  ..so simple to order and easy to eat healthily.
Okay, I've now been back to LYFE twice - once for dinner and today for breakfast and it was awesome! They deserve the upgrade to 5 stars. I finally tried the eggplant parmesan and it was flavorful and filling. My Man had the hamburger with baked sweet potato fries and he was raving about it, I didn't get a bite. We both walked away very pleased with the experience. The food came out very fast. I would definitely recommend breakfast and dinner, it's a lot less crowded than lunch. The frittata that I had this morning was a fluffy, warm cloud of cheesy goodness. It's almost two in the afternoon and I'm still full. This is satisfying, healthful food. I will definitely be frequenting LYFE more often.
I had very high hopes for this place, maybe that's the problem, they just haven't lived up to it... Read more 
Definitely will be my takeout place of choice when I'm in the area. Everything tastes healthy, but not in a grainy dry way.  When I cook at home I try to eat like this, Lyfe just gets me out of the kitchen and makes it prettier with all the doodads! Tried: *Beef burger on multigrain bread *Grilled fish tacos *Tal's bowl *BBQ chicken flatbread *Margherita flatbread *Caesar salad *Chicken pasta I would order everything again, but I especially loved the tacos and the bowl. Prices are super reasonable.  All of the above for $65 w/o tip. I feel so light on my feet and not one sign of phelgm, yes greasy food coats your throat!  I'll be back for breakfast and after that, again and AGAIN.  I pray for a long life for LYFE!
First time at Lyfe today, at peak lunch time.  Service was fine- on par with anywhere else at lunch time.  We were in and out within an hour. The food was disappointing.  I got the chicken and pineapple sandwich and it was quite bland.  Maybe if they pounded the chicken breast so that it was thinner it would be better.  While the fixings were good, one bite tasted of pineapple, one bite tasted of mint, and most bites just tasted like bland chicken breast.  Moreover the side salad was virtually flavorless and much of the lettuce was wilted. One co-worker liked his BBQ chicken flatbread, and another liked her chowder, so we'll be back and I'll try something else... but I would agree with other reviewers that it's over-priced for the quality and serving size that you get.
I like the food and the concept, but the noise level keeps me from going there as much as I would like to.  I hope that they do something to dampen it.  It could be a nice place to go with friends.
My boyfriend and I just discovered this place about a month ago and we've been here 3 times since.  We LOVE it!  The food is great and surprisingly filling for how small the portions are.  The first time, I ordered the fish tacos and was full after the first taco.  The chicken sandwiches are delicious.  They are also very filling and don't make you feel "gross," like you do when you've had a particularly heavy meal.  I like how you can feel full, but not sickly full (that super stuffed feeling you get after say...Thanksgiving? or burgers and shakes?).
Love this place.  Everything I've ordered has been excellent - unfried chicken, beet farro salad, delightful cucumber mint cooler.  Plus, the folks there are friendly and kind.
Had a pleasant lunch here a few weeks ago.  The prices are pretty reasonable although the portions are a little small.  I think that is by design as we all know that the biggest problem we have when trying to eat healthy is that we eat too much! Anyway, I tried the PORTOBELLO MUSHROOM & GOAT CHEESE FLATBREAD.  Overall it was good but I did not like the pomegranate-balsamic sauce.  The other ingredients and the texture were great. The fish tacos and grilled artichokes were pretty good as well.  I enjoyed the meal but I imagine I will try some of the other items on their menu and see if I can find something I like better.
I was pretty excited to come here. I've heard a lot from a good friend who help the opening of this place. So my husband and I tried the flatbread, corn chowder, risotto and 2 drinks. My expectation was the food would be good and I looked forward to it. The flatbread was so so; he said like eating a cardboard. Soup was good but it was only 3-4oz. My risotto came with 4 pieces of shrimps and 3-4 oz of risotto and it's tasteless. I am surprised to see yelpers give 4-5 stars. I give 5 stars for great atmosphere, nice table setting, nice platters and glasses and utensils.
Came here today with a friend who is vegetarian. It's a casual, order-at-the-counter and sit down type of restaurant, focusing on healthy and organic food. We missed the breakfast but made it for the brunch/lunch menu. I got the Caeser Salad, it was delicious, with fresh cucumber, a healthy portion (enough to get me full) and I got a coffee. My friend ordered the chicken pineapple sandwich, vegetarian style, and a cranberry pomegranate something to drink, which looked delicious. The food got to us in no time, it was fresh, very yummy. And it was healthy portions, but not so small that you are still hungry a half hour after you eat. I was full for a while, that is for sure! And from a salad! Great place to get a healthy meal at an affordable price.
Simply amazing!  Looking to eat fresh made food under 600 calories look no more, the food here is delicious.  Breakfast is fantastic - I recommend the tofu wrap or the oatmeal, both are tasty and filling. I love walking in every morning and seeing the team cutting up all the fresh ingredients for the day.  Lunch and dinner are as equally as awesome - my favs are the flatbread, the eggplant parm and I just recently acquired a new fav - the gardein chicken sandwich coupled with a glass of viognier - outstanding.  I am also a huge, huge fan of the cucumber cooler!  LYFE makes me feel great when I am eating out - nothing fried, everything fresh and all healthy! Looking for a place to help you maintain your healthy lifetstyle, look no further go have a taste at LYFE and become a LYFER like me!
I love the concept of this place, fresh, healthy and organic. When you first walk in it has the same feeling you get when you walk into Whole Foods, you feel like you're doing something healthy for yourself. They have an extensive menu with many healthy choices so you don't' feel guilty ordering the fried chicken which they don't even fry. I love the soybean hummus with the flat bread; my only wish was that it could be slightly larger. The atmosphere is casual, relaxing and great place to bring your family or casual date.
This is a very interesting place, in terms of how they are set up and their menu.  They are what they market to be, a green, healthy choice, organic serving restaurant. The ambiance is modern and green.  You stand in line and order your own food and get a pager.  But this pager is unique because it isn't like what you get at Cheesecake Factory, instead you place it on the place mat at the table you chose and the waiter can locate you through the pager and bring your food directly to you.  They also use chemical free cleaners which is nice, they use an ionizer instead. They make most of everything on their menu inhouse, even down to the ketchup- which they make with tomatoes and agave instead of sugar.  I tried their sweet potato fries which were good but a little soggy, would have been nice if they were crunchier but I think it's because they baked it and not fried.  Their un-fried chicken is basically a breaded piece of chicken breast (free range), that was a little dry and bland.  But it did come with a salad on the side which was very good.  I also got to try their chicken panini sandwich- which was pretty good and less dry since the pieces of meat were smaller and was a part of other sandwich ingredients. Their ice tea and lemonades were good and refreshing, I'd recommend those.  Overall, this place is ok, you can tell they are a new restaurant still trying to figure things out.  For example, the staff is very nice and accommodating but they aren't very organized.  They brought us food that was not ours and then later came back again to give us food that we already received.   The portions are pretty small, I guess relative to American standards, but that is probably how much we should be eating anyway, you know- to be healthy and all.
The jig is up! Sometimes you never know what lyfe is going throw at you. I have been to Lyfe two times now, so one might say this is my second lyfe. Tonight I had some tasty sweet potatoes and brussel sprouts. Thumbs up!! I wasn't crazy about the farmers market salad. A girl can only handle so many pickled onions. I've had the sweet corn chowder before, meh. My sister said the fish tacos were good. Hi Annie! Kevin was super friendly and seemed to have lyfe figured out! Spanks for the great vino recommendation!! Word on the street is that these are Oprah's two chefs. Is this how Oprah stays so bootyful??? I'll definitely give Lyfe another chance.....only if it promises to make me fabulous and profound like the all powerfull O.
Maybe it was opening week jitters, but they missed the mark on my meal here. First  off , my flatbread was good, I'd get it again. The baked sweet potato fries were OK tasting, but not real crisp. The my puck, er burger came out. It was so overcooked I had trouble pulling it apart to show the server how overdone it was. They also messed up my wife's order, so we had to send that back too. About 5 minutes later I had another overcooked (but not nearly as bad) burger. I ate it. 25 minutes later, and 3 discussions with managers, my wife's dish came out again (with the exact same mistake). It had been so long she ate it anyway. While waiting for her tacos, they brought out another order of flatbread, fries and a burger. I think they accidentally re-fired the whole ticket. The staff were very nice and apologetic. The CEO came out to talk to us, and take our feedback. We ended up with a comped meal and a gift card. We'll give them a few months to get the bugs worked out, and we'll try them again.
Didn't get the hype. My two-star rating is not saying anything particularly negative, but rather following Yelp's own description for a two-star rating: "Meh. I've experienced better."  That's exactly how I would sum up Lyfe--I've experienced better.  Just within the vicinity, I would say Sprout, for one, Pluto's, for another, offer the same experience--healthy dining-- but with much tastier and more flavorful offerings. I went with the "unfried chicken", named, I assume, to attract health food snobs.  It was okay ("unfried" means "baked", btw), came with a side of brussel sprouts and squash, which was appetizing, just nothing to write home about.  Also, at $11.99, I did expect a little bit more food than one thin, battered chicken breast filet, though it was enough for me as a light lunch.  The staff was very (overly, possibly intrusively) friendly, which I don't really mind, because I'm a friendly person, but I can see others who care more about their privacy to be slightly vexed by their officiousness. With so many other great, and less costly, choices around the area for healthy dining, it's difficult for me to recommend this place--I'd say given its newness and trendiness, it's much more hype than it is actual content.
Was fortunate enough to go to LYFE Kitchen's opening party for investors (my friend hooked me up).  I had a great time at the event and all of the founders, investors, and employees were very nice and friendly.  But sadly, I was a bit underwhelmed. The food is good, but not great.  That is to say, it is healthy, and it tasted healthy.  The chicken was a bit too try, and everything seemed just a hair short of flavor.  And I tasted a hint of whole grains in just about everything. I liked the BBQ chicken flatbread pizza.  The fish tacos were pretty good, but needed hot sauce.  My favorite was the Art's unfried chicken.  The fruit smoothies are amazing - had both a strawberry-banana and a mango madness - delicious! However, many of the veggies on the side of the dishes are not flavored enough and taste like something off the shelf at Safeway.  I liked the brussel sprouts, though.  Tal's "ancient grain bowl" was incredibly dry, the "gardein" (fake meat) patty was unappetizing.  The cucumber-mint water was too sweet for my taste (and expensive for water).  The "single-service pour-over coffee" was also not great, and the server didn't even know what kind of coffee was which. Which brings me to the servers.  On one hand, loved them - super friendly.  But too friendly.  It became a joke half way through dinner - literally every minute someone came by my table to check on us.  Granted, it was one of the first nights, so everyone was on their A game, but there didn't even seem to be assignments - by the end of the night, every single host had come to our table to check on us. And worst yet, even when they did come, they added no value.  We ended up with 4 of those little buzzer things on our table at one point, and everyone was so confused why (because we had placed multiple orders).  On several occasions they came by to take the buzzer, even while we were still waiting for food.  They lost one of our orders, and when I ordered the mango smoothie, they brought the strawberry-banana (hence why I had both).  We had to ask politely for some space, and although that server left us alone, several more came by. The atmosphere of the room (decoration, etc) is very nice - feels new (well, it is) with modern decoration and very sustainable building techniques (some of the chairs, for example, came from stadium bleachers). I've since been back once, and had a better experience the second time, but still not quite in the 4-star range.  Overall, for nice, healthy place, this is slightly above average.  Prices are reasonable, but you'll need several dishes to fill up.
I love this place. They have separate gluten-free and vegan menus as well as a regular menu. (Why not GF and vegan combined though?) This is my third time here. The fake chicken sandwich is delicious. But this time I've gotten the gluten-free grilled vegetable sandwich. This place gets the idea that great sandwiches have a sauce or spread to add moistness. The downside is the portions are small (can leave me unsatisfied) and prices are typical Palo Alto prices.
CRISPY GARDEIN* CHICKEN SANDWICH was Excellent!!!
My co-workers had come here on opening day and ended up standing around for an hour waiting for their takeout dishes to arrive. I think they ended up getting free smoothies for the wait, and they were apologetic. They came back and brought me, so I thought the food must be decent. It was, and it seems like they really improved the service this time. They were efficient, our food came out quickly, and there was a manager floating around both while we were in line to answer questions about the food and once we'd sat. We'd been told by the cash register workers to keep BOTH our receipts because one was required to get our food, as well as these little numbered electronic beeper-like things. I thought they were like the ones from Cheesecake Factory and would vibrate once my food was ready, but they are more like little locating devices for them to bring the food to us. At one point 6 of 7 of us had our food (including a girl who'd ordered the same thing as me - eggplant parm). I flagged down that manager and he looked at the # on her electronic device. She had it upside down so the number wasn't showing, so flipping it apparently fixed the problem! Her food came out immediately afterwards. And none of us were asked for our 2nd receipt (though they did all look at them to make sure we got the right food). I got: * eggplant parmesan - 3.5 stars (breaded and baked eggplant medallions, topped with pomodoro sauce, ricotta and five-cheese blend, served with garlic broccolini. $9.99/ 550 cal/ 950 mg sodium) The breading was just right and had a good crunch. It was topped with the perfect amount of soft melted cheese and tangy tomato sauce. The broccolini was the only disappointing part, as it had zero seasoning and I thought it was just boiled or steamed. My co-worker's broccolini was covered with some sort of buttery garlic sauce, though and she really liked it. I guess they forgot the sauce on mine..?
Gotta agree with Coop on this place. Fish tacos had no flavor. And were over-priced. Flat bread pizzas were super weak. Grilled artichokes were decent. Wines by the glass were weak; expensive, no flavor. Veggies dishes (like brussel sprouts and squash) were the best and were value priced. Not really clear how to tip the wait staff. I do not carry cash. And since one orders and pays at the counter, there is no way to tip the wait staff. This place will not survive unless they completely reform. Kinda shows that MBA  types cannot do restos. Not well thought out. Visited on Friday, 10/14/11.
After having eaten food from here twice (once to go & once eat in) I can safely say it's, well, pretty good, not great. The concept is fantastic, but the execution is a bit off.  For example, the salads could really use a lot more lettuce which wouldn't raise the calorie count above the 600 calorie limit.  I mean, when you order a salad aren't you really in it for the greens? Bonus points for the clear labels on the menu.  Minus points for the skimpy salad portions. I agree with the Yelpers who've suggested Sprout as a healthy alternative that is close by and just plain yummy.
5 stars for the food. Delicious!  I got the crispy chicken sandwich and sweet potato fries. 3 stars for the wait time. I waited about 15 minutes for my sandwich and 20 minutes for my fries. I expected it would be faster because of the set up: order at counter and food is brought to you.
The restaurant looks good and very promising from the outside. I really wanted to like it. However I was really disappointed by the food. I had the burger, which was marginally better than a McDonald's burger. The patty was flat and dry, which lets me to believe that it was a frozen burger. I mean, if I pay $9 for a burger, I expect a juicy, freshly made patty. Was this a joke? The flatbread was OK, nothing special. The restaurant concept is kind of cool, and it looks nice. I wish the food was good too.
Had b-fast/brunch at Lyfe this weekend and it was just as amazing as all the other meals!!! Can't wait to go back again!
This is one of those reviews that it's hard for me to write because it's going to sound gushy, no... Read more 
I was intrigued by this place b/c I wanted a healthy, tasty food for a reasonable price.  The first time I came here, I ordered the  grilled barramundi. It was a little on the dry side on the edges, but the rest was good. I came back a couple of weeks later and had the creamy chicken and mushroom pasta. That was delicious! The place is not real big, so if you plan to go at lunchtime, it's not the time to have a group of 15 people.   But there are plenty of setups for 1, 2 and groups of 4. There are also some round booths to handle 5 or 6 people. The atmosphere is casual, bright and airy. If there was one thing I would change, that would be to install some sound dampening material in the ceiling and the walls.  There were small children wailing which made it hard to relax.  Also the general din of conversation increased as the lunchtime crowd descended.  Otherwise, I am satisfied and would go back again to sample more dishes!
I heart Lyfe kitchen!  They are gluten free, vegan friendly, vegetarian friendly, and also carnivore friendly, and all the food is super healthy and looked like it was high quality - they state clearly how many calories, are in each entree, and other food facts.  For people with restricted diets, or those who are trying to eat healthy, this is truly a gift.    I wish I lived closer so i could have lunch or dinner here more often.  It is cafeteria style, but a very upscale and clean one at that, and I loved the herb garden near the front doors.  i wonder if they actually do pull some herbs from there or if it is just display.  I had the unfried gardein chicken entree, which is a veggie protein food thing which did taste like chicken, and it came with potatoes, a mustard sauce and other veggies on the side.  It was filling and tasted great.  Anyway, i will definitely be back - there were other things I wanted to try on the menu.
Order was mixed up (Veggieburger instead of grilled sandwich), but I didnt try to get it corrected since i was out of time. So partly my fault. Food was very so-so for the price. Taste factor poor on the veggie burger/sandwich that they served me. So what if they serve organic..i should be able to eat it first! Portion size super small, i was hungry within another 2 hours. I dont think I will visit again, but I do give them credit for service and ambiance in general.
My Yelper friend, Claire W., had been telling me about this place and when my ex-colleague asked me out to lunch here...I pleasantly accepted because not only I was excited to catch up with her, I was also really eager to try the food here :). The line (Friday lunch) was long but it moved fairly quickly!!! and it was raining out there..but customers were flocking. As we waited on the line, we sampled the Thai curry soup. It was delicious and pretty light..but not sure if I would enjoy "drinking" a big bowl of that, with rice maybe.. not by itself. We shared: - Flat Bread with Gorgonzola, onion and mushroom: DELICIOUS and great for sharing, pretty good portion. The flat bread is "thin" and "Crisp," they onion was perfectly caramelized and gave nice sweet flavor, the gorgonzola gave a perfect combination of saltiness and sweetness and the mushroom (wish a lot of more of this) satisfied my meat craving without the guilt :) - Edamame dip with flat bread: it's a great appetizer (small) to share. I loved that the humus tasted fresh and not "sour" but I didn't get what they meant by "edamame humus dip." The only edamame I tasted was a couple of the beans that were sprinkled on top of the humus...if that was the case, I thought.. the name of the dish was deceiving (or is it just for marketing purpose?!) - Side of squash and brussel sprouts with cranberry: the dish is delicious and the portion was great for sharing. It's nothing spectacular though.. not something that I couldn't make at home by myself. Our total tab was about $15 and some change..so it was certainly not bad to split two ways. All in all, this is a hip and trendy"cafe" like place with ok food but nothing is spectacular. The menu could be improved with more "pocket friendly" entree selection (everything on the entree is $10 and up, for lunch). The decor is nice and modern.. the seatings are very close..so if privacy is an issue for you.. you may want to dine elsewhere. ps: I was full when I left but I was hungry an hour later..LOL!!! too light too healthy? ahahaha
Healthy, delicious, local and organic food. Most of the entrees are 600 calories or less. Very clean and modern place with fresh food, great menu and nice service. Would definitely come back here again!
As I sit here drinking my okay-but-kinda-whatever chai tea from Starbuck's, I am reminded of the absolutely delicious chai tea I had yesterday at Lyfe. I wish I was still drinking that one. Haven't tried the food yet but I'll definitely be back. Comfy seats, cute setup, reasonable prices - gotta love it. So far the only downside I could find was that they had almost no outlets for laptops. Otherwise, I'm sold.
Tried two dishes and a drink here. Fish tacos: Loved the colorful presentation with the crisp and fresh vegetables. The grilled fish was flavorful, and the chayote slaw provided a refreshing accompaniment to the tacos. Perfect amount of light acidity in the vinaigrette. Unfried chicken: I tried a bite and thought the texture and flavor of the chicken was great. The person who actually ordered the dish said it got a little dry and in general would not pay $11.99 again for the same dish, but they do serve it with vegetables in a dijon mustard sauce that he liked. Cucumber mint cooler: This would be great on a summer day - slightly lemon scented water with I think some cucumber puree and chopped mint leaves. In general, we agreed the portion size was fine (though by no means generous). Customer service was very good. We'd come back to try  some of the other dishes. As for the comparison between LYFE and Sprout (whom I also like), I like that LYFE offers more entree options, but I would go to Sprout if I wanted a straight-up salad.
Great experience. Food was fresh and for what we ate the portions were good despite what other reviews said (we had the flat bread pizzas). Very fun place to be with a pretty cool atmosphere. Described by my girlfriend as "trendy", but ya definitely would recommend, fun and not crazy expensive for Palo Alto.
Love the contemporary, but casual decor. Healthy menu options. I really enjoyed the margherita flatbread. The unfried chicken entree was good. The chicken itself was kind of dry and mediocre, but I really enjoyed the blend of butternut squash, brussel sprouts, and cranberries. Very flavorful. Prices are definitely fair though portions are pretty small. I had the pineapple, lime cooler which was tasty w/o being overly sugary. I'd want to try their smoothie next time. My dining partner enjoyed the fish tacos, but again, the portions aren't that big. Fast and friendly service. Happy to see a yummy and healthy fast food spot!
I LOVE this place!!!! I seriously can not say enough good things about it. I love the food, I love that I'm only consuming about 350 calories each time I eat there and that it makes me feel good! I think the thing that makes me give them 5 stars it the fact that Cory has amazing customer service!!!! Each time I go there or they bring it to me they know me by name and I'm greeted with a smile. I couldn't ask for anything more!!!! Thank you for making my day!!!!!
This is a extremely well organized efficient eating experience.  Every item on the menu sounds extremely tasty.  We ordered the Salmon (cooked perfectly)  over  a well dressed Arugula with pomegranate .  I also had the beet salad which was well portioned and a healthy alternative to the IN and OUT burgers I have been eating since arriving to the west coast.  The cliental ran the gamete in ages and having Liberty Ale on tap was a bonus.   If you are in Palo Alto this is a great place to eat a delicious, healthy, reasonably priced meal with out the time restraints of a typical high end restaurant.
LYFE seems like a place run by a strangely inefficient cult. I was there at 4 p,m. yesterday--it might have been shift change--and every time I thought I saw another customer, that person turned out to be somehow attached to the business. Everyone was friendly in that cult-ish way. I ordered a salad and a smoothie to go, and watched all of these people just milling around behind the counter and in the kitchen, like little ball randomly bouncing off of one another...and watched, and watched...and waited. My order seemed to take quite a long time. The music was loud and was some sort of annoying pop that seemed out of sync with the vibe of the place. The salad (beet and farro), was small, and seemed light on the "field greens." I added spinach when I got home. The good thing is that dressing on the side is the default. The smoothie was okay, but $4+ for strawberries, bananas, and ice is a bit much. Next time, I'll go to sprout. At least they have actual tofu for protein, not Gardein, and they make it really tasty. Plus their salads are generously-sized, and I don't feel irritated by the music and the wait when I go there.
the reviews here kinda run the gamut, but after indulging in mexico for a week, we thought a healthy meal was in order. we shared the unfried faux chicken w/ brussels sprouts and squash, the farro and beet salad and the baked sweet potato fries.  the hubby also got a small corn chowder.  the unfried gardein and the salad were both very good.  the unfried gardein actually tastes like chicken!  the salad was light and refreshing.  the sweet potato fries were super sweet, but they could have been more crispy.  we will be back to try other menu items.  it's a good healthy option to add to the rotation.
Love the concept.  I've been here four times and plan to come back often. The brussel sprout side with squash and cranberries is awesome.  Their mushroom pizza is also amazing and I love that the calorie counts are on the menu.  Makes it so easy to eat in a healthy way.  I wouldn't recommend ordering a hamburger here.  I tried it once and it was overcooked and just not juicy enough.  The bun tasted a little odd too.
My boyfriend and I are big on local and organic foods.  Our friend recommended Lyfe and after reading the reviews, we had to give it a try while we were in Palo Alto area.  We started with Farmer's Market Salad which was so tasty and tasted so fresh.  We then split the brussel  sprouts and sweet potato fries which were so yummy and not heavy.  We then finished with fish tacos.  I really enjoyed the tacos!  I am originally from Orange County have been living in NYC for the past few years.  I have not found a place that makes great fresh tacos.  I am here only for the weekend but I want to come back just for those! :-)
Perfect!  Very healthy, very delicious!
We stumbled onto Lyfe while walking to one of our fav Palo Alto establishment craving for a burger.  Lyfe looked really trendy and cool.  We thought surely this would be a pricey place, but were surprised that we could get a grass-fed burger for less than $10!!  The burger wasn't the best we'd ever had, but it was quite good and we especially liked the salad side which was baby kale.  Service was good.  Food was yummy, inventive and reasonable.  We had a wonderful meal sitting outside in the sun. We'd definitely come back to try the un-fried chicken and fish taco - apparently two of their most popular items.
Five of us had lunch there today, and overall had a pretty positive experience.  It's not cheap, as a chicken sandwich without any sides is $8.  Adding a small portion of sweet potato fries ($2.50) + glass-o-beer ($4.50) brought the total to $16.21. The chicken (with pineapple) sandwich was quite tasty, but the portion was definitely on the smaller side.  It was the perfect balance of pineapple so as to not overwhelm the chcken.  And the bread...the bread of the sandwich was wonderful.  Again, just wish it was a bit larger.  And the token bit of greens it came with were more for decoration than calories or nutrition. Sadly, the sweet potato fries were mushy, and flacid.  Won't order those again. Overally, we'll go again.  And based upon the length of the line, several other people feel similarly.
Absolutely in love with this place! Ate here recently with a friend and we ordered a variety of items from their menu to share. Everything we ate was high quality and very fairly priced. Being lactose intolerant, but a lover of all things dairy, I was a little hesitant to try their vegan banana rum cheesecake or their sweet corn chowder (made with cashew cream)... But it was amazing! I am definitely a believer :) Will be a regular soon enough!
Ok, I love this place. I decided to write a review even though I rarely do.  I decided to do it foe two reasons. 1. I love it and want them to be successful 2.  I finally found something after going through nearly the entire menu that really needs work. First, this place is awesome. Second, the salmon, barramundi, chicken pasta, baked chicken are all amazing. I love them and can eat here 2-3 nights per week. There are other items on e menu that are great too, but these are the stand outs.  All thoughtfully prepared, healthy, and low calorie. I fund my first dud though. The risotto. This is poorly thought out and tastes as such. This item should be removed from the menu and replaced with something else. I know the chefs have it in them. Keep it up guys. I will eat here weekly, but replace the risotto with something else!
I walked by Lyfe yesterday and noticed the nice sunny deck. Decided to go and give it a try today with a couple friends and my two boys. Was able to grab an outdoor table around 12:30pm on a Saturday: not easy because it was rather crowded. I ordered a burger for the boys. It had way too much ketchup but was good otherwise. Got a nice bleet salad. Took a while to come out but the hostess was gracious enough to gie us a $10 gift card for the wait. Definitively a must go in Palo Alto: good food, great service and an outdoor seating patio!
Would it be weird to say that all other casual eateries in downtown PA are dead to me?
I find I must agree with many others that this place is overpriced. I didn't find the taste as bad as many others have. But the portions are outrageously small. I suppose I noticed too late that the food is quasi-"french" which, by definition, means small portions for high prices. That said, the food is healthy and provides good variety and an interesting selection. For someone gluten-free, this was refreshing. We ordered 4 dinners between the 2 of us and I was still quite hungry after. If the prices were lowered considerably and/or portions increased, my review would go up accordingly. All-in-all, I would suggest trying this place if you are into healthy food, variety and have money to spare.
I hadn't read any of the LYFE hype in advance, but I saw the restaurant as I was driving in downtown PA, so today I commandeered my BFF to join me for lunch. When we got there at 12:15pm, the place was jammed. I mean, people spilling out the door onto the sidewalk, skulking around for tables, sniping seats jammed. I think they must have realized that folks weren't too happy about this, so they had a server passing out samples for those unlucky enough to be caught in the huge line. We ended up sitting at the communal table and were fairly comfortable. Still, with such a cavernous place, it was surprising there was such a crowd. We got a number of dishes. BFF got the corn chowder and chicken-pineapple sandwich, and I got the grilled artichokes and the fish tacos. The run-down: the corn chowder had great texture, but was lacking in flavor. The cashew cream used for the base was interesting, but didn't pack a punch. More herbs were needed. We ended up peppering it up. The chicken-pineapple sandwich was large and filling.  Grilled artichokes were on the small side, and weirdly did not have that much flavor. I would have loved for them to have been marinated in something stronger. Also, at $3.99 for two small quarters (half a medium artichoke), I felt vaguely cheated. Finally, the fish tacos were good. The chipotle sauce inside was tasty, and I liked the slaw. I am not a fish taco expert, but they seemed a bit pricey at $8.99. Here's what rocked: the side of greens that came with each dish. What were they? Dandelion? Mustard? Whatever they were, they were FABULOUS. I left feeling very, very full because the portions were decently sized. I will return to try other things - maybe a dessert next time? Parking is what you'd expect; it is downtown PA, after all. Servers were friendly, but slightly scattered. And the clientele is fairly fit and good looking (unsurprising in this town), but a good mix of young and old.
Excellent!
1. If you are complaining about their portion sizes...you need to get informed. A healthy male does not need more than 600 calories per meal. The portions are proportionate to the delicious goodness you are consuming. [If you still don't understand, then travel a little..people in other parts of the world eat great, yummy, even rich foods at small portions---and guess what???! Most do not die of starvation)!. 2. Don't you just hate when the wait staff at a restaurant actually do their job and wait on you? NO!!! That's their job. Only in PA do people complain of too much attentiveness. 3. Price. Really? I got a crispy gardein sandwich (with a side salad) for under $9-including tax. I dare you to name me another restaurant along University that can offer a meal at that price!! It's a challenge. This place is simply brilliant!
Awesome, moist, lemony pound cake topped with sweet yogurt and raspberry compote. It was perfectly satisfying, and I'm a picky desert eater. I will come back tomorrow for the chocolate cake!
A bit pricey, but food is sustainable and delicious.
The atmosphere was wonderful, the portions were insulting small. My fruit salad consisted of the following: 2 small chunks of catelope, 1/2 strawberry, 4 blackberry's and 2 small junks of slice pineapples. I think there is equally better vegan choices in Palo alto providing a more reasonable portion.
Most things are good. Service is sloooooowwwwww.  Cash register folks are friendly but not, not, not efficient. Generally good food, although we ordered one dish that came out burned. Sent it back with one server, and a short time later a different server brought us back the exact same dish we'd just sent back. Our original server literally came running over and said that order wasn't for us, that there was another one in the kitchen. It left the very strong impression they were simply going to give someone else the burned food rather than throwing it away (and believe me, it needed to be thrown away).
Food: I tried the unfried chicken and the corn chowder.  The chicken was was moist and breaded (soft breading) and it was ok.  The brussel sprouts was ok (I feel like I could have made it more flavorful myself at home) and squash was ok (actually tasted like yam or sweetened kabocha rather than butternut squash and was a bit overdone in my opinion).  The dijon vinagrette was actually very good and I wish there had been more of it on the side.  The cashew cream sauce was very light - I couldn't tell that it was cashew-based.  This was overpriced at $11.99 The cup of corn chowder soup was actually very good and flavorful.  I would not have been able to tell it was a vegan base.  The carrots were bland, however.  Perhaps if they had simmered together a bit longer the flavor would have been infused a bit more into the carrots. Overall, the calories were extremely reasonable.  However, after eating all of the above, I left feeling not very full at all. Service: order at the counter and they give you a number and bring the food out to you.  That is nice.  It was weird that you had to get your own utensils and water though - perhaps that should be closer to the ordering counter so everyone knows to get it before they sit down. Ambience: friendly, casual, but very cute.
So I went for dinner and was even more impressed.  The staff are SO friendly.  One server saw me checking out the beer selection on my way to the bathroom and immediately offered to bring a sample of the seasonal beer to my table.  Also, though you order at the counter and seat yourself, we were easily able to order additional items from our table.
Man, I am so excited about this place!  The food is great and super healthy.  There are other... Read more 
For the full review and pictures of various dishes from Lyfe Kitchen, copy and paste the link below into a new tab. http://realtalkthemag.co... Even for someone who loves eating healthy organic food, Lyfe is not the one. It's like Sprout if Sprout's food didn't taste good. There's a point when food is too healthy to taste good, and that's where Lyfe is... Follow the link to read more!
Service here is A+. So is the food. It is a great way to watch your diet and eat delicious food. And the house wine is above par!  I would give an additional fifth star, but it can get pricey for just a casual meal out.  That really is the only drawback.
The concept is great but the execution lacks. Yes, the food is "healthy" and moderate on calories, but it doesn't taste amazing. But the service is what I'm really concerned about. A not well thought-out system navigated by unmotivated staff. Bus boys that try to rip your plate from you while there's still food left, and waiters with no sense of personal space that reach across your face (an inch away from my nose) to grab empty plates. I understand the desire to turn tables and get me the f&$ck out of the place, but that's ridiculous. The folks taking orders don't know their own menu well enough to recognize when you use *their" ingredients terminology.
I had lunch there yesterday, with my mom.  We were in the fast-paced line & I trusted her to bring me a menu.  Well, she handed me the menu.  I decided on the veggie burger.  My mom  ordered the beet & farro salad and the sweet potato soup.  After I had ordered, I noticed more selections on the board... she had handed me the vegan menu, not realizing there were 2 different menus.  Ah well... such is LYfe ;) The veggie burger was not the best I have ever had; but it wasn't the worst either.  It was what you would expect of a fast food veggie burger.  It was not moist and seemed like it had been formed by a machine.  I liked that it was served with a salad of bright greens I had never seen before, with a light, lemony vinaigrette. My mom's sweet potato soup was ok.  I thought is tasted more like it would have been the curry soup(also on the menu), but there was a hint of sweet potato.  I really liked her beet and farro salad.  It had lots of flavor, including fresh basil and a yummy dressing. Overall, the food was okay.  I am giving a four-star rating because I am hopeful and appreciate the idea.  My mom and I work in the area and are always looking for semi-healthy food to eat at a reasonable price.  This place definitely fits that bill.  I bet if I order something different next time, I will be happier...
Loved the food. I felt satisfied and it was so tasty. It's a bonus that it is good for you. It was quite busy during lunch and it can be chaotic if you sit inside. There are people going in all directions. That is the only reason why it is not a 5 star.
Great tasty n healthy food!
probably a 3.5-4 when you're searching for healthy. this would be the place to go.  love the concept -- all food is less than 600 calories, thus you can just pick what sounds good, and the variety is great.  things can be made vegan or gluten free.  of course, great location for this type of restaurant's market (thanks to their CEO pedigree).  i wish all restaurants could post their calories, but then all the menus might be the 50-90g for fat and the 2000s mg for sodium like Cheesecake Factory and PF Chang.  big name on the menu (Art Smith), so I suppose this is the type of food Oprah ate. (also Tal Ronnen) now for the taste (most importantly).  even if it wasn't marketed as a healthy restaurant, you can tell the food is made healthy.  less oil, not as much flavor, but pretty good for the limitations the chefs are working with.  and if you ate this type of food all the time, you probably wouldn't be expecting all that butter and other ingredients that make tasty food unhealthy anyway.  so it would be hard to eat here all the time but for healthy meals, i would come.  wonder if the menu will rotate. tried: *Art's unfried chicken with roasted winter squash, brussels sprouts, dried cranberries, and dijon vinaigrette.  chicken was breaded to still give it an outer coating instead of just grilled.  when was the last time you had brussels sprouts without bacon? also had: *grilled barramundi with edamame, napa cabbage, baby spinach, roasted mushrooms, and scallions in a spicy vegetable broth.  flavor doesn't lean toward any type of cuisine, but just a little healthy. compared to usual healthy food, this stuff is good, and I think the prices are very reasonable.  organic, sustainable, good for you; it is our future. interior setup very nice, service for a grand opening was good.
If I could give them 6 stars, I would. Great taste, clean food.. so great. I will be back for sure and  I live in San Jose.  For sure my favorite new restaurant. LOVE.
Some excellent food on the menu.  Skip anything with meat in it -- they don't seem to do much of a job of cooking meat here.  Avoid the "breakfast sandwich" ... it's terrible.   The frittata is good.  Espresso coffee drinks are weak, so don't be afraid to ask for "strong" or a triple if you'd normally drink a double cappuccino or latte. The "atmosphere" is a sterile, overly manicured and deliberate attempt to appeal to a metro cliche lifestyle.  From their Web site, it's a sort of prototype of what will be a chain of branded "healthy, conscious, savvy" eating.  Yikes ... just the formulaic tedium of the not-so-background music is all the clue you need that this place is running a program from the investor boardroom from "capacity to execute" management to "key objectives", not from the kitchen to the table.  Ho hum. Still, clean, healthy food that has a wide range of appeal from a very small menu (literally just a handful of items.)  The Humus is a personal favorite, but be sure to sit down and dine or take home promptly or things start to get a little "wet and dreary." Overall, I see myself enjoying LYFE frequently and wish them well in their business model, but long live the "one chef with a dream" restaurant that will be threatened by the business that a chain of LYFE shops ... they'll be eating the lunch of smaller, less professionally "executed" businesses.  So it goes. ps.  The WiFi is unstable despite two hotspots.
This new spot has it all - great food, super service and a welcoming atmosphere. It looks crowded at lunch, but the staff is efficient and friendly and you have ordered and have a table in no time. Food looks good and is good. Don't think the portions are small,  maybe other reviewers eat "supersize'.
This place hits the sweet-spot in terms of speed, price, nutrition, and tastiness.  I can't think of another restaurant that has such a great combination of reasonably-fast, affordable, healthy -- yet delicious food. My wife tried the fish tacos.  They were excellent: hot and tasty.  The kale that came with the dish had a nice zesty lemon sauce that actually made the kale pretty good (I usually HATE kale). I tried the "Unfried" Chicken with brussels sprouts.  I will be getting this a lot.  The chicken was nice and juicy.  And the brussels sprouts were perfectly prepared -- just slightly carmelized, with a a nice emulsion (?) to give a little extra flavor.  The whole dish was served on a bed of chopped butternut squash and dried cranberries for a bit of extra sweetness. We also tried the strawberry lemonade (great) and the corn chowder (so-so -- but then again I'm usually not a fan of corn chowder, so there's a ceiling here that I think they probably are hitting against). Overall, I can't wait to go back.
Love the idea of this place - kind of a healthy, yuppie cafeteria. Order and pay at the counter, seat yourselves and receive your food shortly after that. Came for lunch and had the corn chowder and fish tacos. Corn chowder was tasty, and fish tacos were great too. Sometimes, I say that something tastes "healthy," which should be interpreted as "gross." In this case, the fish tacos tasted healthy, but were delicious. Fresh grilled fish, a nice chipotle sauce and crunchy veggies on top. The salad it came with was extremely bland, but otherwise, no complaints.
Love this concept.  Basically they have so much to offer:  Cool atmosphere with love herbs on display, open kitchen (peeking into the chefs it looked like everything was fresh!), knowledgeable and very friendly waiters, very fast service, wireless... Garden salad was made with flavorful ingredients - often they are so blah but this had flavors and a good dressing.  The unfried chicken was as good as it gets with brussel sprouts and sweet potato cubes like they should be cooked.  With a good glass of wine and a $23 tab what else can you ask for?
Cafeteria-like feel inside, draft beers very expensive at 6 dollars for a pint.  Nice to see vegan menu.  The beet and rice salad and sweet corn chowder were good, but not super. At least it's a place where vegans, vegetarians, and omnivores can find something to eat together. They use the electronic pager method used in food courts, but in this case you don't go up to the counter to retrieve your order, but rather they use the beeper to find your table.
Ordered a couple of dishes when I visted this restaurant on a Friday night with my girlfriend. We didn't know what to expect and it was obvious as the Manager kindly greeted us upon entering and went through the popular menu items with us. He was so friendly and honest about the items. We order an assortment of items: the corn chowder( a must!), the hummas(our favorite), fish tacos, and the gardein chicken sandwich. Everything we had was wonderful and we will definetly be going back to dine.
I ate at LYFE Kitchen the day after Christmas, so there were a lot of people out and about town and the restaurant was understaffed, as could be expected following a holiday. Four of us ate lunch, with one person ordering soup, an appetizer for the table, three salads, and a flat bread. The soup arrived first, as it should have, however it took quite some time for the appetizer (edamame hummus) to arrive. A very polite woman explained that they were understaffed due to the holiday, which we were fine with. The flatbread (BBQ Chicken) was phenomenal, although it arrived almost ten minutes before the salads arrived for my three dining companions. I would certainly eat here again, the food was delicious, healthy, and reasonably priced.
I LOVE EVERYTHING on this menu!! The unfried chicken is incredible, pound cake amazing and the pancakes=fantastic!!
Came to LYFE to order a quick meal before catching a train from the nearby Caltrain station. The restaurant is "fast casual" - you order at the counter, and they'll bring you your food. There's a wide range of vegetarian dishes, all clearly marked, which is always a plus! I had the crispy gardein "chicken" sandwich, which is one of those imitation meat dishes. The sandwich itself was great - the gardein chicken was well paired with the flatbread and sauces they used. The sandwich itself, though, was quite small for the price ($9), and the salad that it came with was quite disappointing - it was overly drowned in dressing, making it soggy and too salty for my tastes. The sandwich gets four stars for its taste, but the small portion plus disappointing salad drives my review for the restaurant down to three stars. Overall, though, LYFE seems to be a solid place for grabbing a quick meal, especially if you're looking for vegetarian and vegan options.
We really wanted to like this restaurant. The concept is great and the interior is pleasant. But after two visits with similar experiences we probably won't be back. I emailed LYFE Kitchen with this feedback, since they have just opened. But after two weeks they still have not responded. As others have mentioned, the food is okay, though portions are very small. But service is awful. Despite the high tech gadget we were given, none of the servers seemed to know what we ordered. Food and drinks came out in random order. On both visits some items were prepared incorrectly and we had to send them back. But the biggest issue is the constant upsell while ordering. I don't mind a friendly "would you like anything else?" after I've ordered. But to be constantly interrupted while ordering (would you like sweet potato fries with that? would you like chicken on that salad?) is irritating and unacceptable.
Great food. Reasonably priced, very fresh. Coolers are awesome. Great fish tacos
Worth checking out. I wish the food were hotter, the portions slightly bigger, and the prices a little lower. Still, I am a fan of the novel concept, fresh decor, casual atmosphere, and Art's Unfried Chicken, so I will be back at LYFE. Staff is extremely attentive (I'm not sure if this is just because the business is new). It was nice, though a little excessive. My take on the dishes: - Grilled Barramundi (white fish): Good flavor; light, though. Fish not flaky enough. Maybe it needs more butter? But that would mean who knows how many more calories. Would have been nice to have bread to dip into the broth. - Tal's Ancient Grain Bowl: Not into the gardein (garden + protein faux meat). Quinoa was fluffy at least. - Art's Unfried Chicken Breast: Delish! Perfectly breaded. Perfectly moist. As my friend put it, "This tastes good for white meat!" Move over dark meat, there's a juicy new white meat in town giving you a run for your money. I really enjoyed the brussel sprouts, winter squash, and dried cranberry accompaniment. Wonderful bit of sweetness with the squash and cranberries. Brussel sprouts provided bite to the dish. I could definitely love my food everyday if I were eating this! - Baked Sweet Potato Fries: I do prefer the crispness of fried fries, and this baked version was indeed softer, but you can't go wrong with sweet potatoes in my book. Not bad for baked. - Grilled Artichoke with Lemon Aioli: This was ok. - Corn chowder: Not as thick and creamy as other corn chowders (probably the ones with 1000+ calories) but it was good. It comes with two toasted multigrain thin baguette-like slices. - Wines: We got Chardonnay and Viognier. I preferred the lighter Chardonnay. I plan to try the banana rum cheesecake, fish tacos, burgers, flatbread, and breakfast items on future visits... I'm getting hungry just thinking about them dyshes now. Some plates on the menu are seasonal, adding more variety and another incentive to return. The place was pretty busy tonight, so I think it will do well. So far, so good, LYFE!
This place its great! Loved the atmosphere for sure. Simple and modern but still comfortable and inviting. Pricing are a tad high but for the quality of food you get it's WAY worth it. I got the chicken and mushroom pasta which was just delicious and the portion was exactly enough. Desserts were good but I'm not sure I'd get the banana run cheesecake again. It tasted odd. The pound cake with yogurt and fruit on the other hand was really good. It was so nice to be able to eat out without completely having to worry about everything I eating.  I'll be back for sure!
Have gone back twice since my first review.  The first time, I tried Art's Unfried Chicken.  It came with a panko-crusted chicken breast with brussel sprouts and winter squash.  The flavors were different, but it was really filling!  I would go back to get this just because it's really low-cal and, again, really filling. The second time, I had the burger.  The only complaint I have on the burger is that the patty was very dry.  May or may not get this again.  Haven't decided. It was also odd walking into the restaurant to their pick-up counter for to-go orders and having a girl who seemed to be relegated to making drinks less than 4 ft. away from me not even acknowledge me as a customer.  I'm not saying this in a "Hey, look at me," kind of way, but a customer should be acknowledged within seconds even if they cannot be helped at that point.  I work at a restaurant and always make sure my guests are greeted.  Just when you've been standing at a counter for a couple of minutes and no one has helped you, but there's a staff member that close and doesn't even say "someone will be with you in a minute," it's kind of off-putting.
LYFE is just alright.  I was really excited about the concept before they opened.  I've eaten there... Read more 
I enjoyed the decor used in Lyfe, it was simple and unassuming yet still created warmth and a friendly feeling. The artichoke appetizer was excellent, it had a nice lemon seasoning that was flavorful enough I barely used the accompanying dip. The servers were pleasant and attentive, which is not always the case in order at the counter type establishments. The tea comes in its own little kettle with Agave nectar sweetener, both of which were nice touches. I got a flat bread, which was also nicely done.  The base itself was crispy. The flavors of the toppings came through well which helped avoid the need to smother it in cheese. My chief complaint is that for a place that has such an emphasis on health conscious eating and provides a separate gluten free menu, the lack of any gluten free desserts (unless you count the side fruit salad offered as part of entrees) was a bit disappointing. Overall a good experience and I will probably be back.
I've been back several times at different times of day since my first visit.  The food remains the best part of the experience.  It is tasty and generally well thought out and nicely prepared.  I particularly like the beet and farro salad and Art's unfried chicken. What is mystifying to me is the general lack of customer service.  Yesterday was a perfect example.  I went in about 4:30pm for dinner there and a salad to go.  It was not a busy time.  There was a man in front of me at the counter waiting to order, and though there was a manager GLUED to his computer (and it faces the sservice counter) and there waere several people milling around, no one approached to take our order or greet us.  After 2 or 3 minutes, I asked him if he was waiting for something to be delivered to him.  He said no, he was waiting to order.  Another minutes or so went by before someone came up and asked if he needed something.  ???  "Yes, I need to order" he said.  Why else would we be standing at the order counter? It was nice out and I wanted to sit outside but the heat lamps were not lit and it was a bit too cool.  I then wanted to sit at the back because there was a table of 8-10 women in the front having a good time and I just wanted to read quietly while I ate.  But the ceiling was open at the back with a tile removed and a ladder there and a long hose running from the space above the tile into the back of the store.  I was there a total of 45 minutes and no one was ever on the ladder but it was not removed.  It seemed an odd time to be working on something that was apparently not critical.  This is something that should be done after hours. So I sat in the front of the store and a young man came by and mopped the floor between me and a gentleman sitting alone at the window.  Then he said "watch out - that floor's going to be slippery".  I asked him why he was mopping while people were walking around there and he said he was doing as he was told.  I asked him if there had been a spill - he said no.  It seemed strange to be creating a safety risk to customers just to be keeping him busy.  When I looked over, the manager was now sitting at a high top table with some other personnel.  He never looked at the customers, never smiled, never greeted anyone.  He didn't "work the floor".  I have seen this manager there before and he is always like that.  He looks and acts like an accountant - he looks serious.  (Maybe he is an accountant and that's why he's not customer focused!) So while doing maintenance (ceiling) that could have been done when customers are not present, and creating a safety hazard (wet floor) by mopping where there are customers sitting and walking around, and ignoring the front desk where customers enter, the whole set up was off-putting.  Gratefully the food saved the day!
I've gone twice  - once for lunch and this morning for breakfast.  I'm a fan of the concept - fast,... Read more 
Love their foods. Great place to have breakfast!
I have been going to Lyfe Kitchen restaurant since it opened. I tried most of the menu and yet found nothing that I didn't like. All of the food looks great and taste better. Love the flatbreads.
First things first - they place just opened and people are complaining about over-service?  Generally, I'll take more than less.  Especially as they find their groove and the risk that things get dropped/missed is pretty high. Pros:  the fish tacos were great.  My brother and I thought they were really tasty.  I think w/ every dish that I say is good, I will only say once - and they are SO relatively healthy. Corn chowder was incredibly tasty and does not suffer from the use of alternative ingredients. The roasted mushroom and goat cheese flatbread was possibly the best thing we had. Neither pro nor con: The risotto was a bit weird for my taste, but definitely interesting and (OK, so I'll say it twice) crazy low calorie. Cons: The red wine came out a little cool, but I mentioned it to them so maybe it will be addressed.  I actually don't mind it cool, but others might be put off. In the aim for healthy, they are very light on salt.  Fortunately there is salt on the table.  I think having some hot sauce or spicy oil on the table would allow me to adjust flavors without just putting back the salt they held back. (like the salsa that came with the Tacos) It is hard to find a place that focused on healthy food that comes quickly, but also has things that make it good for dinner (wine and beer).  I'll go back, and next time I'll try the unfried chicken.
great place!  quality, healthy food and very friendly service.  well done all around.
Great&Warm Ambiance ! Light and delicious food ! Great customer service ! Awesome cooler drink (my favorite is Cranberry& Pomegranate cooler) ! Clean bathroom ! Hubby&I Will be back !
The ordering and food delivery is bit gimmicky but you can't deny that the food is tasty.  I'm a big fan of any restaurant that identifies and even features vegan items prominently, and I'm an even bigger fan of good food.  The roast beet/faro salad is very tasty and fresh, the grain bowl with gardein was good, vegan corn chowder was so flavorful and had a terrific texture.  Hope to come back to try more veg-friendly items soon.  They have a nice (small) selection of local beer on tap.
Checked this new "healthy" chain out that has vegan options. Walk up to the counter, order and they bring it to your table. Ordered their brussel sprout and butternut squash and fake chicken dish.... delish! Also salads were excellent and fresh with yummy dressings.  Staffed by probable Stanford students and locals, so service can be a little "I'm young , just out of high school, and not learned how to be present all the time :))" I.E. they rush around and sometimes don't pay attention to what is going on or with their customers.... but I'm sure that will change as the staff gets comfortable with this place. But that aside the food is awesomely good for VEGAN's and the price is reasonable, the atmosphere is modern Chic. You could definitely take a date here for a nice dinner date before a night  out. The atmosphere is conducive to convo!
This restaurant is really great! It is comfortable and the food mostly great. My favorite is the Unfried Chicken with Broccolini, and the Chicken Mushroom Pasta. The portions are perfect for one, or if you have two people, order two and share. The iced teas are delicious and refreshing. I visit this place 3-4 times weekly with my daughter. There is one server in particular that is top-notch and professional here, his name is Everette. He is attentive, personable, checks back on us regularly and just all around pleasant to interact with.  My hat off to LYFE and Everette for making this restaurant a destination eatery for my daughter, friends and myself.
My husband and I have been there twice now in the past week, very happy to have found a place that offers this type of food for a very reasonable cost, and finally a place that offers more vegetarian options. The food was very good, fast and the order was correct both times, we have now had counting both visits: the crispy gardein chicken sandwich, side of brussel sprouts, Tal's ancient grain bowl, the BBQ Chicken flatbread (with Gardein substituted), and the Edamame Hummus and Flatbread Crisps. Loved it all! The service is very very inexperienced, so you get asked the same questions more than once, and everyone is an eager beaver without being completely efficient, but this is a problem with many new places and will hopefully iron out as the employees gain experience and perfect their system. However I do like the pay before you eat model, it allows for nice quick lunches during the work day - no waiting around for the check and then for change or card receipt to sign. The prices were very reasonable - with water to drink (no I will not pay $2.99 for the water with some cucumber slices and mint in it) our meals came to under $20 for 2 people... for healthy, delicious food! We will definitely be coming here for lunch a lot.
This place has a fun atmosphere and healthy food which is awesome!  I got the unfried chicken which came with brussel sprouts and butternut squash.  The food was pretty good but nothing that I would go out of my way for.
i like their food a lot. been there for both breakfast and dinner, and both times enjoyed their menu. plus, they have calories near each menu item, which is great for me! the ambience is nice too. i like the vegetable pots in the middle of the restaurants. oh, and don't forget the lemonades, they're awesome!
At last, a restaurant at which I care to eat. This is not for those who like to overeat, don't care about their (future) health, want to have that full, burpy feeling after eating, or who love the taste of dripping butter, cheeses, and meats from animals raised and killed inhumanely. At last, a restaurant worth every penny of my soul. The price is proportionate to the portion/quality, and why would one want to eat more. The waiters' protocol could use some work/culture.
Wow this place is swanky and ridiculously popular. My friend described it as very Palo Alto-esque. Anyway, you order your food at the counter and then go sit down. My friend and I weren't that hungry so we split an order of fish tacos ($8.99, 510 cal) and a side of brussel sprouts/butternut squash ($2.49, 181 cal). I thought the fish tacos were not bad, but wasn't that wowed. My friend really liked them though! But I thought the brussel sprouts/butternut squash roast was yummyyy. Came with some tangy vinaigrette which I can't quite identify. The name escapes me for the moment. Kind of a standard sauce. Anyhow, nicely roasted, although a little bit too charred. Inspired me to go buy brussel sprouts and roast them too! Butternut squash was nice and soft and sweet.  Wasn't a huge plate but fairly good value for money. Also, my friend apparently doesn't usually like brussel sprouts but said these were good! We also shared a dessert of lemon pound cake with greek yogurt and strawberries. We both liked it! Not too sweet/rich (or so it seemed).. and good pairing with yogurt and strawberries. Would've liked a bit more yogurt. Surprisingly this one has the highest calorie count of all the desserts. 359cal, $3.99. Kind of nice that they have the calorie count, I think I'd like to try the bbq chicken flatbread in the future. Also the fish in broth.
The place is awesome healthy!!  This is a great stray from the normal greasy, fattening restaurant food you find with tons of hidden fat involved.  I started Weight Watchers again and I find it SO hard to eat out when there are wings and fries as choices, cuz I know it's bad for me, but I happen to like wings and fries a whole lot. :) Anyway, there are no choices like that-a good thing for a girl with poor self control.  Sides of veggies, yummy proteins at an expensive price-but worth the added $$ to have a good meal that you don't leave going well I just blew it today.  The salad I had was pretty good-not stellar but good.  It's a little mid palate like I think they coudl kick up the spice or acid levels a little and you may get better food critiques.  The food seemed to take a little time, but I was there at a fairly busy lunch hour.
phenomenally excellent!!! i attended the LYFE kitchen pre-opening vip dinner in palo alto :) delightful to sample the organic vegan dishes, wild salmon, beet + faro salad, coffee, cucumber mint coolers--- the ultra modern decor, furnishings + floorings, are all ecofriendly + gorgeous!  (there's a wall of herbs!) the execs, designer + staff are amazingly gracious, committed to nutrition, +  have created an inspiring healthy dining environment  :) LYFE opens to the public in 2 days at 4pm wednesday 10/12/11 it's like a dream come true.  healthy vegan choices,  near my gym :)
Nice decor and space.  I had some high hopes here when I came here w/ my family. Portions are kind of small.  Not particularly tasty either.  I guess it was too healthy for my palate. The bbq chicken flatbread - meh.  Smallish, with some chicken.  Better as an appetizer. kids had the fish taco - they didn't like.  I ate it, but it was meh. kids had chicken strips - which are healthily baked.  meh. my wife had a salad which she seemed to enjoy. We tried to close on an up note so we added a chocolate volcano cake and the pound cake - might as well get it from the Starbuck's counter.  again.  meh. I had a fresh pour-over coffee, columbian.  that was good. All in all, 2 adults, 2 small kids, about $60.  No value here.  I know, Palo Alto, but for that kind of money, I want it to be delicious. Some folks seem to like it - but I'm sorry, I don't plan to revisit.
Grea food. It's casual, but everything I tried is tasty and fresh ! The staff is really nice and friendly. A great place to eat good and healthy. The flats breads are awesome.
New to PA, and it was fantastic!  Organic, healthy, and affordable.  I had the chicken/pineapple sandwich and what a punch of flavor!
Tried it today... Seems like a super place for lunch, breakfast or coffee break. Healthy, delicious food (we had salads and fruit smoothies), very good value, quick service, nice modern decor, convenient location. Busy but not crowded, even on Saturday at lunch.
Discovered this place about a month ago and already eaten here several times. I have yet to see an obese person in this restaurant - everybody that eats here seems to be in good shape - good sign :) This is definitely a place to eat if you want a low calorie, healthy meal. If you are looking for greasy, fattening, big portion meals, this is not the place for you. I, personally, love this place. The food is healthy, delicious, with perfect portions. And it is real, live food  - all produce organic, beef is 100% grass fed, Chicken and Fish all natural, farm raised - not factory farmed, hormone injected crap. So far, I have tried the farro and beet salad, flat bread pizzas, burgers, corn chowder soup, chicken/mushroom pasta. All yummy tasting and you don't feel guilty after eating it since all entrees are about 500-600 calories but more importantly, everything is fresh and good quality. If I had to choose a negative, it is the fact that you have to initially stand in line and order the food and then find a place to sit. The 1st time I ate here, I made the mistake of ordering before finding an open table. My order was ready and I was still looking for a table - luckily a table was just emptied and I grabbed it. I would recommend to the owners to make it a full serviced restaurant instead of the fast food style standing in line and ordering. But at the end of the day, it is the quality of the food that really matters to me and I have no complaints about that.
This place is a dream! The food is deeeelicious, healthy, low calorie, and affordable. And it's fairly quick to come out. What more do you want people?!
Asleep at the wheel. After repeatedly requesting all my dishes be vegan and getting confirmation the server had understood my request, I was served a salad with shaved parmesan on it. The other two of my three dishes were tasty enough. I'd be back if I ever got a clear sign they've worked out the kinks. A shame to have a vegan menu and then not have it together enough to be careful with vegans' orders. update 12-20-11: Company rep followed up with me to make amends and let me know they're taking specific steps, including changes to names of items on the menu, in order to prevent mishaps like the above.
Loved the quality and freshness of the food. We ordered the beet + farro salad, flatbread with chicken, and the 'unfried' chicken. All of the creations were tasty and relatively low(er) calorie. The ambiance is open and airy and the service friendly. Lyfe is now on our favorite list to try again.
Lyfe is my new favorite restaurant!!  The food is fresh and clean.  Services is great.  Love it!!
This place starting with the pretentious name was very disappointing. The food: While I appreciate the caloric and sodium information, the portions were tiny and unsatisfying.  The prices are unreasonable given the quality and portion size.  It seems as though they set calorie targets and then created the dishes to hit their targets.  The food was not tasty and did not seem overly healthy either. Ambiance: The setting attempts to be inviting and natural however it is poorly designed and executed.  The seats are uncomfortable and cheap, the colors (fake bright orange leather) are mismatching and it seems as though the team took shortcuts.  Also, the "fresh herbs" with random names of herbs written on the boxes does not seem to have any relevance. Service: The service was mediocre at best.  The cashier who only said:  "What is your name?" and was not very helpful with menu options.  We also were not brought any silverware.  The restaurant might need some time to work out the service kinks and should consider hiring a friendlier staff. Overall: I will not be returning to Lyfe.  I left hungry and disappointed and am very surprised that Art Smith associated his name with this restaurant.
The food was good, service was amazing. I loved the different choices for all food needs. The specialty beverages were a great part of the meal. I would go back.
This is definitely a niche place.  If you're looking for healthy and well thought out food, it's a good choice. In general the food tasted fine, nothing spectacular. The calling card seems to be making heavy dishes healthy.  That's certainly not an easy task and they largely do a good job. The prices were ok.  Serving sizes are not huge; to be honest they are about the right amount, but relative to other restaurants they're a little small. The decor and lay out is sort of like a cafe. All in all, solid, but not enough to make me go there all the time. One last note, the service/management is outstanding; they certainly seemed to care how our experience was
Introduced to this place tonight by my friend - just fabulous!  Fresh ingredients - tons of selection for us vegan/vegetarians - really personable staff - I went up to speak to the person I ordered from & he remembered my name - how great is that!  Definitely going to be a regular!!
My wife and I went here for their soft opening and the food and service was outstanding! Everything tasted fresh and valuable. We enjoyed all of our dishes here - especially the corn chowder is a must! Will come back here.
went there yesterday and really loved it.  Had the chicken flat bread and it was great.  also had the beet salad and it also was fantastic.  The vive of the place is wonderful.  A lot of energy.  I love in chicago but when I am in the area I will definitely go to Lyfe.  It also helps that the food is good for you!!!
The last time I came here for take-out it was extremely disappointing.  I picked up an Art's Unfried Chicken again and was amazed at how different it was.   It was an incredibly small portion (one teeny piece of chicken, as opposed to two larger pieces in the past), the chicken was badly burned (blackened) in some places, and it was tough and dry.   Aside from taste, the meal didn't fill me up as it has in the past and I was very hungry afterwards.  I also tried the cashew corn chowder, which I really didn't like it.  It was bland and flavorless (you know how some things are described as tasting like cardboard?  This tasted like liquid cardboard, if that makes any sense).     Continuing the small portions theme, the cup was also only half full.  For $17 for a meal that barely fed me, I felt ripped off.   I will leave it at 3 stars because I have had a good meal here, but their inconsistency means I am unlikely to be back - I would rather go someplace I know will be reliably good.
I have been dying to come here since I first heard about it & saw some Yelp friends reviews, but my... Read more 
Finally, a place where I can order anything - and enjoy it without fear of high calories. Highly recommend:  "Art's Unfried Chicken", "Tal's Ancient Grain Bowl", and the "Grilled Barramundi".   These main dishes may look a bit small on first site, but they are actually quite filling. Also, I recently started holding business meetings at LYFE mid morning and mid afternoon, as the seating is pleasant and the coffee is good.   (Apologies to University Cafe, which up to recently was my main place to hold meetings.)
I love love love LYFE! This place has become my weekly breakfast spot after an intense bootcamp workout. My fave is the breaksast burrito. Happy to hear that LYFE now has meals being sold at Costco.
This place is fantastic. For what you pay, the cup runneth over. Lively ambiance, very healthy good food, great staff, and all for very reasonable prices. I rately write reviews, but I love this place, and it deserves 5 stars.
Yum..yum...yum... So fortunate to get seated on their trial run before the grand opening. Food is healthy, fresh and Delicious! Spot on! Deco is modern, hip and comfy.. Love their outdoor patio seating.. Love their  planters with fresh herbs around the restaurant which gives a fresh aromatic smell in the air. Everyone from boss to manager and waiters are friendly and professional. You will like this place too, give it a try! See you all Lyfers there! BTW Grand opening is on Wed. 10/12.
The positive: tasty food and easy, fast ordering.  And it's good for you: good to see more restaurants like this opening up. The drawbacks: small portions, and it was difficult to read the menu.  Note that the menu on the screens above the register is not the entire menu.  We didn't figure that out until after we ordered.
Visited here on Saturday through a friend's suggestion. This place reminded me a lot of this restaurant I had visited in Munich, Germany back in 2010 called Prinz Myshkin. It's an upscale cafeteria kind of place with food prepared in a healthy way. Through some suggestions and browsing the menu, I opted for the unfried chicken. You need to have a healthy appetite for this dish. The chicken was moist and tasty. I highly recommend it. The brussel sprouts were soft and buttery. I would love to return here to try out the other dishes.
I was attracted to the place because I'd heard it to be healthy but cheap. Wanting to try something new, I chose this place for a lunch date and was thrilled. I had the fish tacos with sweet potato fries and a cranberry-pomegranate cooler (cranberry and pomegranate juice with cucumbers and mint...incredibly refreshing) and have zero complaints. Will definitely be eating here again!
Atmosphere is great.  Friendly staff.  We both had the Farmers Market Salad which was good.   Definite inconsistency in salads from mine to my dining companions.  Mine was noticeably bigger with more of the red bell peppers, walnuts & goat cheese. Not sure if the addition of chicken or shrimp was enough protein for us.  Looked about 1-1.5 ounces per serving (and being generous saying 1.5 ounces.....my companions addition of chicken looked to be about the size of a cheese stick and I received 4 small shrimp for mine).  Will probably give them some time to get established before returning.   Also was not crazy about having to pay for a refill on iced tea.
LYFE Kitchen is a great addition to the Palo Alto dining choices!  Their name stands for LOVE YOUR FOOD EVERYDAY,  and they state their intention is to serve good, simple, great tasting, fresh food in a sustainable way with a committment to give back to the community.  They have a varied menu with lots of selections for us vegetarians, and good fresh- squeezed  juices.  I loved the Farmers Market Egg white Frittata.  Their salads are also creative and yummy!
LYFE is a wonderful new addition to the Palo Alto neighborhood. This restaurant is taking us all on the first steps toward a healthier lifestyle. The chefs and creators have taken the hard part out for us and all we have to do is select our favorite dish. The calories, sodium, and nutrition all have been vetted for us. I like that they don't use anything processed, butter, cream, or corn syrup. The space is inviting with a great outdoor patio. Love the herb wall. I am a self-proclaimed foodie and for a healthy, solid meal, I definitely would check out LYFE. My favs - fish tacos, mango smoothie, and corn chowder
Great food. Good beer. Unbelievable service!
love it!!!! healthy food at good prices in a pricey part of town. I really like the fish tacos and the juices. the mango madness is the great.
I stopped by for lunch today with my wife.  It was our first time visiting Lyfe, but overall we had a great experience.  The food was really, really good!  I had the Corn Chowder, BBQ Chicken Flatbread, and Berry Smoothie, and my wife had the Grilled Vegetable Sandwich.  Everything was fresh, great tasting, and filling.  The only glitch was that my Smoothie and my wife's Ice Coffee were slow to come out.  We even had to ask the waiter two separate times.  Shortly after it came out, however, the manager came over to our table, apologized for bringing the drinks out late, and gave us a $10 gift card for our next visit.  We didn't even complain about the slow service--she just saw that everything wasn't perfect and took the initiative to fix the situation.  Epic win!  We'll definitely eat there again!
We've been to Lyfe twice and the food was great both times.  I think the prices are pretty reasonable as well.  You won't get over-flowing portions, but unless you are starving when you eat a meal there, you'll be fine.
Healthy AND delicious :)
After much anticipation, I tried LYFE today for lunch.  My sister & I split both the cheeseburger & the fish tacos.  I thought both tasted great & we really enjoyed the ambiance of the restaurant.  We were lucky enough to snag a table outside in the sun but the inside of the restaurant has a very crisp & modern feel.  There are so many great options on the menu so I'm looking forward to trying more...including their brunch items.  So glad we have a new & healthy restaurant here in Palo Alto!
I had lunch with friends here today.  Having read the Yelp reviews, I was worried about the food, the portion size, the service, the cost, etc.  I over-ordered - a cup of corn chowder, a burger, lemon poundcake, and coffee.  The service was good, a little scattered because there doesn't seem to be any way to track what a specific person orders; we were asked repeatedly (but very nicely) if we had everything.  That says to me that the kitchen organization needs to improve, but it did not take long before we did have all our food.  Everything I ordered was very good to excellent.  The corn chowder was a larger serving than I expected, and it was delicious - not the sticky mess a lot of restaurants serve.  The burger was done as I requested, was tasty, and the right size (not huge).  The side salad of kale and carrots was very good - over dressed and a bit on the sour side but very tasty.  Coffee was excellent; strong, freshly made and a good size cup.  Lastly, the lemon pound cake was very good, too.  I didn't expect raspberry jam on it, and that was for me a little too thick, but the fresh strawberries and the cake itself were quite good, and as a dessert, it was just the right size.  Will I go back?  Yes - it would be nice to have one closer to home, but if I am in Palo Alto, it's a good alternative for a reasonable lunch.  I paid $21 for everything, but given all that I ordered, I got my money's worth.
Gluten free?  You'll starve.  Almost everything on their menu had something in it I could not eat.  All of the breads are multigrain.  Not gluten free.  The sauces are made with cashews.  Can't eat them.  I was offered a salad but preferred a hot meal.  The hostess suggested the unfried chicken which I ordered but then realized it had breading.  Not gluten free.  They offered to make the unfried chicken without the breading, but when they brought the dish they were out of some of the vegetables.  Meanwhile, my companion had finished her meal.  It was not a happy experience.
Tasty and fresh. I really enjoyed the food. The service was excellent and there are many things on the menu that i am looking forward to trying. We arrived early (11 am) and the place was hopping when we left at 12:30. Glad to see Vegan and Gluten free options. Love that they have a kids menu that involves actual food, as opposed to the pizza, chicken nuggets and mac and cheese from a box that you generally see. Can't wait to try the brunch!
Clean, healthy, and delicious. I ordered the margarita flat bread and it was fresh and filling.
Wonderful concept, but portions are much too small.  You should NOT leave hungry at that price.
Love the healthy options offered by this place. Their portion sizes are healthy, and the food tastes healthy... which means that if you're used to bigger portions and a good dose of butter in your foods, you may be left wanting.
Today was my fifth visit to Lyfe and again we were impressed!  The service keeps getting better and better.  We also took my in-laws who are visiting from the mid-west (and like to poke fun at us uber-healthy Californians) and they loved it!  They had mixed feelings on whether this restaurant would succeed in the mid-west/east coast.  I hope it does!
It's like a nicer super-healthy version of Panera.  Love the emphasis on seasonal local ingredients.... Read more 
Outstanding! Attended their soft opening this afternoon...can't wait to go back! Tried the farmers market salad(delish), fish tacos(craveable), fresh lemonade with mint & very berry smoothie. Everything was very tasty...and then you remember that it's healthy & you really feel good! My new favorite place!
I went to their soft opening today and it was great! Despite them just getting started the service was excellent and the food was spot on. Palo Alto definitely needed a place like this one.
Walked into LYFE with a few of my co-workers from lunch. The location of the newly established restaurant is perfect. An area where people are health conscious and willing to open their wallets a little more. It was their official opening day and we must have been greeted by 4 or so people. A little overwhelming but understandable. Their menus are displayed on TV monitors and they also have printed menu's. Wide range of healthy organic choices and a nice breakfast menu. I ordered the roasted beet and farrow salad. Tasty great, presentation was a little sloppy. I liked how they added pomegranate seeds to the salad even though they weren't listed on the menu. Their green tea at LYFE is awesome. I don't know what it is, but it tastes different and oh so good on a warm day. I did enjoy the outdoor seating options and the look and feel of place being simple and clean. I will be back to check out their breakfast. Nice new spot in Palo Alto. Hope it makes it.
Prices are great. Food is delicious. Nice ambiance.
It took over 30 minutes to get our dinner, the portion where small and the food was mostly tasteless, with one exception that was a little better. I love healthy food, but will not visit this place again.
Lyfe simply needs to do better by its customers.  You'd think that a new place trying to make an impression would do its customers the service of staying open until the time they advertise in places like their website and the sign on their front door! We got there at about 9:30 on Saturday night, ordered and sat outside on the patio to eat.  About 10pm the cleanup activities start...people buzzing about stacking chairs, cleaning, etc.  A few minutes past 10pm (they are supposed to be open until 11pm), we notice people walking up to the front door and finding it locked, then turning and leaving with a puzzled look.  One gentleman, thinking that surely the sign on the door that says 11pm is honest and they must still be open, walks inside through the patio area, only to be denied service at the counter. When I spoke with the manager as we were leaving, I let him know that we like the place and the food, but that we might not be back and explained why.  He only seemed annoyed that we had summoned him from the back and didn't seem to care much or indicate that they would operate any differently in the future. Having said all that, the concept is great, the food is great, they have three fantastic beers on tap (kudos to whoever chose locally-based brews).  There's a lot that's good about this place, and maybe I'll give them another chance, but to change my opinion, they'll need to act like they actually want me as a customer. Side Note: afterward we went over to Pinkberry at Stanford Mall (advertised open until 11pm) for dessert.  I walked in their door at 10:58pm.  I was greeted with a smile and a happily served.
We went in the early evening, the service was nice, but slow.  The food was OK, but I can do much better at home.  Overall the concept of reduced calorie dining is great, but the execution was quick serve traditional, not enough care to be able to pull it off.  I will try it again, but so far I was not impressed.
I recently went to this restaurant and had been looking forward to it.  I ordered a salad, which while fresh, consisted mainly of lettuce.  Price of wine highly overpriced for this type of restaurant.  Crepevine is a better choice for the same price.  I will not return to this overpriced, skimpy portion restaurant.
I am excited that there are companies out there trying to fill the niche for healthy, casual food and I was excited about trying it.  I think they have good potential but there are some "new restaurant" opening issues they still have to work out. 1) The cashier was a little confused and forgot to give us our GPS tracker. 2) After we sat down, somebody came to our table to tell us they were out of strawberry smoothies, so my companion ordered another flavor.  Then she came back to tell us they are out of all smoothies, so he ordered a lemonade instead.  There's a significant price difference between the two though, and I had to ask to be refunded the difference -- they didn't offer.  When they did though, they gave us the lemonade for free due to the mixup. 3) PLEASE KNOCK OFF THE HARD SELL.  I hate being pushed for items that I don't want.  No, I don't want protein on my salad.  No, I don't want dessert.  If I wanted them I would have ordered them. I am hoping they'll work out some of these issues because the food was good.
Really want to love Lyfe.  There are a lot of kinks to be worked out, mostly with service (way too many people (8) stopping by to ask how everything is) and way too many 'management' looking people and not enough servers.  Also, everyone on site seems to be afraid of the guy with the white hair.  Is he...
Woohoo is right!  Finally!  An easy answer to the old "I want to eat out, but I don't want to eat unhealthy" conundrum.  Delicious food with calorie counts, choices for vegans and vegetarians, as well as awesome burgers and fish.  We loved the mushroom and goat cheese flatbread, eggplant parmesan, and chicken sandwiches.  Can't wait to go back and try more!!!
I attended the soft opening today and was very impressed. Finding any restaurant these days that has even a few choices for those of us looking for tasty, organic, creative menu items can be a daunting task, but Lyfe has set a new standard. I want to try everything on their menu, and I've never said that about any other restaurant. The food, service, and decor were all outstanding. My Tai's Ancient Grain Bowl was close to perfect. Don't miss the sweet corn chowder. Can't wait to try the whole-grain buttermilk pancakes for breakfast (with fruit and yogurt no less). Yum.
I had been wanting to try this restaurant for a while and thought we'd give it a shot on friday evening. The reviews on Yelp were quite mixed so I thought we'll make up own minds after the dinner.  We took a bottle of wine to celebrate our wedding anniversary that had just passed. From the time my husband and I entered the restaurant to the time we left, our experience was fabulous. Its a new place, I loved the Silicon Valley vibe, casual and understated yet not so casual that you couldn't enjoy a good bottle of wine and conversation. The menu is very eclectic, service is outstanding, staff is courteous and well informed and the owner himself was making sure that everyone was being looked after. We ordered Edamame Humus with flatbread and the Thai soup for appetizers, both delicious and for dinner we had Grilled Salmon on a bed of Kale and fish tacos. All the dishes were well prepared, flavorful and presented elegantly, and most of all, the portions were just right!  Our total bill was 36 dollars which I think is very reasonable for dinner anywhere in this area. We had been talking to the owner about our wedding anniversary and before we could order our dessert, a gentleman walked over with a yummy chocolate lave cake, moist, warm and delicious. Overall, a most satisfactory evening, healthy, delicious food, don't feel like you can't breathe after you've eaten, and the ambience is pleasant and inviting. For those who haven't been there, GO, and those who went during its "teething pains" give it another try!
So my daughter and I were wanting somewhere easy to eat, no fuss but combined with good food.  I had heard about Lyfe and we decided to give it try.  Overall it was a solid experience in terms of what we wanted.  The menu is straightforward and offers a good range of options.  Daughter went for the BBQ chicken flatbread, while I chose the salmon entree.  Drinks were lemonade for her (very good) with a ale for me (also very good-- full bodied without too much hops).  Salmon is excellent-- high quality with a very tasty seasoning that approaches a "blackened" rub that one might find in the south.  Mix of cranberries, spinach, faro and other seasonings made for a great complement to the fish.  The flatbread was also good, with a smokey bbq base and a light crust which blended well overall with the chicken.  Overall great food, easy experience and while a little pricey-- worth it given the quality of the ingredients and consistent delivery.  Desserts are delicious.
delicious, healthy, fast, great service.  doesn't get much better
